A
CHAPTER I.
Come let us prepare,
We brethren that are.
Our Hero
, the present
Thrice Illustrious
TIMOTHY
PEACOCK,
Esquire
, was born in a small village in the
interior of Rhode Island. His father and mother were
deserters from a British fleet. They had, however, once
seen brighter days than this circumstance might seem to
imply; for Mr. Peacock, at one time, had the honor to
write himself Chief Butcher to His Majesty George III.,
London. Mrs. Peacock, before she united her destinies
to those of the honored father of our herothat union which
was to bestow upon the New World the brightest masonic
star that ever illumined the wondering hemisphere of the
WestMrs. Peacock, I say, was called the Billingsgate
Beauty. They very mackerels she sold might shrink from
a comparison with the plumpness of her person, and the
claws of her own lobsters were nothing in redness to the
vermillion of her cheeks. She made, as may well be
supposed
,
sad devastation among the hearts of the gallant
young fish-mongers.Oystermen, clam-cryers, carpers,
shrimpers and allall fell before the scorching blaze of
her optical artillery. But she would have mercy on none
of them; she aspired to a higher destiny; and her
laudable
ambition was rewarded with the most flattering
success
;
for she soon saw herself the distinguished lady of
Peletiah Peacock
, Chief Butcher to His Majesty. But
how she became the envy of many a dashing butcheress,
by the splendor of her appearance,how her husband
flourished, and how he fell, and was driven from the stalls
of royalty,how he took leave of the baffled bum-bailiffs
of his native city, enlisted on board a man of war, and
sailed for America, with permission for his loving rib to
accompany
him,how they both deserted at a New England
port, at which the vessel had touched, and were housed in
a friendly hay-stack in the neighborhood till the search
was over and vessel departed,and, finally, how they
travelled
over land till they reached the smiling village where
they found their abiding domicil, belongs, perhaps, to the
literati of Britain to relate. They have, and of right ought
to have, the first claim on the achievements of their
countrymen
with which to fill the bright pages of their country's
biography; and to them then let us graciously yield the
honor of enshrining his memory with those of their
Reverend
`Fiddlers' and
truth-telling
`Trollopes.' Far be it from
me to rob them of the glory of this theme.Mine is a
different
object; and I shall mention no more of the deeds of
the father than I conceive necessary to elucidate the
history
of the son, whose brilliant career I have attempted, with
trembling diffidence, to sketch in the following unworthy
pages.
The place where the Peacocks had fixed their
permanent
residence was, as before intimated, a small village
in the state of Rhode Island. This village, I beg leave to
introduce to the reader, under the significant appellation
of
Mugwump
, a word which being duly interpreted means
(unless my etymology is sadly at fault) much the same as
Mah-hah-bone
which last, after a most laborious and learned
research, I have fortunately discovered to signify
nothing in
particular;
though, at the same time, I am perfectly aware
that both these terms are used at the present day,
vulgarly
and masonically, as synonymous with greatness and
strength. But to our story: Mr. Peacock had no sooner
become fairly settled than he began to devise the ways and
means for a future independence; and such was his
assiduity
to business, and such his financial wisdom derived
from lessons of sad experience in the old world, that his
exertions in the new soon began to count brightly; and
the third anniversary of his entry into Mugwump found him
the owner of a snug little establishment devoted to public
entertainment, under the sign of a bull-dog, which he
lucklessly
selected in memory of a faithful animal of that
species
that had once backed a writ for him, that is, had
given
him bail by holding back a sheriff by the tail of the
coat till his master could shift for himselfI say lucklessly,
for the malicious and unfriendly took occasion from this
circumstance to christen Mr. Peacock's inn by the name of
the
Doggery;
and hence unjustly sprung that epithet now
extensively applied to low grog-shops, sluttish taverns, &c.
In this situation, however, notwithstanding these
attempted
disparagements of the envious, Mr. Peacock soon had
thriven to such a degree as to be able to bid defiance to
all the constables and sheriffs this side of London.Indeed
he now began to be reckoned a man of some pecuniary
consequence. This was indeed a source of much pride
and gratification to Mrs. Peacock, who began, both by
precept
and example, to enlighten her ignorant neighbors in
matters of London gentility; but was it sufficient to
satisfy
the mind of one of Mr. Peacock's endowmentsof one
whose honored name and avocation was once coupled with
the Majesty of England? By no means!He wished only
a competence; and this attained, his ambition began to
soar to higher honors than the mere possession of sordid
lucre, in this land of republican simplicity, will bestow.
But how to gain these honors and arrive at his former
dignity
of station was a subject that often sadly puzzled his
mind. The people of his adopted country entertained
such singular notions respecting the qualifications they
required
of those who should ask promotion at their hands,
that he soon perceived that any attempt to gain their civil
distinctions would be fruitless, and he turned his attention
to a different object. He had heard much, both in this
and his own country, of the sublime order of
Freemasonry
of
its titles, its grades, its honors, its talismanic
powers
in ensuring escapes from pursuing enemies, its
advantages
in putting its possessors directly into the highway of
office and power, and, above all, its wonderful secret, which
the brotherhood had so often defied the whole world to
discover. Ah! this must
be
something, said he, as he
pondered on the subject, this is something that these
leveling Yankees have not yet laid their hands on.This
looks indeed a little like old England. In short his
curiosity
became awakened, his ambition fired to possess the
key to this labyrinth of mystery, this great secret treasury
of honors and advantages, and he firmly resolved to become
a member of this wonderful fraternity. With this
determination
he applied for admission into a lodge in a
neighboring
village, it being the only one then in the vicinity. But
here alas! his commendable ambition was doomed to
suffer
defeat and disappointment.When the important day
arrived on which he expected to be initiated, great indeed
was his mortification and surprize to be informed that he
could not be admitted, as
all was not clear
. It is all
very clear to me, replied Mr. Peacock, after the first shock
of his surprize was a little over, it is all very clear to me;
but you are all most wilfully out of your wits I can tell ye.
I have led as honest a life, both in this country and England,
as the fattest of ye, and as to knuckling to a pack of
scurvy
dimecrats
, I'll let ye know I sha'nt;so, good bye, and
be dd to ye! After giving these aproned heralds of his
defeat this spirited reply, he went home to sleep off his
indignation
.
Sleep however could do but little towards
assuaging
so bitter a disappointment; and the next day he
set off to visit a neighboring farmer, with whom he was
intimate
,
for the purpose of unburdening his troubled
feelings
.
This person, who was called
Bill Botherem
, on
account
of his propensity for hoaxing, (his real name being
William Botherworth) had been a sailor till about the age
of twenty, when, after having seen considerable of the
world, and made something handsome in several lucky
ventures at sea, he relinquished that kind of life, and
purchasing
A *
a farm in the vicinity of Mugwump, settled down,
and now led a jolly life, keeping bachelor's hall to board
himself and his workmen. Mr. Peacock, who had
contracted
a sort of confidential intimacy with Bill, because he
could talk about London, or because he had been a
liberal
customer, or both, having heard from his own lips that
he had been a Mason, though afterwards expelled for some
trick or other played off on a brother MasonMr. Peacock,
I say, considered that he would be the most suitable person
to whom he could communicate his difficulties, and at the
same time the most capable adviser in putting him in a way
of overcoming them, and accomplishing his still ardent
desire
of becoming a Mason. With this purpose in view, he
called on his merry friend, and, withdrawing him a little
from his workmen, he candidly related the whole story of
his troubles and wishes. Botherem listened to the tale of
Mr. Peacock's wrongs with deep attentionsympathized
with him in his disappointment, and bestowed many hearty
curses on the stupidity of those who could reject a man who
would have been such an honor to their society. And,
after
musing awhile, he told Mr. Peacock that he should
advise
him not to go near the fellows any more, or make
application
to any other lodge, but if he wished to become a
Mason he had better be initiated privately by some
friendly
Mason. Privately! said Peacock, I did not know
it could be managed in that way. O, nothing easier,
rejoined Botherem, (his eyes beginning to dance in
anticipation
of the sport of such a process) nothing easier, Mr.
Peacockyou may as well
be taken in
privately as
publicly
;
and when you have once received the secret by a
private
initiation, I will venture to say you will be as wise as
the best of them. Mr. Peacock, overjoyed at this
information
,
sprang up and exclaimed, Then, Bill, you shall
be the man what shall do it, by the Lord Harry!
Botherem
,
with some hesitation, consented to the proposition;
and it was soon arranged that the ceremony should be
performed
that very evening at Botherem's house, where no
women or other evesdroppers or cowans would be about
to pry into their proceedings. Botherem was to send off
his workmen and call in such masonic friends as he might
wish to assist him in the performance; and the candidate
was to come alone about dark, when every thing should be
in readiness for the ceremony. All things being thus
settled
,
Mr. Peacock departed, exulting in the thought that
the wish nearest his heart was now so near its
accomplishment
.
When Botherem was left alone, he began to be
somewhat startled at his own project, lest it be productive
of serious consequences to himself should he really
initiate
the man into the secrets of Masonry; for he well
understood
the fiery vengeance of the fraternity in case of
detection. But his desire to see so fine a piece of sport, as
he conceived this would be, at length prevailed over his
scruples, and he determined to proceed; varying,
however
,
by way of caution, the usual ceremonies of a regular
initiation
so far, that while he gave the candidate the full
spirit of Freemasonry, he would keep from him so much of
the letter as would exonerate him from the charge of
divulging
the true secrets, which he believed to consist of
grips, pass-words, &c. By pursuing this course, he
supposed
he should be doing ample justice to the candidate,
while he could himself escape with impunity, should the
transaction ever reach the ears of the fraternity,a
supposition
,
alas! in which the sequel well shows how fatally
he was mistaken.
After having digested his plan of operations,
Botherem
called his men together, (having no notion of calling
in other aid) and swearing them to secrecy, revealed to
them his whole scheme. Entering with great spirit into
the project of their leader, they went to work with all their
might to finish their tasks in time to make the necessary
preparations for the interesting occasion. As the nature
of these preparations will best be learned in a description
of the ceremonies, it will be needless here to detail them.
At the appointed hour, Mr. Peacock, with a heart
beating
high with expectation, and fluttering at the thought of
the lofty honors about to be conferred upon him, made
his appearance at the house where the ceremonies were to
be performed. A man, with a white birch bark mask on
his face, and an old dried sheep-skin apron tied round his
waist, and holding in his hands a pole into one end of which
was fastened part of an old scythe-blade, stood at the door
officiating as Tyler; and, hailing the approaching
candidate
,
bade him wait at a distance till all was ready for his
reception. At length a loud voice within the house was
heard exclaiming
Give a word and a blow, that the workmen may know,
There's one asks to be made a Freemason!
A heavy blow from an axe or falling block, and a sharp
report
of a pistol instantly followed, and a man, masked, and
otherwise strangely accoutred, soon issued from the door
midst the smoke of gunpowder, and, approaching the
wondering
candidate, took him by the hand and led him into a
dark room to prepare him for initiation. Here Botherem,
as Most Worshipful Master of the ceremonies, was
immediately
in attendance.Deacon Dunderhead, said he,
place the candidate so that his nose shall point due east,
while I propound the usual questions.
Do you sincerely desire to become a Mason?
`To be surewhy, that is just what I come for, you
know, Bill.'
Call me Worshipful! thundered the Master.
`Worshipful, then,' muttered the abashed candidate.
Will you conform to all our ancient usages?
continued
the master: Will you cheerfully submit yourself to
our established and dignified custom of blindfolding the
candidate and stripping him even to the nether garment?
`Why, I should not much mind about your stopping my
blinkers awhile,' replied the candidate; `but as to being
put under bare poles, that's too bad, by a dd sight, Mr.
Worshipful!'
Silence! exclaimed the Master; for as the sun riseth
in the east, and as a man sticketh an axe in a tree, so do I
forbid all profane language on this solemn occasion: will
you conform to this our indispensable regulation also?
`Unless it comes too hot, Mr. Worshipful,' said the
rebuked
candidate, `that and all the rest on't.'
Deacon, said the Master, prepare the candidate for
the sublime mysteries of Masonry, and let him take heed to
curb his unruly member, for if he swears during the
ceremonies
,
it will be necessary to stop and go over with
every
thing again. So saying, he left the room.
The candidate was now stripped to his shirt,
blindfolded
,
and, to guard against any rising of a refractory spirit,
his hands strongly tied behind him. Thus prepared, he
was led to the door of the initiating room, when, after the
customary raps within and without, he was admitted, and
stationed on one side of the door. There the Master and
his men, all masked and duly aproned, stood arranged
round the room in a circle, some holding old tin pails, some
brass kettles, some loaded pistols, and one an old drum.
The Master now stepped forward and said, Brother,
you are now in the sanctorum totororum of Solomon's
temple
,
but you are not yet invested with the secrets of
Masonry
,
nor do I know whether you ever will be, till I know
how you withstand the amazing trials and dangers that
await youtrials, the like of which, none but our Grand
Master, Hiram Abiff, ever experienced. Saying this, he
turned to the man stationed as Warden at the south gate,
and exclaimed,
Now Jubelo! now Jubelo!
Be ready with your first dread wo,
Which those who'd win must never shun,
So now for Number One!
These words were no sooner uttered than whang! went
an old horse-pistol, followed by such a tremendous din from
the rattling of old tin pails, brass kettles, and drum, as
made the house ring again, and the poor candidate shook
in every joint like a man in an ague fit. All was soon still,
however; and an open pan filled with hot embers, with a
grid-iron over it, was now placed on the floor; when four
of the acting brethren, taking the candidate by the arms
and legs, held him over the pan, and gradually lowered him
down till his seat touched the grid-iron, which in the mean
while had become somewhat too warm for parts of so
sensitive
a nature; for they no sooner came in contact with
the iron than the candidate floundered and leaped from the
arms of the brethren, exclaiming, Zounds and fury! do
ye want to scorch a fellow's t'other end off? I will wait till
h-ll is burnt down before I'll be a Mason, if this is the
way! The spell is broken, cried the Master, the
candidate has uttered unseemly and profane language;
and the ceremony must be repeated.It is necessary he
should feel the torture before he can be permitted to
behold
the glorious light of Masonry. They then took the
struggling candidate in hand again, and by dint of coaxing,
induced him to submit himself once more to the fiery
ordeal
of masonic purification. But, alas! this attempt was
attended with no happier results than the other; for, on
touching the grid-iron, his old habit (I regret to say it)
again beset him, and bounding like a parched pea, he once
more broke out into the most unmasonic expressions. The
ceremony of course had to be yet again repeated; and it
was not till the fourth trial that he was brought to the use
of such exclamations as were adjudged not inconsistent
with the rule adopted on the occasion. This part of the
ceremony being concluded, the candidate was put in
motion
on his journey round the lodge-room; and when, as
they approached the Warden at the west gate, the
Worshipful
Master stepped forth and exclaimed,
O Jubela! O Jubela!
The man you wanted here survey
Approaching for the second wo!
So now for Number Two!
In an instant two pistols were let off in rapid succession,
and the mingled din of pails, kettles, drum, and the shouts
of the brethren were still louder than before on the
stunned
ears of the affrighted candidate, who at the same time
received the usual blow from the acting Jubela of the
performance
;
nor was this all or the worst part of Number
Two, which he was doomed to encounter: For after the
noise had ceased, he was again taken in hand.His last
remaining garment was now stripped off, and he was
placed
on his hands and knees on the floor, with his rearwards
pointed due west, to symbolize the winds, doubtless, that
after the deluge, wafted the glorious art westward, till it
at length reached our own favored hemisphere. As soon
as the candidate's position was duly adjusted in this
manner
,
the Deacon, stationed and prepared for the purpose,
dashed a full pail of cold water directly on the premises
that had just suffered so cruelly from an opposite element,
(these being the parts for which Masonry is supposed to
entertain
a particular predilection.) Starting from the shock,
the poor candidate leaped, howling like a shot mastiff, to
the wall, and gave vent to his feelings in some of those
unmasonic
exclamations which had already cost him so much
to subdue. This, according to the rigid rules of the
Worshipful
Master, led to a repetition of the watery wo, till the
hapless victim of this mystic deluge, sighing and gasping
for breath like a drowning puppy, became so subdued by
the water-cooling process, that he most piteously begged
for mercy;when the rule, though violated to the last
drenching, was graciously dispensed with. The candidate
was then rubbed down with a cloth, and dressed in all his
clothesstill, however, remaining blindfolded. He was
then led up to the old drum, placed in the middle of the
floor to serve for an altar, when, being made to kneel beside
it, an old copy of Gulliver's Travels was duly placed under
his hands and properly adjusted on the drum-head: After
which, he was made to repeat, while the Worshipful
Master
administered, the following obligation:
You solemnly swear, that you will never divulge the
mighty secret which has been, and is about to be revealed
to you. You swear without equivocation, hesitation,
mental
reservation, or explanation, that you will never tell,
spell, sell, hint, print or squint it, nor the same ever write,
indict, or recite, whatever your plight, whether placed
under
locks, put in the stocks, or reduced to starvation. In
short, you swear never to reveal these, the great mysteries
of Masonry, which are equalled only in truth and wisdom
by the wonderful Book on which you swear to preserve
them. You sacredly and solemnly swear ityou swear it
singly, you swear it doubly and treblyyou swear it up hill
and down hill, forward and backward, slanting and
perpendicular
,
side-ways, end-ways, and all waysyou swear it
by your eyes, nose, mouth, ears, tongue, gizzard and
grunnet
,yea,
by every part, piece, portion and parcel of your
body, singed or unsinged, washed or unwashedyou swear
it by the sun, moon, stars, earth, fire, water, snow, rain,
hail, wind, storm, lightning and thunder.All this, by all
these, you swear, under no less penalty than to be drawn,
naked and tail foremost, forty-nine times through dry
crabtree
fencesbe shut up a month in a den of skunks,
hedgehogs
and rattlesnakes, with clam-shells and vinegar for
your only food and drinkrun fourteen miles barefoot in
January, and be tarred and feathered and kicked and
cowskinned
from Mugwump to Passamaquoddy and back again.
So help you Nebuchadnezzar and St. Nicholas, and keep
you steadfast in the same. So mote it beso mote it be.
Amen.
After this oath was administered, the candidate was
ordered
to rise, and proceed to the east gate of the temple,
when the Master once more proclaimed
O Jubelum! O Jubelum!
The third and last wo now must come,
Before the light reveal'd can be!
So now for Number Three!
On which Jubelum, or the Warden of this station, who
stood prepared for the emergency, with an old saddle-pad
in his uplifted hand, gave the candidate such a blow on
the side of the head, as sent him reeling across the room;
while at the same instant, whang! whang! bang! went
three pistols, with the old accompaniment of jangling
instruments
,
now tasked to their utmost for noise and racket,
together with the falling of blocks, kicking over of chairs,
and the deafening cheers of the company. The bandage
had been snatched from the eyes of the candidate in the
confusion, and he now stood bewildered, stunned and
aghast amidst the tumult, staring wildly on the strange,
masked figures around him, scarcely knowing where he
was, or which end he stood on. But being of that happy
temperament on which nothing less than dry knocks and
actual applications of fire and water make any very
alarming
impressions, all of which being now over, he soon
recovered
in a good degree his self-possession. The Master
then proceeded to instruct and lecture him as follows:
Brother, I greet you: You are now a free and
acceped
Mason. You have now received the principal
mysteries
of the first degrees of Masonry. In your trials by fire
and water, you represented in the one case, Grand Master
Lot, and in the other Grand Master Noah, who both
outlived
the two devouring elements that respectively
threatened
them, and were more honored than all the multitudes
that perished by the fire and the flood. And in the third
wo you represented Old Adam, who, as traditions known
only to the craft inform us, was at first only a shapeless mass
of clay, which, becoming accidentally disengaged from the
top of a high hill, rolled down, and was thus reduced to
something like human shape, but was still senseless and
dark, till, like yourself in the last trial, it was knocked
into
the light of existence by a blow from some unseen hand.
But let me now instruct you in some of the arts of our
illustrious
order. There are the square and compass, he
continued, producing a common iron square and compass.
By the square you must square your actions towards your
masonic brethrenthough as to all others, the dl take
the hindmost. By this also you are taught to move
squarely
,
or in right lines and directly in all your comings and
goings, except in going from a lodge meeting, when the
rule does not always apply. And here is the compass: By
this you are taught to divide out your favors to your
brethren
,
and draw such circles as shall endow them and them
only for your charities. By this also you are taught the
B
art of making a new centre with one foot of the compass,
und thus drawing a new circle when the old one fails to
enclose the right number of friends, or otherwise does not
answer your purpose: This is called
pricking anew
. These
are the great emblems of Masonry, and they are full of
wisdom and profit, brother; for there is scarce an act
which a Mason may perform that cannot be satisfactorily
measured and squared by them, which could never be done
perhaps by the rules of the vulgar.
Now for the signs and tokens.If you would wish to
discover whether any one is a Mason for the purpose of
requiring his assistance, you must bring your right hand
to the rear, where you have just received the mark of
Masonry
;
and at the same time put the little finger of your
left hand in your mouth, and
vice versa
. This is the sign
by which one Mason may know another: Make this, and
a brother seeing it, is bound to help you, vote for you, and
do what you require. Thus you see, brother, the value
and advantage of our glorious art. And now, having
finished
my instructions, I pronounce you a good, well-made,
and worthy Mason.
The lectures being now finished, the lodge was closed,
and spirits and other refreshments brought in, when all
hands, after saluting brother Peacock with the most
flattering
greetings, sat down to the cheer; and long and
merrily did the joke and bottle pass in honor of that
memorable
evening.
Not a little elated were the feelings of Mr. Peacock,
when he awoke the next morning, by the proud
consciousness
of his newly acquired dignity. Though it must be
confessed that these feelings were subjected to no small
draw-back, in consequence of a certain soreness
experienced
about those parts which had been more immediately
exposed to the visitation of Masonic honors. But the
skillful
applications of his loving partner soon relieved him of
troubles of this kind, except scars which remained as
lasting
mementoes of his honorable service. He often spoke
in praise of Masonry, and enlarged in admiration on its
mysterious sublimities, which he likened to the terrors of
a thunder storm, in which fire, water and thunder came
mingling together in awful grandeur. Nor was he less
impressed
with the opinion of the advantages of the art. He
was heard to say, that he would not take his best horse for
the secret. So highly indeed did he estimate the value
of this exalted mystery, that he firmly resolved that his
expected
son should one day become a Mason.His
expected
son! But that important subject demands a new chapter.
CHAPTER II.
Fer opem, Lucina.
The
17th of April, 1790, was the day made
memorable
in the annals of American Masonry, by the birth of our
hero,
Timothy Peacock
. The seal of future greatness
having been stamped by destiny on the brow of the
infantile
Timothy, it is no marvel, therefore, that many incidents
of a peculiarly singular and ominous character marked his
birth and childhood. The day on which he was born,
being
the very day that terminated the earthly career of the
illustrious Franklin, was of itself a circumstance worthy of
particular notice; and it operated with much force on the
astute mind of his doating father, who, being a firm
believer
in the doctrine of transmigration of souls, had a deep
impression that the spirit of the departed philosopher had
taken up its residence in his infant son. Again, a very
remarkable
potato had grown in Mr. Peacock's garden the
previous season. This singular vegetable, which had grown
in the form of an accute triangle, or a pair of open dividers,
had been hung up in the cellar the fall before, as nothing
more than a mere natural curiosity; but the moment Mr.
Peacock cast his eyes upon it, a few days after the birth of
Timothy, he instantly became sensible that things of far
deeper import were involved in the formation of this
mysterious
production; and the truth, with intuitive rapidity,
at once flashed across his mind: It was the well-known
masonic emblem, the compass, and an undoubted omen
that his house was about to be honored with a human
production
that was to become distinguished in the mysteries
of that art thus strikingly designated. But these
conclusions
of Mr. Peacock, as well warranted as they were by
that remarkable omen, were confirmed by a fact that he
conceived could admit of no cavil or speculation. The
child came into the world with the mark of a grid-iron
clearly and palpably impressed, and that too, on those very
parts which he knew, from experience, masonry
particularly
delighted to honor. I am aware that there are many
among the would-be medico-philosophers of the present
day, who would perhaps attribute the existence of this
striking
mark upon the infant, to the imagination of the
mother
,
whose kind assiduities, as I have before intimated, had
been put in requisition a few months before, on the
occasion
of her husband's initiation into the secrets of
Masonsonry
;
but in reply to such conceited opinionists, I need
only observe, that facts can never be outweighed by
visionary
speculations; and it was upon facts such as I have
related, that Mr. Peacock founded his prophetic belief that
his son was destined to future excellence, and that this
excellence was to be more especially conspicuous in the
path of masonic honors. Nor were the signs of future
intellect
at all wanting still further to confirm and justify his
parents in the opinion they had formed of his brilliant
destiny
.
Such indeed was the child's mental precocity, that
new fears began to take possession of Mrs. Peacock, lest
his extraordinary forwardness might be the forerunner of
premature decay. But happily for the interests of
Masonry
,
these maternal fears were never realized. The boy
grew apace in body and mind. Before he was eight years
old, he had nearly mastered all the intricacies of the
English
alphabet; and such was his progress in natural
history
,
as illustrated in his horn book, that before he was ten
he could readily tell the picture of a hog from that of a
horse without any prompting or assistance whatever. Such
wonders indeed may have since been witnessed under the
system of infant schools lately brought into vogue, but it
must be recollected that our hero at that day was deprived
of the advantages of that incomparable method of hot-bed
instruction. Mrs. Peacock, when viewing this
unparalelled
improvement of her darling son, would often heave a
sigh of regret that she was doomed to bring up a child of
such promise in this
publican
land, as she termed it, where
he could never become a lord or a lord's gentleman, or
wear any of those great titles to which his abilities would
doubtless raise him in England. But Mr. Peacock was
wont to soothe her grief on these occasions by suggesting
that Timothy might, and unquestionably would, become a
great Mason, and thus acquire all the grand titles of this
order, which was no doubt introduced into this country as
the only way of conferring titles and distinctions in this
land of
ragamuffinous dimecrats
.
It was reflections like these, probably, that operated on
Mr. Peacock about this time, and rendered him unusually
anxious to advance still further himself in the higher
degrees
of Masonry, in which, as yet, he had made no other
progress than that which we have already described in the
preceding chapter. Botherworth had been applied to for
this purpose, but that gentleman informed Mr. Peacock that
he had already imparted all that was useful or instructive
in all the degrees which he himself had taken, and that
whoever wished for any more of the mystery, must obtain
it from a regular lodge in which it could alone be
conferred
.
Mr. Peacock accordingly made application to
sundry
Masons to obtain their intercession with the lodge in
his behalf, but these applications, though backed by a
frequent
use of those signs and tokens which Botherworth had
told him were so omnipotent, were never heeded, and all
his attempts therefore to gratify his ambition in this line
of preferment were entirely fruitless. This was a source
of great mortification as well as of much perplexity to Mr.
Peacock, who could by no means satisfactorily account in
his own mind for these unexpected failures after having
B*
made so much progress in the art. He sometimes began
to entertain serious doubts whether he had been properly
initiated, and whether his masonry was of the legitimate
kind. And in this, perhaps, he may be joined by some of
my masonic readers. I cannot think, however, that these
scruples of Mr. Peacock were well-grounded: At least, I
do not consider that he had reason to complain of any
injustice
done him by the Worshipful Master, who initiated
him, in withholding any useful masonic knowledge; for if
he did not impart all those secrets, or perform in strictness
all the ceremonies usual on such occasions, he substituted
as many others as were a fair equivalent, and those too of a
character which would not derogate from the decency or
dignity of a legitimate initiation. But to return from this
digression: Mr. Peacock finally gave up his doubts
respecting
the genuineness of his masonry, and attributed his want
of success to the circumstance of his being a foreigner,
which he supposed was sufficient to awaken the envy and
provoke the hostility of even the fraternity in this land of
titulary barrenness. This, however, was a disability to
which his son would not be subject, and he concluded
therefore to centre his hopes on Timothy for distinguishing
his family by the reflected honors of that illustrious order.
Accordingly he early endeavored to impress his young mind
with reverence to the institution, and for that purpose had
a little apron made for the boy, beautifully over-wrought
with masonic emblems. His dog was named
Jubelo
, his
cat
Jubela
, and his pet-lamb
Jubelum
. And thus, by
keeping
these rudiments of mystic knowledge continually before
his youthful mind, those impressions were doubtless
implanted
,
to which may be attributed the subsequent
direction
of mental energies that raised our hero to such a
pinnacle
of glory on the ladder of Jacob.
But as it may not be interesting to the reader to follow
my hero through a minute detail of his various
improvements
to the completion of his education, I shall pass
lightly
over this period of his life, and content myself with
observing
that his progress in science, literature, and all the
various branches of knowledge which he attempted, fully
made good the promise of his childhood at the age when,
as before mentioned, he accomplished his abecedarian
triumph
.
It may be proper, however, here to notice one
prevailing
taste which he early manifested in the course of his
education: This was a strong predilection for the study and
exercise of the art of oratory, and that part of it more
especially
which, seeking the most dignified and sonorous
expressions
,
constitutes what is called the Ciceronian flow.
So high, indeed, was the standard of his taste in this
particular
,
that he rarely condescended, when he attempted
any thing like a display of his powers, to use any words,
(except the necessary adjuncts and connectives) short of
polysyllables.And these, with the intuitive quickness of
genius, he at once seized upon and appropriated to his use,
selecting them from the great mass of those undignified
cumberers of our language, monosyllables, by the same rule
by which the acute farmer, in purchasing his scythe or his
cauldron, or by which, in selecting his seed potatoes from
his ample bin, he is accustomed to make choice of the
largest
and the longest. It was this trait, probably, in the
intellectual
character of our herothis gift, so peculiarly
adapted to give expression to the lofty dictums of masonic
philosophy, that contributed mainly in rearing him to that
eminence among the fraternity for which he was afterwards
so conspicuous.
But these juvenile years flew rapidly away, and time
rolling
on, and bringing about many other events of moment
to the world, brought also our hero to the age of
twenty-one
,that
important period which so often gives a turn to
our destinics for life. It did so to Timothy. Mr. Peacock,
who had long deliberated on the course of life most
advantageous
for his son to pursue, at last concluded, as he had
no employment suitable for one of his genius at home, to
send him abroad to seek his fortune. And although he
could furnish but a small allowance of the needful for such
an enterprize, his means having been sadly impaired of late
years, not only in the education of Timothy, who had been
sent one quarter to a neighboring academy by way of
adding
the finishing polish to his acquirements, but by the
heavy drafts of Mrs. Peacock on the bar-box of the
Doggery
for the support of her show of the family dignity, yet he
had little doubt but Timothy's talents and education would
command for him both emolument and honor. This course
having been once settled and confirmed by all parties in
interest, arrangements were soon completed for his
departure
.
The important day fixed on for this purpose at length
arrived; and our hero having buckled on his pack for his
pedestrian excursion, went to receive the adieus and
blessings
of his parents before leaving their kind roof for the
broad theatre of the world, when Mr. Peacock, with the
characteristic frankness of the high-minded English, thus
addressed him:
As you are now about to go abroad into the world, in
the first place, remember, my son, that all men are
scoundrels
by nature, and especially in this country of dogs and
dimecrats
. But you have an Englishman's blood beneath
your hide, which should make you hold up your head in
any country. But blood, I know, won't do every thing for
you without tallow; and as I have but little of the solid
lucre to give you, why, you must cut and carve out a fortune
for yourself. They will tell you that this
rippublercan
government
is the best in the world; but they lie as fast as a
dog will trot, except the fast trotting dogs. I see nothing
here that compares with England, but masonry, which you
must join as soon as you get settled, as I have often told
you; then you will have titles that the
dimecrats
can't get
away from you, do what they will. Then go, my son,
and become a great man, and do something in the world
that will make your ancestors proud of you till the last day
of eternity, so mote it be, amen and good by to ye.
CHAPTER III.
'Tis a rough land of rock, and stone, and tree,
Where breathes no castled lord nor cabined slave;
Where thoughts, and hands, and tongues are free,
And friends will find a welcomefoes a grave.
It
was a pleasant morning in the month of May, when
our hero shouldered his well-stored knapsack, and, with
the blessings of his father and mother on his head, and
their meagre outfit in his pocket, went forth into the wide
world to seek his fortune wherever he might find it.
Such was the obscure and lowly beginning of the
renowned
hero of Mugwump!Such the inauspicious and
rayless rising of that masonic star which was destined soon
to mount the mystic zenith, and irradiate the whole
canopy
of America with its peerless effulgence! But not
wishing
to anticipate his subsequent distinction, or waste words
in bestowing that panegyric which a bare recital of his
deeds cannot but sufficiently proclaim, I shall endeavor to
follow my hero through the bright mazes of his eventful
career, giving an unvarnished narration of his exploits, and
leaving them to speak their own praise and receive from
an unbiassed posterity, if not from this perverse and
unmasonic
generation, the meed of unperishable honor.
Steering his course westward, Timothy arrived at the
end of his first day's walk at a little village within the
borders
of Massachusetts. Here he put up at a respectable
looking tavern for the night. After a good substantial
supper had somewhat settled the inquietudes of the inner
man, he began to cast about him for companionship; and
hearing those who came in address the landlord by the
various
titles of 'Squire, Colonel, &c., and concluding
therefore
that the man must be the principal personage of the
village, he determined to have some conversation with
him, and this for two reasons,first, because he wished to
make enquiries respecting the road to the State of New
York, to which it had been settled he should proceed as a
place well suited to give full scope to his splendid talents,
and, secondly, because he thought it doing the landlord
injustice to suffer him to remain any longer in ignorance
of the great Genius with whose presence his house was now
honored. He therefore opened the conversation in a
manner
which he deemed suitable to the occasion.
Landlord, said he, comprehending you to be a man
of superlative exactitude, I take the present opportunity
for making a few nocturnal enquiries.
`Oh, yes; yes, Sir,' replied the landlord, with a bow at
every repetition; `yes, Sir, I thank you,may ben't,
however
,
I don't exactly understand your tarms; but I'll
answer
your enquiries in the shake of a sheep's-tail.'
I am now, rejoined the former, meandering my
longitude
to the great State of New-York, where I
contemplate
the lucid occupation of juvenile instruction, or some
other political aggrandizement, and I would more
explicitly
direct my enquiries respecting the best road to that
sequestered
dominion.
`Oh, yes, yes Sir, I thank you,' said the other
speaking
of political mattersI have had some experience in that
line, and about the road too; why, let me seeit is just four
year agone coming June, since I went representative to the
General Court in Boston.They would make me go to the
Legislature, you see.Well, my speech on the Road Bill
of that session as to the best rout to New-York; but may
ben't you havn't read my speech.Well, no matter.But,
my friend, don't you miss it to go to New-York? Now I'll
tell you jest what I would do: I would go right to Old
Varmount at once.They are all desput ignerant folks
there.They must want a man of your larnen shockingly I
guess.Now spose you jest think on't a little.'
Should you advise me then, observed Timothy,
happy
in perceiving his talents were beginning to be
appreciated
by the landlord, should you advise me to
concentrate
to that dispensation?
`Go there, do you mean?' replied the polished
ex-representative
`why,
to be sure I should.These poor
out-of-the-world
people must be dreadfully sunk. You wouldn't
find any body there that could hold a candle to you: and
besides teaching, which you are a person I conclude every
way fitting for it, I shouldn't wonder if you got to be
governer
in two year.'
Much did Timothy, on retiring to rest, revolve in mind
the advice of the sage landlord. He could not but admit
that the argument for going to Vermont was a very
forcible
one, and coming as it did from so candid a man, and
one who had been a representative to the legislature, it
seemed entitled to great weight;so after mature
deliberation
,
he concluded to follow the 'Squire's enlightened
suggestionsgo to Vermont, become a chief teacher of the
poor barbarians of that wild country, till such time as they
should make him their governor.
The next morning Timothy rose early, and under the
fresh impulse of his late resolution, eagerly resumed his
journey.
Nothing worthy particular notice occurred to our hero
during the three next succeeding days of his pilgrimage
for fame and fortune. Untroubled by any of those doubts
and fears of the future which so often prove troublesome
attendants to minds of a different mould, he pressed on in
the happy consciousness that merit like his must soon reap
its adequate reward. Emoluments and civil distinctions
would await him as matters of course, but an object of a
higher character more deeply engrossed his mind, and
formed the grateful theme of his loftiest aspirations. This
was the sublime mysteries of Masonry; and to the
attainment
of its glorious laurels he looked forward with a sort
of prophetic rapture as a distinction which was to cap the
climax of his renown and greatness.
With such bright anticipations of the future beguiling
many a lonely hour, and shortening many a weary mile,
he arrived at the eastern bank of the beautiful
Connecticut
that
river of which the now almost forgotten Barlow
sings or says with as much truth as felicity of expression
No watery gleams through happier vallies shine,
Nor drinks the sea a lovelier wave than thine.
Fearlessly passing this Rubicon, for such it was to one of
his preconceived notions of the country beyond, supposing,
as he did, its eastern borders to be the very
Ultima Thule
of civilization, Timothy found himself, as a certain
literary
dandy, who is now receiving
Impressions
among the
naked Venuses of Italy, has been pleased to express it,
out of the world and in Vermont
.
Vermont! Ah, Vermont! calumniator of the
heaven-born
Handmaid! How the mind of every true brother
sickens
at thy degenerate name!How deeply deplores thy
fallen condition!How regrets and pities thy blindness
to that light which, but for thy perverseness, might still
have gloriously illuminated thy mountains, and soon have
shone the ascendant in all thy political gatherings, thy
halls of legislation and thy courts of justiceoverpowering
in each the feebler rays of uninitiated wisdom, and filling
them with the splendors of mystic knowledge! What
unholy
frenzy could have seized thy irreverent sons thus to
lay their Gothlike hands on the sacred pillars of that
consecrated
fabric, in which we behold accomplished the
magnificent
object for which the less favored projectors of
ancient
Babel labored in vain,the construction of a tower
reaching from earth to heaven, by which the faithful,
according
to the assurance of their wise ones,
Hope with good conscience to heaven to climb,
And give Peter the grip, the pass-word and sign!
What high-handed presumption, thus to assail that
institution
which, as its own historians, as learned as the Thebans
and as infallible as the Pope, have repeatedly informed us,
commenced in Eden, (whether before or after the
gentleman
with the blemished foot made his appearance in the
garden, they have not mentioned,) and which has since
continued, from age to age, advancing in greatness and
glory, till it has at length arrived at the astonishing
excellence
of
nineteen degrees above perfection!
What blind
infatuation
and unappreciating stupidity, thus to pursue with
obloquy and proscription that heaven-gifted fraternity,
who are, we are again informed, so immeasurably exalted
above the grovelling mass of the uninitiated, that,
As men from brutes, distinguished are,
A Mason other men excels!
No wonder this daughter of heaven is indignant at thy
ungrateful rebellion to her celestial rule! No wonder her
Royal Arch sons of light mourn in sackcloth and ashes
over thy disgrace! No wonder her yet loyal and
chivalrous
Templars are so anxious to see thy
lost character
redeemed
!
[1]
[1]
The expression of Hon. Ezra Meech, a Knight Templar Mason, in a letter
written
by him to certain gentlemen in Windsor County, after his nomination by the
Jackson
and National Republican parties, as a candidate for Governor, in opposition to
the Anti-Masons.
But from this vain lament over a country once honored
and blestby that glorious Light she has since so blindly
strove to extinguishover a country once happy and
unsuspected
in her fealty to those who, like the
sun-descended
Incas, are thus endowed with the peculiar right to
govern
the undistinguished multitudeover a land thus
favored
,
but now, alas! forever fallen, and become a by-word
and reproach among her sister stateslet us return to those
halcyon days of her obedience in which transpired those
brilliant adventures which it has become our pleasing task
to delineate.
After crossing the river, our hero entered a thriving
village
situated around those picturesque falls where this
magnificent
stream, meeting a rocky barrier, and, as if
maddened
at the unexpected interruption after so long a course of
tranquil meanderings, suddenly throws itself, with
collected
strength, headlong down through the steep and
yawning
chasm beneath, with the delirious desperation of some
giant maniac hurling himself from a precipice.
After a brief stay at this place, which, to his surprise,
wore the marks of considerable civilization, and which he
concluded therefore must be the strong out-post of the
frontier
,
and the largest town of the Green-Mountain
settlement
,
he pushed boldly into the interior. Taking a road
leading north-westerly, with a view of passing through the
C
mountains into some of the western counties of the state,
which he had been told comprised the best part of Vermont,
he travelled on several hours with increasing wonder in
finding the country cultivated like other places he had
been accustomed to seethe farm-houses comfortable,
and not made of logs; and the inhabitants much like
other
people in appearance. In pondering on these, to him
unaccountable circumstances, as he diligently pursued his
way through a variety of scenery which was continually
arresting his attention, he wholly forgot to acquaint
himself
with the relative distances of the houses of public
entertainment
on the road. At length, however, the setting
sun, slowly sinking behind the long range of
Green-Mountains
,
which now, with broad empurpled sides, lay looming
in the distance, reminded him of his inadvertence, and
warned him that he must speedily seek out a lodging for
the night. But now no inn, or, indeed, any other
habitation
was in sight; and to add to his perplexity the road
became more woody, and he was now evidently
approaching
a wilder part of the country. Undismayed, however,
he pressed onward with a quickened pace, and after
travelling
some distance he came to a small farm-house.
Determined
to make application for a night's lodging at this
cottage, as it was now nearly dark, he approached it and
rapped for admittance. The rap was instantly answered
from within, and at the same time a host of white-headed
urchins crowded to the door, headed by the house-cur,
yelping at the very top of his cracked voice. Presently,
however, the owner of this goodly brood made his
appearance
,
loudly vociferating, Fraction! get out, get out,
you saucy scamp! you have no more manners than a
sophomore
in vacation.Number One, take a stick and baste the
dog to his heart's content; and you, Number Two, Three,
and the rest of ye, to your seats in a moment! After
thus stilling the commotion around him, the farmer
cordially
invited Timothy into the house, where the latter was
soon made welcome for the night to such fare as the house
afforded. As soon as the common-place remarks usual on
such occasions were a little over, our hero, whose curiosity
was considerably excited by the specimen of
Green-Mountain
manners which this family presented, began to make
his observations with more minuteness; and taking what
he here saw, as many other learned travellers in a strange
country have done, for a fair sample of the rest of the
inhabitants
,
he could not but marvel much on the
singularity
of this people. Every thing about the house exhibited
a strange mingling of poverty, and what he had been taught
to believe could only be the results of some degree of
affluence
.
The family appeared to be in possession of the
substantials of living in abundance, and yet rough benches
were about their only substitute for chairs: Indeed, the
usual conveniences of furniture were almost wholly
wanting
.Again,
there were two or three kinds of newspapers
in the room, one of which two of the boys, each as ragged
as a young Lazarus, were reading together by fire-light,
with one hand holding up the tattered nether garments,
and the other grasping a side of the sheet whose contents
they seemed to devour with the eagerness of a young
candidate
for Congress on the eve of an election,
occasionally
making their sage comments, till one, coming to some
partisan prediction or political philippic with which the
newspapers at that period were teeming, suddenly let go
the paper and exclaimed, Hurra for Madison and the
Democrats! Dad, we shall have a war, and I'll go and fight
the British!while, so will I! and I too!
responded
several of the younger boys, starting up, and
brandishing
their sturdy little fists. While these tiny politicians
were thus settling the destinies of the nation, an embryo
Congress-member, the oldest boy, or Number One, (as his
father called him) a lad of about fifteen, lay quietly on his
back, with his head to the fire, studying a Greek Grammar,
and furnishing himself with light by once in a while
throwing
on a pine knot, a pile of which he had collected and
laid by his side for the purpose.
[2]
[2]
Allusion is doubtless here made to the starting career of a distinguished member
of Congress from Vermont, now deceased, who is said to have commenced his
classical
studies under the auspices, and in the manner here described.
Editor
.
These circumstances,
particularly the latter, filled our hero with surprise, and he
asked the farmer how he `contrivified,' in a place with no
more `alliances for edifercation,' to bring his boys to such
a `length of perfecticability' as to be studying Greek? To
this the man replied, that they had a school in every
neighborhood
that furnished as many, and indeed more
advantages
than common scholars would improve; and he did not
suppose boys in any country, whatever might be said of its
advantages, could be very well taught much faster than
they could learn. As to his own boys, he did not consider
the smaller ones any great shakes at learning; but with
regard to Number One, it came so natural for him to learn,
that he did not believe the boy could help it. A college
school-master, he said, teaching in their school the year
before, had put the child agoing in the dead lingos and
lent him some books;since which, by digging along by
himself nights, rainy days, and so on, and reciting to the
minister, he had got so far that he thought of going to
college
another year, which he was welcome to do, if he could
`hoe his own row.'
Timothy then asked him the reason of his `designifying'
his children by such odd `appliances.' To this question,
also, the farmer (who was one of those compounds of
oddity
and shrewdness who have enough of the latter quality
to be able to give a good reason for the same) had his ready
answer, which he gave by saying, that he never gave names
to any of his children, for he thought that his method of
numbering them as they came, and so calling them by their
respective numbers, altogether preferable to giving them
the modern fashionable double or treble names; because
it furnished brief and handy names by which to call his
children, and possessed the additional advantage of giving
every body to understand their comparative ages, which
names could never do; besides, there could be no danger
of exhausting the numeral appellatives, which the other
course, in this respect, was not without risk in the
Green-Mountains
;
[3]
[3]
The following anecdote probably refers to some of the neighbors of the above
mentioned individual. A boy being asked his name, replied that he had none. The
reason being asked, he said his father was so poor he could not afford him one.
Ed.
though as to himself, he said he did not know
that he ought to feel under any great apprehensions of
running
out the stock of names, as he had as yet but
seventeen
children, though to be sure he had not been married
only about fifteen years.
Our hero now retired to rest for the night, and, after a
sound sleep, rose the next morning to resume his journey,
when to his great joy a waggoner came along and kindly
gave him a passage over the mountains, landing him at
night at an inn in the open country several miles to the
west of them.
CHAPTER IV.
Thirty days hath September,
April, June and November,
All the rest have thirty-one
But February alone.
The
above, reader, I consider the best verse of poetry
of modern production: the best, because the most useful,
that has been given to the world by the whole tribe of
poets
of the present century, whether born or made so, from
Byron, intellectual giant of lofty imaginings, down to N. P.
Willis, puny prince of poetical puppyism. Don't stare so:
I am in earnest; and make my appeal, not to finical
critics
,
but to the great mass of the people, learned and
unlearned
,
for a confirmation of my opinion. What man,
woman or child, in their daily reckoning of the days in the
different months, for the calculations of business, profit or
pleasure, does not instantly recur to this verse, which is
fixed in the memory of all, or a majority of all, who speak
the English language, as the readiest way of ascertaining
at once what would otherwise require a considerable
exertion
of the memory, or perhaps an inconvenient recurrence
to the almanac to determine. And what is modern
poetry
?what
is its real utility, and what are its effects?
Metal
refined to drossa crazy man's dreamsa combination
of vague, mystified, and unmeaning imagery, containing
C *
scarcely one natural simileone sensible thought, or one
sound maxim of moral instruction; and calculated only to
enervate and undiscipline the mind, without bettering the
heart by awakening one commendable sensibility or by
fostering
one virtue. Such at least is too much the character
of the productions of our mistaken poets. The above lines,
however, are obviously an exception to these remarks; and
thus viewing them, I thought I would quote them in
compliance
with the custom of heading chapters with a
catch of poetry; and as to their applicability to the
subject matter of the chapter over which they are
placed
,
I have little fear of violating the precedents of
many
of my superiors in authorship.
I left my hero, lodged for the night in a tavern situated
in a town some miles west of the Green-Mountains. This
town, as he found on enquiry, contained a village of
considerable
size lying about three miles distant from the
tavern
of which he was then an inmate. After a night's
self-consultation
,
Timothy concluded he would make his debut
in this village without further wanderings. Whether he
came to this determination just at this time, because he
considered it a public duty to try to enlighten the
inhabitants
of this particular town, or whether the diminished
gravity of his purse admonished him that he could not
proceed any farther without replenishing it, is a matter of
no consequence; but certain it is, he was now making an
inroad on his last guinea.
I mention these trifling circumstances, because I am
aware that even trifles become invested with interest and
importance when connected with subsequent greatness.
Timothy was informed by the landlord that there was an
academy, or town school in the village, which having no
funds, was supported by subscription, and taught by such
preceptors as could, from time to time, be obtained; some
of whom instructed in the dead languages, and all the
classics
,
and some only in English branches, and that this
academy was at present destitute of a teacher. For this
station our hero now resolved to offer himself, not in the
least doubting his qualifications to instruct the children of
a people so rude and ignorant, as he had been taught in
his own country to believe the Vermonters. For this
purpose
he proceeded directly to the village, and calling on
one of the trustees or committee, who, he was told,
superintended
the hiring of instructors, promptly offered himself
for the vacant situation. The gentleman, as soon as he
was made to understand this proposal of Timothy, eyed its
author a moment with keen attentionthen took out his
spectacles, rubbed the glasses, put them on, and took a
second look, surveying from head to foot the goodly
dimensions
of the young six-footer before him, (our hero stood
just six feet high in his cowhides, reader,) his looks
seeming
to say, a sturdy fellow, truly! but does he look like
a preceptor? For a while he appeared puzzled what
answer
to make to Timothy. At last however he observed,
that perhaps they had better walk over to Esquire
Hawkeye's
office, as the Squire was also a committee-man, and
usually took the main management of the establishment.
Accordingly he led our hero to the office of the 'Squire,
and introduced him by observing, A gentleman, who
wishes to engage as teacher of our academy, 'Squire.I
always leave
cases of this kind
to
your
management, you
know, 'Squire, he added, with a kind of half grin. After
all the necessary introductory nods, &c. had been made
by the parties, the 'Squire, who was a lawyer, laid aside
the writs and executions which were ostentatiously
displayed
on the table before him, and proceeded to put a
few general questions to Timothy, who promptly answered
them in the way he thought best calculated to produce a
favorable impression of his abilities. The 'Squire listened
with great attention to every answer, rolling his tobacco
quid at the same time in his mouth with increased rapidity.
What say you, at length he said, addressing the man
who introduced Timothy, what say you, Deacon Bidwell,
shall we proceed to examine into the gentleman's
qualifications
,
or does he bring with him sufficient credentials?
The Deacon looked to Timothy for an answer to the last
question, but not receiving any, he observed, The 'Squire
means to ask you whether you have brought any
credentials
,
or letters of recommend with you. To this our
hero
,
conceiving the question implied a doubt of his
qualifitions
,
and feeling indignant that any doubts should be
entertained
of him by a people whom he considered so much
his inferiors, rather haughtily replied, that he never
carried
about with him such superfluous superfluities; and
that, if they were not already satisfied with his
blandishments
,
they might proceed to
invistigate
them. The
'Squire now rolled his quid faster than before. At this
moment, a little thin, sallow-faced, important-looking
fellow
came bustling in, who was saluted as Doctor Short,
and who was a no less important personage than the village
physician, and a third member of the august board who
were about to sit in judgement on the literary and
scientific
qualifications of our hero. The Doctor having been
informed
of what was on the carpet, and invited to take a
part in the examination, the 'Squire now observed,
Perhaps
we may as well proceed to
invistigate
the gentleman
a little, as he expresses it.So, I will propound a question
or two, with his leave:And in the first place, What is
grammar?
`That part of speech,' replied Timothy, with the utmost
promptitude, `which teaches us to express our ideas with
propriety and dispatch.'
How would you parse this sentence, said the 'Squire,
holding up in his hand an old book of forms,
This book
is worth a dollar?
`Pass!' replied Timothy, with a sneer, `pass it? why, I
should pass it as a very absurd incongruity, for the book
evidently is not worth half that sum!'
Ah, well, Sir, we will take another branch, said the
'Squire, in an apologetic toneWhat histories have you
read?
`Robinson Cruso, George Barnwell, Pilgrim's Progress,
Thaddeus of Warsaw, Indian Wars, Arabian Nights, the
account of the Great Gunpowder Plot, and a multitudinous
collection of others, too numerous to contemplate.'
At what time did the Gunpowder Plot take placehow,
and in what country?
`In England, in the dark ages of ancestry, when it blew
up the King, whose name was Darnley, into the
immeasurable
expanse of the celestial horizonshook the whole of
Europe, and was heard even into France and Scotland.'
What is Geography?
`It is a terraqueous description of the circumambular
globe.'
The gentleman really seems to answer the questions
with great promptitude, said the 'Squire, with
well-supported
gravity. Doctor, will you take your turn in a few
interrogatories?
The Doctor now assuming a wise look, and taking a new
pinch of snuff by way of sharpening his faculties for the
occasion
,
asked Timothy if he had ever studied the Latin
language.
Our hero hesitated; but thinking it would not do to be
thought deficient in any branch of education, and having
caught the signification of a few words from having heard
the recitations of a Latin scholar or two in a school which
he once for a short time attended, he concluded to risk the
consequence of giving an affirmative answer:
Accordingly
,
he told the Doctor that he did profess to know
something
about that language.
Well, then, said the Doctor, What is the English
meaning of this sentence
Varium et mutabile semper
femina
?
`Why,' replied Timothy, `it means, I opinionate, that
simpering females will mutiny without variety.'
Not so wide from the mark, by the shade of old Virgil!
said the other, laughing: but let us try anothera famous
quotation from Horace: it is this
Poeta nascitur, non fit?
`O, that is plain enough,' quickly replied our hero, `and
I agree with that Mr. Horacehe says that a nasty poet is
not fitthat is, not fit for any thing.'
The Doctor and 'Squire now laughed outrightthe
Deacon
looked round to see what was the matter, and smiled
faintly through sympathy, but said nothing. I will now,
said the Doctor, after having recovered from his fit of
merriment
,
I will now give you a sentence in prose, with
which you, being a teacher, will of course be familiar:
Bonus doctor custos populorum
.
`Why,' replied Timothy, with a look of mingled doubt
and wicked triumph glancing at the lean visage of the
other
,
`seeing you put it out to me, I will explanitate it: It
says and signifies, that bony doctors are a curse to the
people.'
The laugh was now against the Doctor, in which even
the Deacon joined heartily; while the somewhat
discomfited
object of the joke, after a few shrugs of the shoulders,
hastily proceeded to say,
Well, well, let us drop the Latin,other studies are
more important,let us take some of the higher branchos
of English education. What, Sir, is Chemistry?
`Chemistry!' said our hero, `why, that I take to be one
of your physical propensities which has nothing to do with
education.'
Well, then, said the Doctor, we will take a view of
the higher branches of Mathematicsalgebraical,
geometrical
or trigonometrical principles, if you please.
But Timothy, thinking he had answered enough of their
impertinent questions, replied, that `as to algymetry and
trygrimetry, and such other invented abstrusities,' he
considered
too insignificant to monopolize his internal
consideration
:
He therefore wished them to tell him at once
whether or not they would employ him. This unexpected
request rather disconcerted the learned trio, and they
appeared
much at a loss what to say. After some shuffling
of feet, spitting and looking down upon the floor, the
Deacon
and Doctor both turned their eyes imploringly on the
'Squire, as much as to say, you must be the man to smooth
the answer as well as you can.
The 'Squire then told Timothy, that they were not
exactly
prepared at present to give any answer. But our
hero
was not to be put off in this manner, and desired to know
when they would be ready to answer him. The 'Squire
replied
that it was extremely difficult to tell, but if at any
time hence they should wish to employ him, they would
send him word. Timothy, however, was determined to
bring them to something definite, and therefore insisted on
their naming a day when they would let him know their
decision. On this, the 'Squire finding himself likely to be
baffled in his plan of indefinite postponement, as the
legislators
say, very gravely proposed that Timothy should call
in one year from that day, at half past four o'clock in the
afternoon, precisely, when he should have the answer which
he so much desired.
Our hero hearing this strange proposition, and observing
them exchange sundry winks, instantly rose, and, with
becoming
indignation declaring that he had no sort of desire
to enter the employment of men too ignorant to
appreciate
his talents, abruptly left the office. Pausing not a
moment
to look either to the right or left, he strode on with
rapid steps till he was fairly out of the village; when he
turned round and gave vent to his smothered resentment
in a torrent of anathemas against those conceited and
impudent
fellows, who, with such astonishing stupidity, had
failed to discover his capacities in an examination in which
he had, in his own opinion, acquitted himself so
honorably
.
But he was now clear of them, and he determined to
trouble them no more. Indeed, he began now to
entertain
a contemptible opinion of school-keeping altogether,
and he therefore concluded to make no more applications
for this kind of employment, at least among the conceited
Vermonters. But where am I going? he now for the first
time thought to ask himself. He revolved several things
in his mind, and at last resolved, as it was now nearly night,
to return to the tavern where he lodged the last night, and
consult with the landlord, who had treated him with much
kindness, relative to the course he had better pursue in his
present unpleasant circumstances.
CHAPTER V.
Romans, countrymen and lovers!
Brutus
.
Vexed
, cross, discomfitted and sullen, our hero arrived
at the tavern he had left in the morning with such high
hopes, nay, with such certainty of success in the
application
,
the fate of which is recorded in the last chapter.
Think not, reader, that I am admitting any thing
derogatory
to the talents of my hero by describing his failure, or
rather want of success, in his attempt to get employed by
a paltry school committee. By no means. Who is to say
that it was not a fit of sheer caprice in these conceited
wights of village greatness, that led to his rejection? Again,
as it requires wit to find out wit, who shall decide that
it was not their ignorance instead of his that produced
that hapless result? But, admit that it was not,admit
that they were right in considering Timothy not well
calculated
for the business of instruction, does it follow that
this must necessarily go in disparagement of his abilities
of his geniusof his heroic qualities? Why, Marlborough,
whose military achievements constitute so bright an era
in England's gloryeven the great Marlborough, could
never have made a school-master. And Newton,think
you Newton could have ever become a Garrick in
theatrics
a
Sheridan in eloquence, or a Burns in poesy?
Greatness
does not consist in being great or excellent in every
thing, nor does talent, to be of the highest order, require
that its possessor should excel in all he may happen to
undertake
.
The farmer, the mechanic, or even the
horse-jockey
,
who displays uncommon dexterity or superior
management
in the business of his occupation, may be said to
be a man of talents.
Having now disposed of this point to my own
satisfaction
,
and to yours also, I presume, gentle reader, I will
proceed with my narrative.
No sooner had Timothy entered the bar-room of the inn
above mentioned, than he was hailed by the landlord, who
was called Captain Joslin. Well, friend, said he, what
luck? Have you got the place, and come back to practice
at the school-master's walk, &c. awhile before you appear
among your scholars? Timothy at first felt a little
disinclined
to relate the result of his journey to the village, but
finding his host kindly anxious to know what had befallen
him to cause such dejection in his looks, he at length
frankly related the whole proceeding, attributing his
failure
to a cause which few, I think, who rightly appreciate
his capacities, will doubt to be the true one, viz: the
inability
of the committee to comprehend the depth and
bearing
of his answers and observations, adding that he had
become so perfectly disgusted with school committee-men
that he doubted whether he could ever again bring his
mind to make another application of the kind. Ah,
said the Captain, I was rather fearful when you went
from here that you would not be able to do much with the
big-bugs there in the village; besides, people are mighty
particular in these parts about their school-masters: It
an't here as it is in Massachusetts and York State. Why,
they turned off our master last winter only because my boy,
Jock, who was fourteen last sugarin'-time, treed him in a
sum in Double Positionthough to be sure we don't often
get taken in so.But as to yourself, what do you propose
to drive at now for a living?
This question brought matters to the point on which
Timothy
had determined to consult the landlord: He
therefore
candidly told his host his exact situation, and asked
his advice on the subject.
I thought likely, observed the landlord, that this
might be the case with you; and I have been thinking,
friend, as you appear to be a kind of honest, free-spoken
fellow, besides being stout and able-bodied for business,
that you are about such a chap as I should like myself to
employ a few monthssay till after next harvesting. I
have a farm and keep a team, as you see. Now what say
you to hiring out to me for about ten dollars a month or so,
D
to work mostly on the farm, but tend bar when I am absent,
or at other times, perhaps, when business is not very
pressing
?
This kind proposal, although not quite a fair equivalent
for a salaried professorship, or the gubernatorial chair of
Vermont, came nevertheless at this dark hour of his
prospects
,
as the sun of light and comfort to the soul of our
hero; and with that facility, with which great minds
always
conform to circumstances, he cheerfully acceded to
the proposition of Captain Joslin. All the articles of the
compact were then discussed and ratified on the spot; and
both parties appeared well satisfied with the bargain. It
is unnecessary, perhaps, to detail the events of the few first
days in which Timothy was introduced into the business
of his employer; suffice it to say, that after becoming an
inmate in the Captain's family, he soon began to feel
cheerful
and contented, and such was his alacrity in business,
and his sprightliness and buoyancy in companionship, that
he shortly became a favorite, not only in his employer's
family, but in all the immediate neighborhood. But
capacities
like his could not long remain concealed by the
obscurity
of such employment. In this situation he had
lived
about a month, when one day he received an invitation
to go to the raising of a large barn frame in an adjoining
town. He accordingly attended the raising; and during
the performance, often attracted the attention of the
company
by his activity in handling the light timbers, as well
as by the free good will with which he put his shoulder to
the broad-side. After the raising of the building was
completed
,
and the bottle had several times circulated, the
company
broke from the drinking circle, and gathering into
small clubs about in different places, commenced telling
stories, singing songs, cracking jokes, and discussing
various
subjects according to the age and tastes of the parties.
Our hero happening to be passing one of these little
collections
,
heard them discussing the subject of
Freemasonry
some
ridiculing it as a
great big nothing
, as they
were pleased to term itothers denouncing it as a
dangerous
institution, and yet others defending it. This was
enough to arrest his attention, and arouse his feelings; for
he was born, it may be said, with an innate sympathy for
that noble institution; and he immediately pushed his way
into the circle, and so earnestly took up the cudgels in
defence
of the slandered order, that he soon triumphantly
vanquished his opponents, and was left master of the field.
Having, by this time, drawn a considerable crowd about
him, and being still full of the subject on which he had
now become thoroughly excited, his natural inclination for
spouting came upon him too strong to be resisted; and
mounting a bunch of new shingles that lay near him, he
elevated his fine form, and after pitching his voice by the
usual h-e-ms and h-a-ms, thus addressed the listening
crowd around him:
Friends, Countrymen, and Fellow Barn-Raisers:
In all my longitudinal meanderings from the town
of Mugwump, the place of my native developement, to
the territorial summits of the Green-Mountain wilderness,
I have never heard such scandalous exasperations and
calumniated
opinions protruded against the magnificent
marvelosity
of Masonry. Having been instilled from the
earliest
days of my juvenile infancy to look upon that
celestial
transportation of Masonry with the most copious
veneration
,
is it any wonderful emergency that I am filled with
the most excruciating indignation in hearing these
traducities
against an institution of such amphibious principles
and concocted antiquity? And here I exalt my prophecy
that unless you expunge such disgusting sentimentalities,
and put down such illiterate falsifications, they will
hetrodox
the whole popular expansion, till they entirely stop the
velocity of civilization: For there is no other preparative
that can exalt a people from their heathenish perplexities,
and confer rank and distinguishment like the luminous
invention
of Freemasonry. Then again, behold its useful
commodity! Look at that compendious barn-frame! Was
it not conglemerated by the square and compass? and are
not these emblements extracted from the intelligence of
Masonry? Let me then concentrate my propensities to
warn you to lay aside your reprobate infringements, lest
you, and all your cotemporary posterity, be deprived of the
civilized embellishments and incomprehensible advantages
of that superfluous fraternity.
He ceased, and his speech was followed with bursts of
applauding laughter by many, by exclamations of
admiration
by some, and by expressions of wonder and surprise
by all. It will be said, perhaps, by those astute
antimasonic
carpers, who, in these degenerate days, scruple not to
condemn the choicest specimens of masonic composition
because they are often wholly incapable of comprehending
them,it will be said, perhaps, by such, that this
impassioned
little burst of eloquence is not original in my hero;
that it is borrowed from some masonic orator. This I
wholly
deny; but while I claim entire originality for this
impromptu
effort, I am free to confess the resemblance which
might lead to such a conclusion; and, indeed, not a little
proud should our hero feel of a performance which, by its
similarity of style, diction, and lucid and conclusive
manner
of argumentation, is liable to be mistaken for one of
those monuments of extraordinary eloquence that, in the
shape of twenty-fourth of June orations, have thrown such
a halo of light and glory around the mystic temple.
But the temporary applause which Timothy received on
this occasion, was of little consequence compared with the
subsequent honors of which this little performance seemed
to be the moving cause. Scarcely had he descended from
his rustic rostrum when he was eagerly seized by the hand
by a person who heartily congratulated him on his speech.
Timothy having before seen the man, whose name was
Jenks, at Joslin's, and become somewhat acquainted, soon
fell into a low, confidential sort of conversation with him
on the subject of the speech, when the latter observed, that
from a certain circumstance (not returning the grip
probably
)
he concluded that Timothy was not a Mason; and,
on being told that such was the case, enquired why he did
not join the lodge, at the same time adding that he had
never before met with a person who, he thought, would
make a brighter Mason. Timothy then asked Jenks if he
should advise any one to join. Why, replied the latter,
we never
advise
any body to join us; but I can tell you
that you little dream of what you will lose if you don't.
To this Timothy replied that he had long been determined
on becoming a Mason as soon as his circumstances would
admit, but at present he had no money to spare for the
purpose
,
besides he had certain objections to appearing in the
village where he supposed he should have to go if he
joined
at this time. Jenks however removed all these
objections
by informing Timothy that they had a lodge in that
town, and that a note would answer as well as money for
the initiation fee. On hearing this, our hero at once
accepted
the offer that the other now made, to propose him
at the next lodge meeting, which was that very night.
Jenks then went and procured pen, ink and paper, and
writing a note of the required sum, and an application in
due form, brought them to Timothy to sign, at the same
time explaining the necessity of this measure. These
being
signed, it was arranged that Timothy should come in
just four weeks, and calling on Jenks at his residence, they
should both proceed together to the place at which the
proposed initiation was to take place. When this
interesting
negociation was concluded, our hero proceeded
homewards
with a bosom swelling with pride and expectation.
His step was lighter, his head was held higher, and a new
impulse seemed to have been given to his whole energies;
for he felt conscious that the coming occasion was to
constitute
a new era in his destinies.
How slowly to our hero the tedious days of the next
month rolled away! It seemed to him that the eventful day
that was to unfold to his view the mighty mysteries of
Masonry
,
would never arrive. Long before the time came he
had procured the sum requisite for his initiation, and being
now fully prepared for that important event, he ardently
longed to see the hour at hand. His whole soul became
engrossed in the overwhelming subject by day, and by
D*
night it was the burden of his dreamy imaginings. Once,
in particular, his dream became a vision of striking
distinctness
,
and prophetic import. He saw a vast throne in
the clouds, on each side of which extended a broad vapory
parapet. A mighty King sat upon the throne, with a
shining
mitre, covered with mystic symbols, on his head, while
an innumerable host of aproned worshippers stood around
him ready to do his bidding. While our hero gazed on the
splendid spectacle, a ladder was let down to his feet; and
he mounted it step by step, till he reached the very seat of
the Great Puissant, there enthroned in light and glory
ineflable
.
When the King, taking the crown from his own
head, placed it on the head of our hero and descended,
exclaiming, Hail, O Grand King! High and mighty art
thou among our followers on earth! Let the faithful
worship
thee! So mote it beSo mote it be, forever amen,
amen! While the last word was canght up by the
multitude
of surrounding worshippers, till the long echoes,
reverberating
through the welkin in peals of vocal thunder,
returned to the ears of our enthroned dreamer, and
dispelled
the magnificent vision from his enraptured senses.
CHAPTER VI.
Wunder-wurkeinge.
Old Masonic Manuscript
.
The
long wished day, which was to reveal to our hero
those hidden wonders so impenetrably concealed from the
profane and vulgar, at length arrived. With restless
impatience
and quivering anxiety did he wait the proper hour
for his departure to meet his appointment at the place of
his proposed initiation. And no sooner had it arrived than
he mounted his nag, and, with his initiation fee snugly
deposited
in his pocket, rode off for the residence of Jenks,
the friend, who, as before mentioned, had agreed to
introduce
him. The distance was about five miles; but his
horse, although it was a murky evening in July, either
through consciousness that he was bound on an errand of
no ordinary import, or in consequence of those birchen
incentives to speed that were freely administered at
almost
every step by his impetuous rider, flew over the
rough road with the velocity of the wind, and in one half
hour stood reeking in sweat at the place of his destination.
Jenks, already in waiting at the door, received Timothy
with all the kindness of anticipated brotherhood. As soon
as the mutual greetings were over, the two immediately
set out for the house where the lodge was to hold its
meeting
.
This was a new two-story wooden building, into
which the owner had lately moved. Although the house
was only partially finished, yet a `rum pole,' as it is
sometimes
called, had been raised, and the building was
already
occupied as a tavern. The landlord, himself a Mason,
had agreed to consecrate his hall to the use of his brethren,
and the approaching meeting was the first opportunity they
had found to dedicate it to its mystic purposes. The
members
of the lodge having mostly assembled when Timothy
and Jenks arrived, the former was left alone in the
bar-room
,
while the latter went into the hall, proposing to
return
for the candidate as soon as all was ready for his
reception
.
This was a moment of the most thrilling and
fearful suspense to our hero, tremblingly alive as he was
to the overwhelming interests of the occasion. He tried
to occupy his mind during the absence of his friend, which
seemed an age, by now looking out of the window and
watching the movements of the gathering clouds as they
came over, deepening the shades of the approaching
evening
,now
vacantly gazing at the turkies, taking roost in
the yard,now pacing the room and pulling up his well
starched collar, and now hurriedly counting his fingers, to
kill the lagging moments, and allay the fever of his
excited
expectation.
At last, however, Jenks came, and informed him, that
the committee appointed to consider his case had
reported
faverably; the vote of the lodge had been taken, and
all was found clear: he might therefore now follow to
the preparation room. This room was no other than the
kitchen garret, which, being on a level with the hall, and
communicating with the same by a door at one end of it,
was now to be used for this purpose through necessity, as
that part of the hall originally designed for a preparation
room was not yet sufficiently finished to answer for the
present initiation. To this garret the candidate was now
conducted, through the kitchen, and up the kitchen stairs
that being the only way of getting into the room without
going through the hall, which the candidate must not yet
be permitted to enter. The garret having been darkened
for the occasion, the candidate and his conductor, after
getting up stairs, groped along, feeling their way by taking
hold of the rafters above them, towards the hall door,
frequently
stumbling over the loose boards of which the floor,
in some places single, in some double or treble, was
composed
,
placed there for the double purpose of seasoning
and answering for a temporary flooring. The masonic
reader may here perhaps pause to demur to the fitness of
our preparation room as being too liable to attract the
attention
of the inmates of the kitchen below, and thus lead
to an exposure to the eyes of prying curiosity; but all this
had been prudently foreseen, and the difficulty obviated,
by the landlord who had contrived to have his wife and
daughter, the only females of the family, go out on a visit that
afternoon, with the intimation that they need not return
till dark, before which it was supposed the ceremonies of
the preparation room would be over.
As soon as Timothy had been stationed near the door
leading into the lodge-room, he was left to himself. In a
short time however Jenks returned, accompanied by
several
others, one of whom was the Senior Deacon of the
lodge, who now approached the candidate, and questioned
him as follows:
Do you sincerely declare upon your honor, before these
gentlemen, that unbiassed by friends, uninfluenced by
unworthy
motives, you freely and voluntarily offer yourself a
candidate for the mysteries of Masonry?
`I say yes,' replied Timothy, `to all but that about
being
biassed by friendsmy father advised me to join, and
Mr. Jenks here'
Why, Sir, hastily interrupted the Deacon, you don't
pretend that your friends used improper influence to
induce
you to join, do you?
`O, no,' replied Timothy; `but falsifications are
exceptionabilities
,
and I thought you was going to make me
say'
Ah, Sir, again interrupted the Deacon, you said no,
I think, to the last question: The answer will do, will it
not, Brethren? `We conclude so, Brother,' was the
reply
.
The Deacon then proceeded.
Do you sincerely declare upon your honor that you are
prompted to solicit the principles Masonry by a favorable
opinion conceived of the institutiona desire of
knowledge
,
and a sincere wish of being serviceable to your
fellow-creatures
?
`Yes, I do,' eagerly replied Timothy. Here Jenks
seeing
the probability that the candidate would need
considerable
prompting, stepped up to his side and jogged him
to be quiet.
Do you, continued the Deacon, sincerely declare
that you will cheerfully conform to all the ancient
established
usages and customs of the fraternity?
`Why, yesit is conjecturable I shall,' replied
Timothy
,
in a half hesitating, half jocular tone and manner,
`though the dl a bit do I know what they are: Suppose
you first explicate and expound them a little.' Say you
do, impatiently whispered Jenks in his ear. `I do then,'
said Timothy.
The Deacon then went into the lodge to report the
answers
of the candidate, while those remaining proceeded
to strip him of his clothes; but not understanding the
meaning
of the movement, and not much relishing being taken
in hand in this manner, he suddenly started and twisted
himself out of their hands, demanding what they were
going
to do, & bidding them beware of putting tricks upon one
who could throw any two of them at a back-hug, side-hold,
rough-and-tumble, or any other waya threat which he
probably could, and would have made good, (for he was no
slouch at athletics) had they persisted at that moment while
under the impression, as he was, that this movement was
no part of the ceremony, but a mere trick or joke
attempted
by way of interlude to pass away the time till the
Deacon
returned. But Jenks again interfered, and after
many
persuasions and the most positive assurances that this
was really part of the ceremonies, induced him to consent
to let them proceed. He then rather grumblingly
submitted
himself again into their hands, observing that he
supposed
it was all right, but what the sublime art of
masonry
could possibly have to do with pulling down a fellow's
breeches, was beyond the expansion of his
comprehensibilities
to discover. He was then divested of all his
clothing
except his shirt, which was turned down round the
neck and shoulders so that the left breast was left bare.
They then incased his legs in an old pair of woolen
drawers
,
which, on account of the candidate's unusual crural
dimensions, reached no farther down than about midleg;
and bound a black silk handkerchief so snugly about his
eyes as to make an impervious blindfold. His right foot
was next placed into an old shoe, which in masonic
parlance
is called the slipper; while a rope, of several
yards in length, was tied with a noose around his neck.
These important ceremonies being in due form completed,
all the attendant brethren retired into the lodge-room,
except
the Senior Deacon, who was here left in charge of the
candidate. This officer then taking hold of the end of the
rope, or cable-tow, as it is termed in the technics of
masonry
,
made towards the hall door, and reaching out his
right hand, while with his left pulling upon the rope round
the neck of the candidate, he gave with his mallet, or
gavel
,
three loud knocks on the door, which were instantly
answered
by three still louder knocks from within; while at
the same moment the door was partly opened, and a harsh,
sharp voice hurriedly cried out, Who comes there, who
comes there, who comes there? All this was the work of
an instant, and the noise thereby produced falling so
suddenly
,
so unexpectedly, and with such a rapid succession
of confused and startling sounds on the ears of the
candidate
,
he involuntarily bolted with the quickness of thought,
several feet backwards;which movement straightening
the rope, and causing the Deacon to hang on stiffly at the
other end, at once threw the two into a position much
resembling
two boys pulling sticks. As soon as the poor
blind and alarmed candidate had time to rally his
scattered
ideas, after being brought into this situation, a sudden
fancy shot through his brain that they were going to hang
him; and, like a led pig, that has hung back almost to
choaking, he suddenly made another desperate lunge
backwards
,
when, as the evil genius of masonry would have it,
the Deacon unluckily let go his hold, and the poor
candidate
came down on his rearwards on a place in the floor,
which happened to be of but one thickness of boards, with
such violence, that every thing gave way before him, and
he was precipitated with a loud crash down into the
kitchen
,
and landed, with the shock of thunder, on the floor.
Just at that moment, as bad luck would again have it,
Susan
,
the landlord's daughter, a sturdy girl of sixteen, had
come home, and was in the act of hanging up her bonnet
when this strange vision fell on her astounded senses. She
turned round and gave one wild, fixed stare upon Timothy,
who with a loud grunt had floundered on to his feet, and
now stood in his red drawers, with his face concealed by
the black bandage, and so tied with large bows behind as
to resemble horns, with his cable-tow hanging down his
back, and with his mouth distended with the grin of a
baboon
thrown into the air. She gave one wild look on this
appalling figue, and bolted like an arrow through the door.
Scarcely, however, had she reached the yard, when some
movement of our hero striking her ear, and leading her to
suppose the monster was at her heels, fear seized her afresh,
and deprived the poor girl of all power of getting forward,
and, like a sheep or a rabbit frightened by a dog, she
continued
for some time leaping up with prodigious bounds
into the air without gaining an inch in advance, throwing
up her hands with a pawing kind of motion towards the
heavens, and eagerly exclaiming, O Lord! take me right
up into the skies! O, Lordy! O, Lordy! She soon
however
recovered her powers of progression, and with all her
speed made towards the barn where her two brothers were
pitching off a load of hay, screaming at every step, O,
murder! murder! save me! save me, Ben! The devil is
come! The devil is in the house! O, save mesave me!
The boys hearing this outcry, leaped from the load, and
ran out eagerly crying, What's the matterwhat's the
matter? Oh, Ben! replied the breathless and
affrighted
girl, Oh, Ben, the devil is in our house! Oh! Oh! Oh!
What the darnation do you mean? exclaimed Ben.
Suke, you are crazy! O, I ain'tI ain't nother, she
cried with histerical sobsit
is
the devilI seed him
with his black face, and horns, and tail a rod long! How
he looked! Oh! oh! boo-hoo-hoo! I snore!
exclaimed
the youngest boy, with glaring eyes, and teeth
chattering like a show-monkey in January, I snore! Ben,
where's dad? Jock! said the oldest boy, flourishing
his pitchfork and courageously making towards the house,
you come on with your forkby golly! we'll fix him!
So saying, Ben, followed by his brother, pushed forward
to the scene of action, both proceeding with their forks
presented, ready to receive his majesty of the black face
and long tail upon the tines as soon as they should meet
him. When they came near the door they proceeded more
cautiously, stopping to peep in at a distance; but seeing
nothing, they soon grew bolder, and the elder one fairly
put his head within the door. Here all was quiet and
nothing
to be seen. They then went in, searched about the
room, looked out of the windows, and passed into the
lower
rooms of the other part of the house, without finding
any breach or hole where his majesty could have come in
or gone out, or indeed discovering any thing that could in
the least account for their sister's fright. The Masons
they knew were in the hall; but they never dreamed that
the apparition could have had any connexion with the
proceedings
of the lodge room. They therefore concluded
that it was all poor Susan's imagination that had caused
such a fuss, and getting her in, they called her a darn fool
to be scart at nothing. But she still persisting strongly in
her story, they soon gave it up that it must have been the
devil; and their mother coming home soon after, and
hearing
the story, still added to their fears by expressing her
belief that it was a
bona fide
satanic visitation; and as soon
as it was dusk, they lit up a candle, and all sat down close
together in fear and wonderment, without going out of
doors till the Masons broke up; and even then they
received
no new light on the subject; for the landlord was
silent
on the affair, being quite willing to let it go as it
stood, lest the truth might be discovered. It therefore
became the settled opinion of not only the family but the
neighborhood, except the brethren, that the devil actually
made his appearance on that eventful evening, and
thousands
were the conjectures as to the nature of his errand.
So much for the devil in red drawers, hoodwinked and
cable-towed
.
Let us now return to the lodge-room.
No sooner had the accident just related happened, than
several of the brethren rushed out of the hall, and, while
some carefully took up and replaced the broken board by
another so as to leave no clue to the disaster, others ran
down, and seizing the candidate, now bruised, sore and
bewildered, hastily forced him up stairs and hurried him
into the lodge-room, where they were on the point of
receiving
him, when this luckless interruption took place.
After a short pause, to see whether the candidate was
hurt, as well as to recover from the fright and confusion
into which they had been thrown, they, on finding that no
serious damage had been done, now repaired to their
respective
stations that the ceremony might proceed. The
E
Worshipful Master then bid the candidate enter with heed
and in God's name. A short prayer was next repeated,
when the candidate, after a few unimportant questions and
answers, was again taken in hand for the purpose of
performing
the customary ceremony of being led by the
cable-tow
three times round the lodge-room. The brethren
by this time having fairly recovered from their alarm, were
now, as they thought of the late affair, and looked on the
poor blind candidate, beginning to be seized with much
merrier emotions. And as he was led along, his wo-begone
countenance wincing at every step, as if he expected
every
instant some new calamity to befal him, and lifting high
his feet, like a new-yoked hog, in fear of more accidents
from faithless floors, his shirt sadly torn, and his drawers so
disordered as to lead to some corporeal developements of
masterly conformation, his appearance produced no little
sensation among the assembled brotherhood.Some were
seen compressing their mouths and screwing their lips
together
to prevent the escape of the threatened explosion
of laughter,some snapping their fingers in silent glee,
and some holding their sides, and writhing and bending
nearly double through the convulsive effects of suppressed
risibility: and in a moment more, the contagion seizing the
whole company, the hall shook and resounded with a
universal
burst of half-smothered laughter. Even the Right
Worshipful Master, who was then reading a passage from
the open Bible before him, found such difficulty in
commanding
the tones of his quavering voice, that he was
forced
to run hurriedly over the remainder of the passage,
and no sooner had he reached the last word than he bro't
the book together with a hasty slap, and gave himself up
to the uncontrolable gust of emotions that was every where
raging around him. As soon, however, as the Master could
succeed in assuming a face of sober dignity, and in
quelling
the tumult, the Junior Deacon brought the candidate,
now blushing almost through the black handkerchief over
his face at his own degradation, to a station near the altar.
The sharp points of the compass were then presented to
his naked breast, accompanied with some other of the
usual
ceremonies, previous to administering the oath. He was
next ordered and assisted to kneel on his left knee, while
his hands were placed in due form, one under, and the
other
on the open Bible, on which were laid the square and
compass. After this, the Worshipful Master approached,
and told him that he was now in the proper place and
situation
to receive the oath of Entered Apprentice, and
desired
him, if willing to take it, to say over the words,
repeating
them exactly as they were given off to him. The
Master then proceeded to tell over the first clause of the
oath, which Timothy, after some hesitation, repeated. They
then went on with the rest of the obligation, which was in
the like manner, told over and repeated, until they came to
the last clause, Binding myself under no less penalty
than to have my throat cut across from ear to ear, my tongue
torn out by the roots, and my body buried in the rough
sands of the sea, at low-water mark, where the tide ebbs
and flows twice in twenty-four hoursso help me God;
when the candidate, who, after all that had befel him, was
not so much bewildered as to quite lose his own notions
about things, or so subdued as to be ready to submit to any
thing which he might think for the moment to be of
questionable
propriety, suddenly started upon his feet, and in a
sort of desperate and determined tone exclaimed, What!
have my own throat cut! and ask God to help do it? I'll
be exploded first! This unexpected scrupulousness and
refusal of the candidate, whom they supposed to have been
too much tamed by the events of the evening to cause them
any further trouble, occasioned a momentary confusion
among the brethren, and brought Jenks, his old prompter,
immediately to his side. The latter then used and
exhausted
all his powers of coaxing to induce the still
stubborn
and determined candidate to repeat the clause in
question; but, finding that his entreaties were of no effect,
he resorted to menaces, threatening to turn him out naked
into the street if he refused to complete the oath. But this,
instead of producing the desired effect, only made the
candidate
more turbulent, and he instantly retorted, Do it,
if you want to smell my fist!I can abolish a dozen of
you! At the same time suiting the action to the word,
he sprang forward, flourishing his clenched fist with such
fearful violence, that all hands, for the safety of their heads,
were obliged to leap out of his reach, while with his left
hand he made a desperate pull on the bandage over his
eyes. But the quick eyes of the brethren catching this
last movement, a half dozen of them sprang upon him in
an instant, and, forcibly holding his arms, put him down in
his former position, in despite of his furious struggles to
get free. Here they held him down by force till his breath
and strength were fairly exhausted by the violence of his
efforts. They then, with the sharp points of the compass
and sword, began to prick him, first on one side, then on
the other, until, through pain, exhaustion and vexation, he
sunk down and burst out into a loud boo-hooblubbering
like a hungry boy for his bread and butter. Jenks, now
taking advantage of this softened mood, immediately
renewed his exertions, and by a little soothing and
persuasion
,
soon brought the poor subdued candidate to consent
to take the remainder of the oath, which was instantly
administered
,
lest with recovering strength he should renew
his opposition; and thus ended this troublesome part of
the ceremony.
The Master now addressing the candidate, said,
Brother
,
to you the secrets of Masonry are about to be unveiled;
and a brighter sun never shone lustre on your eyes.
Brother
,
what do you now most desire? `I should like a drink
of water, and then to be let out,' sobbed Timothy, taking
the last question literally, and being now quite willing, in
his present state of feelings, to forego any more of the
secrets
of masonry if he might be suffered to depart. But he
soon found that this was not to be permitted; for the
prompter bid him answer the question properly, and say
he desired light. The question then being repeated, he
submissively answered as he was bid; when the Master,
giving a loud rap, and raising his voice, said, Brethren,
stretch forth your hands and assist in bringing this
new-made
brother from darkness to light! This last order
being
followed with much bustle, and sounds portending busy
preparation for some important movement, the candidate
became alarmed, fearing that some other terrible trial, yet
in reserve for him, was now to be experienced; and he
began
to breathe short, and tremble violently. The
members
having formed a circle around the agitated candidate,
the Master, after a few moments of the most profound
stillness
,
now broke the portentous silence by loudly
exclaiming
,
And God said let there be light, and there was light!
Instantly all the brethren of the lodge furiously clapped
their hands; and, with one united stamp brought their
uplifted
feet to the floor with such a thundering shock as
made the whole house tremble to its lowest foundations:
while, at the same time, the bandage, which had been
gradually
loosened for the purpose, was suddenly snatched from
the eyes of the candidate, who, shuddering with terror at
the astounding din around him, and dazzled by the
intenseness
of the bright flood of light that burst, from total
darkness
,
at once upon his unexpecting and astonished senses,
now stood aghast with dismay and consternation; his
fixed
and glassy eyes glaring in dumb bewilderment on the
encircled group of figures, which, to his distempered and
distorting vision, seemed some strange, grim and unearthly
beings, and which his wandering imagination soon
converted
into a band of fiends, standing ready to seize, and pitch
him about in torments. Gazing a moment in mute
amazement
on this terrible array, he became suddenly agitated,
and, rising to his full height, and collecting all his
delirious
energies, he, with one prodigious bound, sent himself,
like a rocket, completely over the shoulders of the
encircled
brotherhood, and fell in a swoon at full length on the
floor, leaving an atmosphere behind him but little
improved
by his rial transit. All for a while was now bustle and
confusion in the lodge-room.Some were seen running to
take up the prostrate candidatesome hurrying for water
and spirits to revive himsome, with one hand holding the
E *
organs of their mutinnous olfactories, to work in clearing
the floor of the sad effects of masonic principles operating
the wrong way; and others no less busily engaged in the
process of disaromatizing, or removing their own clothes
and emblematical adornments; for I grieve to say, that
many
a gay sash, and many a finely figured apron, here fell a
sacrifice to this hapless result of the ennobling mysteries
of Masonry.
At length all was again in a fair way to be
restored
to order. The candidate was soon brought to his
senses, and finding himself not dead, and being assured
moreover that the storm had now entirely passed by, he
began
to revive rapidly. His clothes were then brought him,
and he was assisted to dress. This being done, and a glass
of spirits administered by way of a restorative, the Master
proceeded to complete the ceremonies, which were here
made to consist only of the grip, signs and pass-words, the
lecture of instructions being dispensed with for this time,
owing to the weak condition of the candidate; for he was
still a little wild, and occasionally visited with sudden starts
and slight convulsive shudders, sometimes breaking out
into
a loud laugh, and at other times shedding tears.
The lodge was now closed with a prayer by the
Worshipful
Master; after which, the brethren were called from
labor to refreshment. Bottles were then brought on, and
all freely partaking, soon relaxed into cheerful chit-chat
and social gaietysome occasionally breaking out into
parts of those chaste, animating, and lofty breathing songs,
so peculiar to this moral and soul-gifted fraternity, and so
worthy withal of that classical origin of organized
Freemasonry
which the learned Lawrie and other historians of
the order, have, with great appearance of truth, we think,
traced to the mysteries of Bachus. And while strains like
the following,
Come let us prepare,
We brethren that are
Assembled on merry occasion;
Let's drink, laugh and sing
Our wine has a spring
Here's health to an accepted Mason,
with the exhilarating effects of the now rapidly circulating
bottle, co-operating in their genial influences on both body
and mind, the feelings of the company were soon exalted
to the highest pitch of joyous excitement. A thousand
lively jokes and sallies of wit, together with many a hearty
laugh over the romantic events of the evening, enlivened
the scene; and even the pale and exhausted candidate
began
to mingle slightly in the prevailing mirth, and feel, as
they now broke up, that Richard would soon be himself
again.
CHAPTER VII.
Tityre, tu patul recubans sub tegmine fagi.
Virgil
.
Dark
and fearful were the troubled visions of our hero
after he had retired to his pillow for rest on that
memorable
night when the awful mysteries of Masonry were
uncurtained
to his view. Scenes of the most thrilling horror,
in their thousand rapid and startling mutations, were
continually
rising, with terrible vividness, to his mind, and
haunting his distracted fancy. He now seemed falling,
for days and months, down, down, some bottomless abyss
now suddenly arrested in his swift descending course by a
tremendous jerk from a rope, which, fastened around his
neck, had run out its length, and now brought him to the
end of his tethernow slowly hauled up through the same
gloomy passage, attended by winged monsters, flapping
their great pinions about his head, as they labored upwards
along this vault of darkness and terror; and now quickly
transported to the middle of a vast, interminable plain,
where the sky was immediately overcaststorms arosehis
ears were stunned by frightful peals of thunderstreams
of vivid lightning overpowering his vision, and scorching
his hair and garments, were flashing around him, and
kindling
up the combustible plain to a general conflagration;
while he was beset on every side by a troop of tormenting
fiends, who, armed with sharp spears, and clothed with
aprons woven, warp and woof, with living serpents, and
fringed with their hissing heads, thronged thickly about
himsome stripping off all his clothes, dancing on before
him and holding them up to his grasp, yet forever eluding
it; and others constantly running by his side, howling,
goading and stinging him in every part; while bleeding
and blistered, he vainly endeavored to escape, and strove
on, in unutterable agony, through the scorching and
burning
regions, hoarsely crying for water, and begging for his
clothes,for his shirteven a shirt!
I have brought you a shirt, Brother Peacock, said a
voice at his bed-side. He started from his disturbed
slumbers
at the word, which, in seeming echo to his own deep
mutterings, now fell on his ear. Wherewhere am I?
Who are you? he hurriedly and fiercely exclaimed,
looking
wildly around him.Are they gone? `What gone?'
said the voice. Them awfulOh!Ah!Why, it is
only
JenksYes, yes, I remember now, I went home with
you last night; but O, Jenks, what a dream I have had!
And then, to think of last night at the lodge-room!
`Come, come,' said Jenks, `you are like a puppy with his
eyes just opened,every thing looks strange and terrible,
a cat seems to him as big as a yearling, and the little fool
will bristle up and yelp at his own shadow. But never
mind; we will make a man of you yet. I will explain all
to you in good time. I have got a decentish sort of shirt
here, which I rather guess you had better put on,' he
continued
,
looking down on the stained remnant of what was
yesterday our hero's best India cotton shirt, the choice
freedom gift of his mother, still pertinaciously clinging in
shreds to the limbs of the owner, as if loath to break off so
old a friendship: `and I think I could tie up that old one
you have on in your handkerchief, and throw it into the
swamp going home, or burn it or something, so it should
not lead to any discoveries of what we do in the lodge-room.
But come, rouse up, man! Our breakfast is about ready.
I have got to be off to-day; but I shall be going by
Joslin's
in a day or two, when I will call, and we will have
some talk together.' So saying, he left the room.
Timothy now attempted to rise, but so sore and stiff was
he in every joint, from what he had last night gone through
in the masonic gymnastics of initiation, that he found
himself
somewhat in the condition of that hapless
South-American
animal, whose movements are so painful, that it is said
to utter a scream of agony at every feeble bound it makes
in its progress. After several trials, however, with as
many
interjectional grunts, he succeeded in getting on to the
floor and dressing himself: after which, he found way to
a cool spring in the door-yard:its pure bubbling waters
seemed to his parched throat sweet as the Pierian fountain
to the thirsty aspirants of Parnassus; and had it been that
consecrated spring, Pope's direction, Drink deep, would
never have been more faithfully followed. He then went
into the breakfast-room where the family were already
assembled
and waiting his presence.
Is the gentleman unwell this morning? asked Mrs.
Jenks, glancing from the pale, haggard features of
Timothy
to her husband. Jenks smiled and said nothing. O,
ho! I had forgotten, said sheyou were both at the
lodge last nightthat accounts for allI have seen
new-made
Masons before, I believe.
`My wife,' observed Jenks, with a knowing wink to
Timothy
,
`my wife don't like masonry very well.'
And what woman would? she tartly replied. You
go to your lodge-meetings every few nights, leaving your
families alone and unprotectedyour wives and children
perhaps sick, or suffering for the want of the money you
are squandering in your midnight carousals; and when you
come reeling home, the only comfort they receive for a
long and lonely night of tears and anxiety, is to be told,
in answer to their inquiries, concerning the employment
of your cruel absence, `You can't knowyou are not
worthy
to be made acquainted with this part of your husband's
secrets!'
`My wife,' said Jenks, `don't appear to know that
masonry
takes the wives of Masons under its special
protectection
,
and that their poor widows are always provided
for by her charities.'
Charity! Poor widows! retorted she,they may
well be called poor; for Mason's widows generally are poor
enough. And what is the amount of the mighty charities
they receive at your hands? After their husbands have
spent all their property by neglecting their business to
attend
to their masonry, paying out their money, or by bad
habits they first acquire at the lodge-room, then if they die
and leave penniless widowswell, what then? Why, the
lodge will be so very charitable as to
pay back
to those
widows
,
perhaps, one tenth part of what they have been the
sole means of robbing them: And this they call charity!
`O wonderful!' replied Jenks`And then the horrors of
being left alone a few hours, and the tears'
Yes! retorted the nettled dameyes, the tears: If
there is any affection between a man and his wife,
masonry
does more to destroy it, and break up that mutual
confidence
which is necessary to preserve it, than any one
thing I can mention. And if all the tears that have been,
and will be, shed by Masons' wives, on account of their
husbands' masonry, could be collected into a running
stream, it would carry a saw-mill from this hour to the day
of judgement!
`Come, come, wife,' said Jenks, `I think you have said
quite enough for once.'
Enough of truth for
your
conscience, I presume,
replied
the fair belligerent, determined to have the last word
in the argument.
Timothy wondered much to hear such irreverent
invectives
against masonry so boldly expressed by the wife of a
brother Mason. He had supposed that all wives were
proud of the honor of having masonic husbands; for he
knew his mother was so. Still there were some of the
observations
he had just heard which tallied so well with
what he had already seen of masonry, that he felt a little
staggered, and could not prevent his conscience from
secretly
giving a response to many of the lady's remarks. But
the sneering way in which Jenks laughed off these remarks
of his wife, soon convinced him that there was no truth in
them, and that they were the effects of the woman's
ignorance
,
or arose from some freak or prejudice she had taken
against masonry, so the matter passed off without again
entering
his mind.
After breakfast was over, and brotherly adieus had been
exchanged between Jenks and Timothy, the latter
mounted
his horse and rode homeward. Many, and somewhat
sober were his reflections, as he slowly pursued his
solitary
way over the same road which he yesterday passed with
feelings as different from what they now were as the speed
of his horse in the two cases. His thoughts recurred to
the fearful trials he had gone through, and all the strange
scenes of the lodge-room. To his yet darkened mind, they
seemed to him nothing but vague mysteries, strangely
blending the trivial and odd with the solemn and terrible.
The sun had indeed shone out, but the dark rolling clouds
had not yet passed entirely from the field of his fancy, and
the ravages of the storm were yet too recent on his feelings
to allow him to contemplate the late scenes of the
lodge-room
with much pleasure.
On the following day Jenks called at Joslin's, but being
somewhat in a hurry, he proposed to Timothy that they
should meet in a certain field, about equidistant from their
respective residences, on the next Sunday, when the
promised
explanations and instructions in Masonry should be
given. Timothy, however, rather objected to a meeting
on Sunday; for his mother, who was a church woman, and
a strict observer of the Sabbath, notwithstanding her odd
notions about rank and family distinction, had always
taught him that the seventh day of the week should never
be devoted to worldly matters; and never having been
taught any better since he left his paternal roof, the
proposal
to spend this day in the manner contemplated struck
him unfavorably. He accordingly stated his objections
candidly
,
and proposed another day for the intended meeting.
Jenks, however, firmly combatted these fastidious
scruples
of our hero, as he termed them, and told him he had
hoped he was above minding these old womanish
superstitions
.
Still Timothy could not entirely conquer his doubts
on the subject; and in this I think he was, in a good
degree
,
excusable; for it must be recollected he had but
just been initiated, and had not enjoyed as yet scarcely any
opportunity of being enlightened by the true principles of
masonic philosophy; and when it is considered how
deeply
early impressions, however erroneous, become engrafted
on the heart, I do not think it at all strange that he could
not divest himself at once of all these notions which he
had been taught to believe correct. Finding his
companion
still in hesitation on the subject, Jenks, therefore, to
remove all further scruples, now informed him that
masonry
was the very handmaid of religionindeed it was
religion
itself, and all the religion that was needed to give
a man a passport to heaven; consequently, whatever time
was spent in studying masonry, was, in fact, devoted to
religious employment, which was the object of the
Sabbath, aswas admitted by all the most rigidly pious.
But what was more than all, he said, the control of
this day peculiarly belonged to the craft, as it was a
day of their own establishing; for to masonry, and to
masonry alone, the world were indebted for the
consecration
of the Sabbath. This was put beyond all
dispute
by the unerring records of masonic history, which,
in the words of the learned Preston, Brother Webb,
and many other great Masons, expressly says, that In six
days God made the world, and rested on the seventh:
the
seventh, therefore, our ancient brethren consecrated
. Of course
this day, being one of their own making, must be the
rightful property of the order, and, although they could do
what they pleased with it, yet it could be spent no way so
suitably as in the study of their art.
Such were the forcible arguments used, and the
unanswerable
facts cited by Jenks, in enlightening his pupil in
the path of his mystic duties, and teaching the extent of his
privileges as regarded the observance of the Sabbath. And,
although these were abundantly sufficient to enforce
conviction
on all except the most obdurate of uninitiated
heretics
,
yet there is another curious fact relative to the
ancient
history of this day, thus clearly traced to masonic
origin
,
which he might have added, and which I cannot
persuade
myself here to pass unnoticed, it being, as I
conceive
,
a fact of the most momentous import to the glory of
the institution, as not only showing the connexion between
masonry and the Sabbath, but figuring forth the greatness
and divine exaltation of the former, more strikingly
perhaps
,
than any one occurrence related within the whole
compass of its marvelous history: Josephus, that
authentic
ancient historian, informs us that there was a certain
river in Palestine that stayed its current and rested on the
seventh day, in observance, as he supposed, of the
Sabbath
.
Now if this day was established and
consecrated
by masonry alone, does not the plainest reason dictate
that it was the institution itself, and not the day it had
established
,
that this pious and considerate river thus stayed
its course to reverence? Or was not this worship in fact,
thus apparently bestowed on the object created, clearly
intended
for the creator? Nothing, it appears to me, can be
more certain than that such was the fact. How
stupendous
the thought! To what a magnificent pitch of
exaltation
then has that institution arrived, to which the works
of nature thus bow in reverence,to which the otherwise
forever rolling rivers of the earth are held in quiet
subjection
,
resting in their rapid courses at her omnipotent
behests!
But to return from this digressionTimothy no sooner
learned that such was the case with regard to the
connexion
between Masonry and the Sabbath than he
magnanimously
yielded his scruples, and, handsomely apologizing
for his ignorance of the facts just stated by his superior in
the art, cheerfully consented to the proposed meeting.
Accordingly, on the following Sunday, he repaired on
foot and alone to the appointed place of meeting. Jenks
F
was already on the ground awaiting his arrival. After the
customary greetings were exchanged, they seated
themselves
on the grass under the spreading branches of a large
beach tree which grew on the margin of the field,
affording
an excellent shade to screen them from the sultry rays
of a July sun. The field which they had thus selected for
their masonic rendezvous adjoined a deep piece of woods
which extended back unbroken to the mountains, and,
being
more than a half mile distant from any dwelling-house,
furnished a secure retreat against all cowans and
evesdroppers
,
without the aid of a Tyler. Here in this silent and
sequestered spot, our two friends, stretched on their grassy
bed beneath their cooling covert, proceeded to the
business
of their appointment. Jenks then producing an old
worn pamphlet, went on to read and explain the
ceremonies
of initiation, which, he said, in its main outlines,
represented
,
as was supposed by the learned men of their
order
,
the creation of the world; because when all was
darkness
,
God said Let there be light, and there was light.
The candidate, he concluded, represented Adam, who came
out of the darkness naked, and was admitted to the light,
and became endowed with noble faculties, as was the case
with all admitted to the glorious light of Masonry.
But do you suppose, Jenks, said Timothy, that God
led Adam round with a rope tied to his neck, before he
let him see the light?
`I know not how that may have been, Brother Timothy,'
replied Jenks, `but at all events, I think there is a striking
resemblance between the events of the creation and the
ceremonies of an initiation; and we have it from our
ancient
books that Adam was made a Mason almost as soon
as he was created.'
Our first father Adam, deny it who can,
A Mason was made, as soon as a man.
This proving satisfactory to the mind of Timothy, Jenks
then proceeded to explain all the grips and tokens of the
first degree; after which he taught our hero the art or
mystery of halving and spelling Boaz. He next explained
the meaning of the several emblems of this degree,
such as the three great lights of masonry, representing
the sun, moon, and Master of the lodge.The square
and compass, which teach the brethren in such a
beautiful
and definite manner to square their actions towards
one another, whatever sharp corners may thus be made
to jostle against the ribs of the luckless uninitiated
to circumscribe their conduct within due bounds, allowing
such extent to be fixed to that convenient epithet as their
own good judgement and circumstances shall dictate,all
of which thus furnish a great moral guide to the man as
well as the Masonfar superior, as many pious and
intelligent
of the brethren aver, to the Savior's golden rule,
Do unto others, &c., the latter being, as they say, too
indefinite for a practical guide by which to regulate their
conduct, or rather, we suppose, too general in its
application
to suit the system of ethics peculiar to this exalted
fraternity. And finally he took up the lectures at large,
by which Timothy obtained the valuable information that
the sun rises in the east and sets in the west, as
beautifully
shadowed forth in the respective stations of the Master
and Senior Warden of the lodge,that the twenty-four
inch gauge, or rule, properly represents the twenty-four
hours of the day, and was for that reason made just of that
length, and not, as is supposed by the unenlightened,
because
twelve inches make a foot, and a measure of an even
or unbroken number of feet is most convenient,that
Chalk,
Charcoal
and
Earth
, represent
Freedom, Fervency
and
Zeal
,
because chalk is free to be broken, or rubbed off
charcoal
is hot when it is burning, and the earth is zealous to
bring forth, &c. &c. All this, and a thousand other
equally
striking and instructive emblematical illustrations of this
degree were impressed on his understanding in the course
of these scientific lectures, expanding his mind with a new
stock of useful knowledge.
Having in this manner gone through his explanations of
the more prominent points of the lectures, Jenks now took
a general view of the principles they inculcated, and the
important instruction they afforded to the young aspirant
of this noble science. In short, he so eloquently
portrayed
the many beauties of this degree, that Timothy
began
to catch some bright gleams of the true light of
masonry
.
Although, to be sure, he had always supposed that
the sun rose in the east and set in the west, and that
charcoal
was apt to be hot when it was burning, yet he never
before dreamed that meaning of such deep import lay
hidden
under these simple facts; but the veil of his natural
blindness being now removed, he perceived the great
wisdom
they containeda wisdom which was impenetrably
concealed from the world, and, consequently, of which he
must have forever been deprived, had he never been
admitted
into the portals of this glorious temple of light, and
put in possession of the art of finding out new arts, and
winning the faculty of Abrac.
It now occurring to our hero that he had promised,
under
the most dreadful penalties, never to reveal, by
writing
,
printing, or otherwise, any of the secrets of masonry,
he asked Jenks how the book they then were reading came
to be printed, as it appeared to contain most of the secrets
and ceremonies of the degree he had taken.
Jenks replied, that this book, which was called Jachin
and Boaz, was doubtless a correct and perfect system of
masonry at the time it was first published, although not
strictly so in all respects now, as many improvements, and
some alterations in their signs and pass-words, to prevent
the uninitiated from getting into the lodge, had since been
made: still, being mainly correct, it was often used in the
lodges in lecturing, and might be profitably studied by all
young Masons. As to its publication, it was done by a
perjured wretch who had violated his oath by writing and
publishing it; and it was generally understood among the
craft that he had paid the just forfeit by the loss of his
life.
This last remark led Timothy to ask if all who revealed
the secrets of masonry were served in the same way.
To this Jenks replied, that any mason who divulged the
secrets would undoubtedly die for the crime; for, if he did
not kill himself, as their traditions informed them some
ancient
traitors had had the good conscience to do when
guilty of this crime, means would soon be taken to put such
a wretch out of existence. But, he said, Timothy would
much better understand these things when he was exalted
to the higher degrees, which, it was to be hoped, he would
soon take; for as yet he had seen comparatively nothing of
the glories of masonry which, at every degree as the
candidate
advanced along this great highway of light and
knowledge, were more and more brightly unfolded to his
view. Jenks then drew such a glowing picture of the
honors
and advantages of the higher degrees, that our hero,
who confessed to himself that his mind was not wholly
filled
with what he had seen in the first degree, soon resolved
to make another attempt to advance in this bright road to
perfection, and especially so when he was informed that
he had passed through the worst of the terrors, while all
the pleasures of the mystic Paradise, since he was now
fairly within its gates, remained to be enjoyed.
It was therefore arranged between them that Timothy,
at the next lodge meeting, should make application for
taking the two next higher degrees, provided he could
raise the requisite fees for the purpose; and he was to
take home the book, and carefully keeping it from all eyes,
make it his study till the next meeting of the lodge, that
he might be the better prepared for his intended
exaltation
.
Having spent many hours under this delightful shade,
in this pleasing and instructive manner, the two friends
were now about to separate, when an incident occurred,
which, having an immediate bearing on the subsequent
destinies of our hero, we shall proceed to relate, as is our
duty to do in every thing that has conspired to affect his
remarkable fortunes, however trivial it may appear at this
stage of our narrative, or unworthy the dignity of the
historian
of so renowned a personage.
F*
When our friends were on the point of separating, as I
have mentioned, they were suddenly startled by a loud
cracking of the bushes behind the old brush-fence that
extended
along the border of the woods, at the distance of
about ten rods from the tree under which they were
standing
.
The noise was soon repeated, and now plainly
appeared
to proceed from the irregular steps or bounds of
some heavy, slow-going quadruped on the approach
towards
them, while the sounds of the cracking brush were
followed, as the creature occasionally paused in his course,
by a sort of wheezing grunt, or blowing, not unlike that of
a hog suddenly falling into the water. Now, although
cowardice was no part of our hero's character, yet
possessing
,
in common with all other men, the instinct of
self-preservation
,
he soon felt a queer sensation of the blood
creeping over him as these ominous sounds struck his ear
his hair, too, suddenly grew refractory, and began to rise in
rebellion against the crown of his hat, and he prudently
suggested to Jenks, in the firmest terms that he was able
to command, the propriety of losing no time in putting a
little more distance between them and such suspicious
noises. The latter, however, who was more accustomed
to the animals of the woods, only uttered an impatient
`pshaw!' at our hero's timely suggestions, and bidding
him remain where he was, went forward to reconnoitre that
part of the woods from which these singular sounds
proceeded
.
After creeping up to the fence and peering thro'
awhile, Jenks quickly retreated, and cutting, with his
jackknife
,
a couple of good shelalahs on his way back, he came
up to Timothy, and with great glee told him that there
was an old bear with two small cubs slowly making their
way towards the clearing, with the intention, doubtless, of
entering the field, which was covered with wheat, then in
the milk. At this intelligence our hero's all-overishness
alarmingly increased, and like a good general, he quickly
cast his eyes round to discover and fix upon the best way
by which to effect a safe retreat, and seizing his friend by
the arm, pulled him along several steps, eagerly pointing
towards the nearest house, while his teeth (his tongue just
at that time being strangely forgetful of its office) made a
most chattering appeal to the obdurate heart of the other,
and did their best to second their owner's pantomimic
request
for immediate flight. Pooh! pooh! coolly
replied
Jenks, a pretty story if two such chaps as you and I
should run for an old bear and two little scary cubs! Here,
take one of these clubs, and stand by like a man.They
will soon be over the fence, and if we can frighten off the
old one, perhaps we can catch or kill one or both the young
ones.Follow me, and make no noise. So saying, Jenks,
with Timothy following almost mechanically at his heels,
led the way into the grain to a station from which they
could sally out and cut off the retreat of the bears. Here
stooping down, they awaited the approach of the foe in
silence
.
In a few moments a loud cracking was heard in
the old fence; and immediately after, a rustling among
the grain told them that the objects of their solicitude
were fairly in the field. Keep cool, Tim, whispered
Jenks, carefully raising himself till he could peep over the
grain, keep perfectly coolwait till they get a little
further
into the field. There, then! come on now, and do as
you see me!
With this he rushed furiously forward, swinging his hat
and screaming at the top of his voice, and came close
upon
the astonished animals before they could discover,
over-topped
as they were by the tall, thick-standing wheat,
whence this terrible out-cry came from, and on what side
the storm was about to burst upon them. The old bear,
however, quickly rallied, and throwing herself on her
haunches, and flourishing her broad boxers, tendered
battle
to her antagonist in a style that would have done
honor
to the most eminent pugilist of christianized England.
The poor cubs were immensely frightened, and, taking
different
directions, bounded off with all their might, one
towards
the beech tree, and the other, as fate would have it,
directly towards Timothy, who stood like a statue, in the
very place where Jenks had left him. But the instant he
saw this horrid young monster making towards him, his
faculties immediately rose with the occasion, and uttering
such a yell as scarce ever did a hero before him, he struck
a line in the direction his eye had before marked out for
a retreat, and, throwing one hasty glance over his
shoulder
,
in which he saw his friend engaged with the old bear,
one cub climbing the beech, and the other close to his
heels, run like a deer from the scene of action, clearing
the top of the grain at every leap, and crying `help!' and
`murder!' at every breath.
Meanwhile the battle was waged with manful courage
on both sides by the combatants still on the field; and the
issue might have been doubtful perhaps, but for the
sudden
movement of our hero just described: for the cub
that ran towards him receiving a fresh fright from the
sturdy outcries of the latter in his retreat, quickly halted,
and after making several confused tacks about in the
grain, finally came round in sight of its dam, and ran off
into the woods. The old bear seeing this, and being
satisfied
with saving one of her family, or supposing both to
have escaped, at once relinquished the battle, and fled in
the same direction. Jenks being thus relieved in this
hazardous
contest, immediately bethought himself of the cub
in the tree, and at once determined to secure it. With
this purpose in view, he stripped some strong pieces of elm
bark from a neighboring tree, and began to climb the
beech, near the top of which he could soon perceive the
motionless form of the cub firmly grappling the forking
branches. After considerable difficulty, he came within
sight of the animal, which suffered him to approach
without
starting, when carefully working a bark noose round its
hinder legs, he firmly tied them to the trunk of the tree,
and then soon succeeded in getting a pocket-handkerchief
over its head, and thus finally so blinded and muffled the
creature as to render it nearly harmless. This achieved,
Jenks untied its legs from the tree and commenced his
descent
,
leaving it the use of its fore paws to cling around
the body of the tree as he gradually pulled it down
backwards
.
While Jenks was thus engaged in this slow and
somewhat
difficult process of bringing down his sable captive,
Timothy, who had reached a neighboring house, and
borrowed
a gun and ammunition, hove in sight, now
gallantly
returning to the rescue, advancing with a sort of
desperate
determination in his looks, with his piece snugly bro't
to his shoulder, levelled and cocked for instant aim. When
within thirty or forty rods of the tree where he had left
one of the enemy lodged, he halted, and shutting his eyes,
boldly pulled away at the top; but his faithless gun only
flashed in the pan, and he was coolly preparing to try it
again, when taking a hasty glance at the tree, he perceived
a rustling among the branches. No time was now to be
lost; and he fell to priming and flashing with all his might,
till the clicking of the lock arrested the attention of Jenks,
who at the same time catching a glimpse of his friend's
motions, became alarmed, and sung out lustily to him to
forbear. Timothy was horror-struck at this discovery, and
he began most bitterly to reproach himself for suffering
his courage to carry him to such a pitch of rashness as to
lead him into such a dreadful risk of killing his friend; and
that friend too a masonic brother!The thought was
distracting
!
He was soon consoled, however, by the
information
that the battle was now over, and the enemy driven
into the woods, except one cub which, now disabled,
remained
as the trophy of the victory.
Jenks soon got safely down with the cub, and secured it
at the foot of the tree, when feeling curious to know by
what lucky cause he had so narrowly escaped being shot
at for a bear, he unloaded the musket, and found, to his
surprise and amusement, that our hero had, in loading his
gun, entirely overlooked the important article of powder,
making some amends for this oversight however by the
quantity of balls he had put in, no less than four of which
Jenks found snugly wadded down at the bottom of the
barrel.
The exploits of this eventful day being now brought to
a close, Jenks shouldered his ursine trophy, and the two
friends separated for their respective homes, both pleased
with their achievements, and both thankful, though for
different reasons, that they had outlived the dangers of
the battle.
CHAPTER VIII.
Still louder, Fame! thy trumpet blow;
Let all the distant regions know
Freemasonry is this:
Our
hero, after the romantic meeting, and the
attendant
occurrences mentioned in the last chapter, sat down
in good earnest to the study of Masonry. His whole soul
became gradually enlisted in the subject, and his every
leisure moment was devoted, with unremitting ardor, to
treasuring up the mystic beauties of this celestial science.
No longer troubled with those absurd scruples relative to
the Sabbath, which he entertained before he became
enlightened
by the liberal principles of masonry, he now
every
Sunday rode over to the residence of his friend, Jenks,
and spent the day with him in secret communion on that
theme in which they in common delightedthe one in
giving
and the other in receiving instruction. These
meetings
were also enlivened by recounting over their late
adventure
in cub-catching, and amusing themselves in
teaching
the now docile trophy of that heroic achievement such
various pranks and feats as they considered necessary to a
genteel ursine education. His master, perceiving in him
signs of his making a bear of uncommon talents, had
honored
him with the dignified name of
Boaz
an appellation
at first suggested by the title of the book under
consideration
at the time of his capture, and more especially by the
strength of a powerful grip which he gave Jenks on his
way homeward, which he likened to the masonic grip of
that name. And besides conferring the honor of a masonic
name, they taught him many accomplishments peculiar to
the craft.He would stand erect on his haunchescross
his throat with one paw, or cross his paws on his breast,
after the fashion of the sign and due-guard of the first
degree
,
as readily, when the same motions were made to him,
as the most expert Entered Apprentice in Christendom.
Nor were his masonic attainments limited to one degree
only
:
the due-guard & sign of the Fellow-Crafts, and the
Master's
sign of distress, were also familiar to himthe latter
of which he was wont to make whenever he wanted an ear
of green-corn, or an apple. In short, Boaz was fast
becoming
a bright Mason, and would doubtless soon have made
a great adept in the mysteries of the craft, could he have
taken the obligations, and have been made to understand
the preference which is due to the brotherhood. In no
other respects need he have been deficient; for none
certainly
could be better calculated by nature for many of the
high and active duties of the order than he. In the
execution
of the penalties, he would have been justly
eminent
.Jeremy
L. Cross himself, would not have been able
to rip open the left breast of a traitor, pluck out his heart,
or tear open his bowels and scatter them on all sides to
the four winds of heaven, with more masonic accuracy.
But to return to our hero: Such was his intense
application
to the task of perfecting himself in the study of
Freemasonry, that before the next lodge-meeting he had
committed to memory the whole of Jachin and Boaz, which,
with the instructions received from Jenks, had made him
master of the first degree, and given him considerable
insight
into the two next succeeding. Jenks became proud
of his pupil, and began to prophecy bright things of his
future
usefulness and eminence among the order. His
progress
was indeed unrivalled, but no greater perhaps than
might have been anticipated from one of his retentive
memory, and from one whose mighty genius was so well
calculated by nature to grasp the peculiar sublimities of
the mystic science. The next lodge-meeting therefore
found him fully prepared to meet his intended exaltation.
He had taken up his wages at Joslin's to the present time,
which furnished him with the means not only of paying the
additional fees required for taking the two next degrees,
but of getting a new coat and several other articles of
dress that were required, as he conceived, by the dignity
of the important station to which he was about to be
exalted
,
and at the same time leaving a few dollars for the usual
disbursements of the lodge-room. Thus every way
prepared
,
he once more set out for the tavern where he had
lately
encountered the appalling scenes of his initiation. He
did not, however, proceed at this time with the same urgent
speed as when he passed over the road before; nor were
his feelings raised to the same pitch of excitement. The
first sight of the house, as he approached, to be sure
caused
a chill and shudder to run over him, as it brought fresh
to mind the trials and terrors he had there passed through;
but these sensations quickly vanished as he recollected the
cheering light which there burst upon him at last in
rereward
for those fearful trials; and more especially as he
cast his thoughts forward to the still brighter glories and
honors before him.
He now entered the lodge-room, and not a little
gratified
and elated were his feelings at the warm and cordial
greetings with which he was received by the assembled
brotherhood. The lodge having been apprised of his wish
to take the next degrees in order, he now retired, while
they proceeded to the balloting; and all being again
announced
clear, they now immediately commenced the
ceremonies
of raising him to the degree of Fellow-Craft, or
passing him, as it is technically termed. But as the
ceremonies
of taking this degree are, in many respects,
similar
to those which I have already described in the account
given to Timothy's initiation, and besides being now
performed
on one who was in a measure prepared to meet
them without surprise so as to produce no very remarkable
effects on his mind, I shall pass lightly over this degree
mentioning only a few of the most prominent acquisitions
in knowledge which our hero made in the interesting and
beautiful lectures of the Fellow-Craft, which I deem of
too much importance to be omitted. He here was taught
that important fact in physiology that that there are five
human senses, viz: hearing, seeing, feeling, smelling and
tasting,the three first of which are considered the most
essential among Masons, though the last, I opine, is not
considered
to be altogether superfluous. He likewise was
instructed
into the learned intricacies of lettering and halving
Jachin, and was greeted by that appellation of wisdom in
reward for his triumph over the arduous difficulties of the
task. And lastly, the uses of that beautiful moral emblem,
the plumb, were illustrated to his understanding, and its
monitory suggestions impressed on his heart: for that
instrument
,
he was told, which operative masons use to raise
perpendiculars, taught, or admonished free and accepted
Masons to walk uprightly, or perpendicularly in their
several
stations before God and man. This last
hieroglyphical
maxim of moral duty which masonry, in her astute
sagacity
,
has so naturally deduced from that instrument,
forcibly
reminded our hero of an epitaph which he had
somewhere
read:
Here lies Jemmy Tickiler
Who served God perpendicular.
And although he never before could see the force of this
epitaph, yet he now at once saw its beautiful application,
and immediately knew that it must have originated from
the genius of masonry. But as important and interesting
as these discoveries wereas much as these, and the
thousand
other beauties of this instructive degree were
calculated
to expand the mind, and awaken the admiration of
our hero, still they were nothingcomparatively nothing,
to the treasures of knowledge which were opened to his
wondering view in the next, or Master Mason's degree.
The ceremonies of raising were, in the first place,
peculiarly
solemn and impressive: And connected as they are
with an account of the death of the traitors, Jubelo,
Jubela
,
Jubelum, and the murder of the Grand Master, Hiram
G
Abiff, thus furnishing many historical facts, a knowledge
of which can be obtained only through the medium of
masonry
,
these ceremonies of themselves unfolded to his mind
information of the utmost importance. The circumstance,
too, that the body of Hiram had lain fourteen days without
corruption, in the hot climate where the incident
occurred
,
particularly excited his wonder, as the event could be
attributed only to a miracle, thus furnishing proof to his
mind that this institution, like the Christian religion, was
founded in miracles. To this marvellous circumstance,
which struck our hero so forcibly, another not less curious
and wonderful, I think might be addedI mean the
singular
coincidence involved in the fact that three men, as
above mentioned, should happen to come togetherbe of
the same fraternity, and all traitors, whose names, all of
one beginning, should so nearly furnish the grammatical
declination of a Latin adjective! Nor need our
admiration
stop here; for when we consider that these men were
all Hebrews, whose language is so dissimilar to that of the
Latin, and that they lived in an age too when the Romans
and their language were unknown at Jerusalem, our
surprise
is still more excited; and being unable, by the help
of our own limited faculties, to comprehend these
miraculous
circumstances, we are compelled to stop short, and
pause in wonder over the extraordinary events which are
connected with the early history of this ancient institution.
But however important the ceremonies of this august
degree
may be considered as establishing the divine origin of
Freemasonry, and as throwing new light over some
passages
in the history of antiquity, they still yield in
importance
to the moral beauties, the lofty sentiment, and the
scientific knowledge illustrated and enforced in the
lectures
.
Here a grand fountain of wisdom is opened to the
candidate; and it was here that our hero revelled in
intellectual
luxury.It was here for the first time in his life
that he became acquainted with that interesting
philological
fact that masonry and geometry are synonymous terms,
a discovery to which the world is undoubtedly indebted to
the light of masonry; for Crabbe, (a shame on him!)
notwithstanding
his learned industry in collecting the
synonymes
of our language, appears to be wholly ignorant of this
curious fact. Here he learned, while receiving an account
of the construction of Solomon's Temple, another fact in
history entirely new to him, that it never rained in the
day-time during the seven years in which the temple was
building,a fact which can be considered none other
than a miracle; and, as the temple is known to have been
the production of masonry solely, goes still further to prove
that the institution is divine, and under the immediate
protection
of Heaven. Here too he learned the reason and
justice of inflicting the penalties of the obligations on
traitors
,
as illustrated in the example of the great and good
Solomon, the acknowledged father of organized
Freemasonry
.
But time, and the narrow limits of this brief work,
will not allow me to proceed any farther in recounting the
various scientific discoveries which our hero here made
the many moral maxims that were impressed on his heart,
and the thousand instances of the sublime and beautiful
that burst on his mind. Suffice it to say, that all were
equally
instructive, important and wonderful with those I have
enumerated. But not only all these important acquisitions
in knowledge did our hero make on this eventful evening,
but he won the unanimous applause of his brethren by the
becoming manner in which he bore himself through the
whole ceremonies, and which more than atoned for his
wayward obstinacy and awkwardness at his initiation, and,
in the minds of all present, gave bright promise of his
future
masonic eminence:while the hearty good humor
with which he entered into the convivialities of the
evening
,
in time of refreshment, began to render him the
favorite
of the lodge-room, and he was universally voted a
bright Mason.
Being now clothed with his apron and the badges of
a Master Mason, and greeted, as he continually was, with
the dignified title of Worshipful, he began to feel the
responsibilities
of his station, and the importance with which
his existence had become invested. He assumed a more
manly stepa more lofty mien; and conscious worth and
consequence gave the air of majesty to his whole
demeanor
.
Thus ended the important events of this evening, which
constituted a bright era in the life of our hero, and
implanted
in his bosom a love for this noble institution which
was never eradicated.
Nothing of any particular interest occurred to our hero
till the next lodge-meeting, when the Senior Warden
having
left the town, he was almost unanimously elected to
fill that important and honorable station. And a candidate
having been presented for initiation, he found an
opportunity
to display his masonicac quirements, which he did with
such brilliancy and promptitude as to draw forth repeated
applause from his admiring brethren. An extra meeting
of the lodge was, a few days after, holden, at which he rose
still higher, and took the three next degrees, viz: Mark,
Past, and Most Excellent Master, which carried him to the
seventh round in the ladder of Masonry. Such was the
unparalleled progress, and such the starting career of the
man who was destined to become so proud a pillar in this
glorious fabric.
About this time Joslin, Timothy's employer, sought an
interview with him, and told him that a settlement would
be agreeable. Timothy could see no necessity for such a
measure; but Joslin, without heeding our hero's
observations
to this effect, opened his account-book, and began
to figure up the amount due after deducting what had been
received; and after he had ascertained the sum, he turned
to Timothy and asked him if it was correct? I presume
it may be, replied Timothy, but`But what?' said
Joslin`You have become a great man since I employed
you, Mr. Peacock, and I cannot any longer see you stoop
to labor which is so much beneath a person of your
consequence
:
Here is your money. So saying, he threw down
the few dollars now Timothy's due, and, whirling on his
heel, left the house.
This was an unexpected affair; and Timothy scarcely
knew what to make of it.After musing however about
half an hour, he came to the conclusion that Joslin
wanted
he should go: But what had he done to render his
employer
dissatisfied?He could think of nothing. To be
sure, when alone in the field, he had often marked out a
lodge-room on the ground, and taking a stump, and
supposing
it a candidate, had lectured to it several hours at a
time. He had sometimes yoked the off ox the nigh side,
when his mind was deeply engrossed with this subject; and
he had that morning turned the horse into the oat-field
instead
of the pasture. But what of these trifling errors?
And were they not caused too by the intenseness of those
studies which were infinitely more important than the
insignificant
drudgeries which had been saddled upon him
by a man whose ignorance could never admit of his
appreciating
things of a higher character?
Our hero began to grow indignant as he thought over
these things; and he determined he would have nothing
more to do with Joslin, but leave his house that very day;
and, in revenge for his narrow-minded views, and base
conduct, forever deprive him and his family of those
services
and that society with which he had been too long
benefited
,
and his house too much honored.
Our hero was a person of great decision of character;
and what he resolved to do, he scarcely ever failed of
carrying
into immediate effect. Accordingly, in one hour
from the time Joslin left him, as above mentioned, he had
packed his bundle and was making tracks towards the
residence
of his friend, Jenks, for consultation and advice, and
perhaps a temporary home, not knowing where else to go
in this unexpected emergency.
Having arrived at the house of Jenks, and informed him
of what had happened at Joslin's, and that he had left that
gentleman's employ forever, the two friends walked out
into a field, and spent the remainder of the day in deep
and confidential consultation. Many plans for our hero's
future course were suggested and discussed, and as many,
G*
on weighing them, rejected. But a project was at length
hit upon by Jenks, which was finally adopted.This was
an excursion to the city of New-York to see what could
be made out of Boaz by exhibiting him as a show, or
selling
him to some caravan. In this enterprise they both were
to embark and become joint partners in all profits or
losses
that might arise out of the adventure. Jenks owned a
stout horse and waggon, half of which Timothy was to
purchase
,
paying down what he could spare, and giving a note
for the rest; while Boaz, being a kind of joint trophy, was
generously thrown into the company by Jenks,
notwithstanding
his greater claims to the animal, without any
charge to Timothy whatever. Jenks was a notable
schemer
.He
having but a small farm, which did not require
all his time to manage it, had generally, for the last
several
years, taken two or three trips a year in pedling goods
for a neighboring merchant; and he was now calculating
to take one of these pedling voyages as soon as he had
finished
his harvesting.But as soon as he thought of the
above mentioned plan, he concluded to forego his
ordinary
fall pedling trip, and engage in this, where he believed
there would be a chance of greater gain, though he knew
there would be considerable hazard: and for this reason
he rather undertake the enterprise with some one who would
run the risk of loss with him, and believing that Timothy's
personal appearance and gifts of speech might make him
highly serviceable to the company, he now entered heartily
into this scheme, ostensibly for the benefit of our hero
privately for his own.
The next day the bargain was matured in all its parts,
and all the necessary writings drawn. Timothy gave Jenks
twelve dollars for half of the waggon, and twenty-five for
an equal share of the horsethe latter, though an
excellent
stout horse, was lacking of an eye, and for that reason
had been named
Cyclops
by the late school-master of the
district, who being a Freshman at Burlington University,
when he taught the school the winter before, had drawn
this name from the vast depths of his classic lore, and
bestowed
it on the old horse in reward for his good service in
carrying him and his girl ten miles to a quilting.
The time for starting was now fixed by our two friends
at just one fortnight ahead; and for the interim Timothy
agreed to work for Jenks to enable him to complete his
harvesting, and be ready at the time.
While making these preparations for the intended
journey
,
the regular monthly meeting of the lodge came round,
when Jenks told Timothy that there was one degree in
Masonry
to which he was now entitled, and which might prove
of great advantage to him on their contemplated journey;
and he would advise our hero to take itit was called the
Secret Monitor, or Trading Degree.He, himself, had
found it of great service. Accordingly, at the
lodge-meeting
,
after the lodge was closed, this degree was privately
conferred upon Timothy, the obligation of which, as it
discloses
the principles and eminent advantages of this
invaluable
step in masonry, I must beg leave to insert at length.
It is as follows:
I, A. B., of my own free will and accord, in presence
of Almighty God, do hereby and hereon, most
solemnly
and sincerely promise and swear, that I will keep and
conceal all the secrets belonging to the Secret Monitor;
that I will not communicate this to any one except it be to
a true and lawful brother, Master Mason or Masons, whom
I shall have reason to believe will conform to the same.
I further promise that I will caution a brother Secret
Monitor
by word, token or sign, when I shall see him do, or
about to do, or say anything contrary to the true
principles
of Masonry. I further promise that I will caution a
brother Secret Monitor by word, token or sign, when I
shall see him do, or about to do, or say anything
contrary
to his own interest, either in buying or selling, or any other
way
. I further promise, that when so cautioned, I will
pause and deliberate upon the course I am about to
pursue
.
I further promise, that I will help, aid and assist a
brother Secret Monitor,
by introducing him into business,
sending him custom, or any other manner in which I may cast
a penny in his way
. I further promise, that I will commit
this obligation to memory immediately, or as soon as
possibly
consistent.All which I promise and swear, with a
firm and steadfast resolution to perform the same;
binding
myself under no less penalty than to have my heart
pierced through by the arrow of an enemy, or to be left
alone without a friend to assist in the day of trouble.So
help me God, and keep me steadfast to perform the same.
Such were the matchless beauties of this honorary
degree
of a Master Mason, which our hero now received with
no less pride than admiration! Nor was this the only honor
conferred on him that evening.About the middle of the
evening the Master of the lodge was called home by the
sudden illness of his wife, when the unexpected honor of
presiding over the lodge devolved on Timothy; and
nobly
did he sustain himself in discharging the functions of
that high station. After this meeting Jenks and Timothy
proceeded to more immediate preparations for their
expedition
.
At the suggestion of Jenks, they run up about
twenty pounds of tallow and bees-wax into black-balls,
using wheat-smut to give the tallow a coloring. They
then put up about a dozen junk-bottles of common water,
squeezing the juice of a few elder-berries into one, wild
turnip into another, and peppermint or wild annis into a
third, and so on, to give them some peculiar tint or taste,
no matter what; and labelling these bottles all with
different
names and epithets, such as certain cure for
consumption
,cure
for corns, &c. &c. These and
various
other domestic manufactures were prepared and put
up for pedling on the way. A large box fitted to the
waggon
,
and properly aried with gimblet-holes, was made to
accommodate Boaz; while due care was bestowed upon
him to perfect his accomplishment before introducing him
into the world: all of which, having now become nearly
grown to the size of ordinary bears, and well nurtured in
intellect, he acquired with surprising readiness and
docility
.
CHAPTER IX.
Love's but an ague that's revers'd,
Whose
hot
fit takes the patient first;
That after burns with
cold
as much
As iron in Greenland does the touch.
Nature
, it is sometimes said, often smiles auspiciously
on those undertakings which are fraught with important
benefactions to man. When the birds flew to the right,
the chickens fed well, and Sol unveiled his smiling features,
then, and then only would the sagacious old Romans
commence
any important undertaking. In what direction the
birds flew, on the morning that our two friends set forth on
their journey, it was not noticed; but certain it is, that
the numerous brood of dame Jenks' chickens manifested
no lack of appetite on that memorable occasion: and a
bright October's sun burst smilingly through the thick and
humid mantle of mist and fog that had closely wrapt,
through the night, the head waters of the sluggish Otter,
as they applied the string to the back of old Cyclops, and
rattled off on their intended enterprise. The learned
Boaz
had been duly boxed and shipped aboard their
partnership
vehicle, and a stock of provisions laid in, consisting of
baked meats and bread for the biped, and soft corn, sweet
apples, and oats, for the quadruped portion of this
distinguished
party, which might have served a company of
Bedouins
for crossing the great desert of Africa. They did
not strike immediately into the main road leading to the
west, but by common consent took a by-road which
passed
through a thinly inhabited part of the country, and,
after
a circuit of some half dozen miles, came into the direct
road to New-York. This aberation, indeed, cost old
Cyclops
four or five additional miles' travel, but it enabled
them wholly to avoid the village of examination-memory,
which our hero had resolved should never again enjoy the
light of his presence, and thus saved him from the violation
of vows that both he and his friend, in the present instance,
seemed equally anxious to preserve inviolate.
Nothing of particular interest happened to our
travellers
during their first day's journey. Having their
provisions
with them, and not expecting to reap any emoluments
by the exhibition of Boaz while in Vermont, or accumulate
much by their exertions as pharmacopolists till they had
reached a more gullable people than those
jacks-at-all-trades
and professions, the inhabitants of the
Green-Mountains
,
they stopped at neither private house or tavern
during
the day; and at night, after a diligent day's drive,
they found themselves in the vicinity of the Hudson, and
many miles within that great political bee-hive, the State
of New-York, where a numerous array of proud and
luxurious
queen-bees are generously allowed all the honey for
governing the `workies.'
About dark they hauled up at the door of a kind of
farmer's
tavern, situated adjacent to a pine plain, which was
now on fire, while the country for some miles round was
enveloped in a dense cloud of smoke, through which a
thousand lights from stump and tree were beginning to
twinkle with the gathering shades of the approaching
evening. The landlord, an easy, though rather of a
sneaking
looking personage, came out, with his pipe in his
mouth, and greeted our travellers as they drove up to the
door. Our hero immediately leaped out of the waggon,
and, with a dignity of demeanor suitable to his elevated
standing in masonry, returned the salutation of the host,
while at the same time, seizing the hand of the latter, he
gave him a hearty grasp. What a dl of a grip you
have, stranger! said the landlord, as wincing with pain
he withdrew his own passive hand from the vice-like
squeeze of Timothy's fingersYou must be a southerner,
I guess, for they always shake hands with a fellow whether
they have ever seen him before or not; but they don't
knudge in among a body's knuckles so, as I knows of.
`Ah! he has never been admitted to the glorious light of
masonry,' thought Timothy, with a sigh.
Landlord, said Jenks, now taking upon himself the
character of spokesman, we should like to put up with
you to-night provided we can pay you in our way, and we
are willing to give you an excellent bargain.
`Your way?' asked the other, giving a suspicious glance
at the waggon, `your way!what mought that be, if I
may be so bold?'
Why, replied Jenks, we have a live bear for show,
and
`A live bear!' peevishly interrupted the man`Pho!
pish! pshaw!'
Yes, a fine one! but hear me, said Jenks, somewhat
abashed at the other's sneershear me through: we ask
twenty-five cents a person for a sight, and if you will keep
us, you, and all your family, shall see the animal, which, I
presume, will amount to much more than the reckoning;
so you will be making quite a spec!
`A curious spec that!' said the landlord`I would give
about three skips of a flea to see your bearI was out to
a great hunt on the mountains the other day, and help'd
kill four as loud bears as ever was seen: But I won't ax
any thing better than money for your keeping; and that
you have enough of, I'll warrant.Come, come, none of
your Yankee tricks for meI used to be a Yankee myself
once, and understand a thing or two about their
contrivances
to get along on the road.'
At this declaration, which conveyed the startling
intelligence
that their host was a fellow-countryman, our
travellers
concluded to say no more about Boaz by way of
paying
their fare, but to put up on the offered conditions; so,
after seeing Cyclops well stabled and fed, and Boaz safely
locked up in the barn, they all went into the house, and
entered into conversation.
Would it not, said Timothy, as the landlord left the
room for a moment, would it not, Brother Jenks, be more
complaisant with the dignity of our station to take some
hot digestibles to-night? My appetite begins to be
somewhat
excruciating, and I propound that we take a supper
like gentlemen.
`My appetite, under such circumstances, would have
been as keen as yours before I was married, I presume,
Timothy,' replied the other, glancing, with a comical smile,
at a rosy-cheeked girl in the next room, on whom our
hero's
eyes had been all the while rivited, `and as it is, I
have no objection to what you say.'
The landlord then entering the room, a supper was
accordingly
bespoken, and while it was in preparation the
garrulous host took a seat with his guests, and resumed
his discourse.
So, you are from old Varmount, you say, began mine
host. Well, I was original born in Cornetercut.
`Ah!' said Jenks, `then I don't wonder you understand
so much about Yankee contrivances, as you call them:
Did you ever follow the business of pedling?'
Not by a jug-full, Mister, replied the otherI never
was one of your wooden nutmeg fellers, I'll warrant it.
But I peddled love and larnin to some purpose when I fust
come to York State, I tell yehe-he he!
`Why, how was that?' asked Jenks.
I was goin' to tell you, said the host.As soon as
I got my edifercation parfect, I steered for York State, and
teached in one of the low counties among the Dutch till I
got acquainted with a young wider with an only darter,
when we soon struck up a bargain, and moved up to this
farm, which fell to her as her portion out of her father's
estate, and here we all are, pretty well to do in the world,
as you may say.
`We don't make our fortunes quite so easy as that in
Vermont,' observed Jenks.
No, rejoined the other, I never could see how you
all contrive to live in that cold, barren, out-of-the-way
region
.
Why, I once travelled a piece into the
Green-Mountains
about the middle of June, and going by a log-hut, I
saw a man planting potatoes with his great coat on,it
was then about ten oclock in the forenoon.At sundown
I returned by the same place, & found the man to work
digging
his potatoes up again.So, thinking this was rather
queerish, I stopped and axed him what he was doing that
for, when he said he didn't dare to trust his potatoes in the
ground over night for fear they would freeze! he did, as
true as my name is Jonas Bidwellhe-he he!
`Was that,' retorted Jenks, somewhat nettled at the
taunt thus thrown at his native state, as well as at the
boisterous
and self-applauding laugh of the landlord at his
happy
delivery of this witty story, `was that about the time
when the Yorkers were so anxious to possess `this cold,
barren, out-of-the-way place,' that they came on in large
numbers and tried to drive the owners from their farms, so
that they could live there themselves, but getting
handsomely
basted with beech clubs, or beech-sealed as it was
called, retreated as fast as their legs would carry them,
leaving the Green-Mountain Boys to enjoy the sour grapes
to themselves?'
I don't know any thing about that, said the landlord,
still chuckling at his own storybut the potatoes
he-he
he!
`But the Beech-Sealers,' rejoined Jenks, imitating the
tone of the other`what a cold, barren place Vermont has
ever since been with the Yorkers!ha-ha ha!'
Just at this moment the landlady, a short, fat, chubby
figure, that would have rolled down a hill one way as well
as the other, came waddling into the room, stopping every
two or three steps to take breath, or a fresh puff at her
pipe,Shonas! said she, addressing her husband, as she
dropped into her chair with a force that shook the whole
house,Shonas! Pe Cot! You look tam vell here in ter
house ven ter vire ish purnin all mine vinter crain up! I
can take care dese Cot tam Yankee petlars ash petter ash
you.So pe off to vatch ter vire all night, or ter hell take
yer!
The obedient husband, who had sunk into silence the
moment his bigger half made her appearance, no sooner
heard the promulgation of this ukase than he took his hat
and sneaked out of the house to his appointed task. The
landlady then entertained our travellers with many a story
about her farm, which Shonas, she said, a coot fellow
H
enough, help her carry on; and enlarged with much
apparent
interest on her stock of cattle, giving even the
pedigree
of her calves and colts, and finally wound up the
history
of her prospects by saying, Tank mine Cot, I havn't
seen ter pottom of mine milk-tup dese twenty years!
This last observation our travellers better understood
when they sat down to supper, which in the meanwhile had
been announced as ready, and which consisted, among
other
things, of bonnyclabber, a favorite dish with the Dutch.
They, it is said, always keep a tub in one corner of the
pantry, for the purpose of making and keeping this
sine qua non
of their tables; it being manufactured by adding
every day a quantity of new milk, always leaving, when
they use out of it, (unless forced by necessity to use the
whole) a portion of the old in the bottom of the tub to turn
these daily additions into this delectable beverage. Hence
the Dutchman's thermometer of prosperity is his milk-tub.
At supper, our travellers were attended by the
landlady's
daughter, to whom allusion has before been made.
Nature, as regarded the family stock, here seemed to be in
a process of rapid improvement, without being very badly
cramped for room for her operations; for the daughter, in
features, was to the mother, after making every reasonable
allowance for the ravages of time, as Hebe to Hecate. But
aside from this, and difference of diameter, if a gauger's
term be admissible in this connection, the girl was a chip
of the old block, which she abundantly proved by retorting
all the jokes cracked upon her by her guests with a spirit
equalled only by the refinement and delicacy of her
language
.
Our hero being the young man of the party, and
having been somewhat smitten from the first by her
appearance
withal, particularly attempted to display his
gallantry
;
all of which she met with such jocose freedom that he
proceeded with her to the highest pitch of sociability;
and, by the time that supper was over, and the table
cleared
off, he began to feel, as she turned her little twinkling
black eyes upon him, rather queer about the inwards.
Jenks now going out to see to old Cyclops and Boaz, left
our enamored swain to the enjoyment of more privacy with
his spanking sweetheartan opportunity which he did not
fail to improve; and soon getting into a romp with her,
he became emboldened to throw out hints which most
damsels, who reckon themselves among the household of
Diana, might have perhaps resented. Not so, however,
with the lively Katreen; for she, like most of her
country-women
,
I believe, not holding to restricting the liberty of
debate on one subject more than another, met Timothy more
than half way in all his advances; and, as far as words
were concerned, fairly beat him on his own ground. By
the time they had been performing their domestic waltz
half an hour or so, our hero could have sworn he was in
love, with as clear a conscience as Uncle Toby had done
before him, after the rubbing operation by the soft hand
of Widow Wadman. By the way, I wonder if the
fashionable
dances, known by the appellation of waltzes, did not
originate in a hint taken from Uncle Toby's courtship. I
can think of no other supposition so probable when the
similar operations and results of the two performances are
fairly considered.
Jenks now coming in, deprived Timothy of further
opportunity
of prosecuting his suit at this time, and of making
some direct propositions which he was about to do when
thus interrupted in his amorous parlance, and which, he
had no doubt would be favorably received.
It was now bed-time, and our hero was reluctantly
compelled
to retire with Jenks, leaving his conquest, as he
believed
,
on the very point of its achievement. Their
sleeping
apartment was one of the front rooms of the house, the
other front room being used as the bar-room, while a long
room in the rear of these, answering the purpose of
kitchen
,
bed, and dining-room, completed the ground work of the
building, which was of one story with a Dutch roof, and a
long, low piazza in front.
As soon as our travellers were by themselves in their
sleeping-room, Jenks at once proceeding to disrobe
himself
,
began talking on the subject of their journey, while
Timothy, taking a chair, and, without seeming to heed the
observations of his companion, sat some time silent and
abstracted. On perceiving this, the former inquired the
cause; and, after pumping and rallying him awhile,
succeeded
in reviving his usual ingenuousness, and making
him confess the reason of his sudden entrancement. Just
at this time, our hero, with the quick ears of love, caught
the sounds of the footsteps of his fair one in the chamber
above him bustling about in preparation for bed. The
ancients represented the god of love as blinda wight, of
course, who never looked before he leaped. By this,
nothing
more was intended, doubtless, than that he was
considered
a rash, short-sighted and foolish fellow; but I have
frequently suspected, from his so often deliberately
instigating
his devotees to acts which result in their total
discomfiture
,
and from the design so often apparent in the
mischief which he seems to delight in occasioning, that
this deity is much more of a knave than a numb-skull; and
that this, after all, is the only reason why
The course of true love never did run smooth.
Timothy, having noticed that there were several
windows
in the roof of the house within reaching distance of
the top of the piazza, and knowing that one of these must
open from the chamber of his charmer, now formed the
chivalrous project of scaling the outward walls which
enclosed
the bright prize of his affections. This resolution
was no sooner taken than communicated to his companion.
These Dutch minxes, coolly observed the latter, are
clear pepper-pots for grit; and if this one should happen
to take a snuff at your climbing up to her window, Tim, I
would not warrant your pate from all damage short of
money.
`O, no trouble there,' said the other eagerly, `for I have
ascertained for an intense certainty that she has taken a
most amorous conviction for me.'
It may be as you suppose, rejoined Jenks, for I saw
that you and she were as thick as two cats in a bag, in the
supper-room; but have you thought, Brother Timothy, of
the possibility of your violating your masonic obligations
if you go on in this affair? How do you know that this girl
is not a Master Mason's daughter?
`Why!' replied our hero, `I gave the old man as
derogatory
a grip as ever was given to a brother, when we first
met him at the door, and he returned it no more than the
most dormant cowan in existence!'
Well, but her own father, said Jenks, is dead
perhaps
he was a Mason.
`Allowing your conjectural supposition to be true,'
observed
the other, somewhat staggered, `do you think the
obligation was meant to be amplified and distended to a
Mason's wife or daughter after he is dead?'
I rather think, replied the elder votary of mystic
morality
,
that the obligation does not bind us, in this
respect
,
after a brother's death; though it doubtless would
extend to a brother's widow in a matter of charity. But
you are on sure ground for another reason, which I guess
you never thought of, Timothy.The oath says, `you shall
not violate a brother Master's wife, sister or daughter,
knowing
them to be such.'Now, when you don't
know
that a woman is a relation to a brother of such a degree,
you can't of course infringe on your obligation, whatever
you may do. So you see you are safe in this case; but I
thought I would see how you would get along with my
questions. Thus you see that our obligations, when you
come to look at their true meaning, are not so rigid after
all; for even at the worst, this caution applies only to
Masters'
relations; and as to the female connections of
Entered
Apprentices and Fellow-Crafts, I know of nothing in
masonry that forbids us to meddle with them if we wish,
much less as regards all the rest of the sex who have not
the honor to be related to Masons of any degree; for to
enjoy ourselves with these is, I take it, one of the
privileges
that masonry bestows on her trusty followers.
Timothy, who had been somewhat startled by the naming
of his masonic obligations, and once or twice perplexed
H*
by the questions thus unexpectedly put to him on the
subject
which occupied his mind, was now happily relieved
from his doubts and misgivings by the explanation of his
more experienced masonic friend, and, entirely coinciding
with the latter in opinion respecting the latitude which his
obligations implied, began in earnest to think of his
nocturnal
enterprise.
As soon, therefore, as all was quiet below, of which he
was soon assured by hearing the old lady pitch the pipes
of her nasal melody, he crept carefully out of the front
door, and, after taking a hasty observation at the heights
to be surmounted, and the situation of the window that
opened into his fancied Elysium, he began to climb a post
of the piazza. This, after a hard struggle, he happily
effected
.
Being now on the top of the piazza, which was
almost flat, he found no difficulty in walking along till he
came under the window in question. Here he paused to
consider what might be the most suitable manner of
making
known his presence to the fair object of his visit. As
soon as he had made up his mind upon this delicate, though
important subject, and screwed up his courage to the
sticking
point, he reached up, and, taking hold of the window
stool, and bracing his feet against the steep slant of the
roof beneath it as he mounted, raised himself till he could
look into the window, which, it being a warm night, the
unsuspicious occupant had fortunately left open. Now,
said Timothy, in a whispered ejaculation, now may the
gods of love and masonry inspire me. And, for the
double
purpose of awakening the respectful admiration of his
charmer by making known his masonic quality, and at the
same time enrapturing her with the melody of verse, he
commenced chanting, in the soft, winning accents of love,
one of those delicate and beautiful little stanzas of
masonic
poesy which are forever the pride and boast of mystic
minstrelsy
To Masons and to Masons' bairns,
And women both with wit and charms
Who love to lie in Masons' arms.
The bitches! I wish they were deadcaterwauling
round the house all night, muttered the half-roused
sleeper
,
between dreaming and thinking.
Our hero, feeling somewhat mortified in finding that his
own sweet notes should be mistaken by his drowsy
inamorata
for the music of some nocturnal band of feline
performers
,
and perceiving by her snoring that she was again
relapsing into slumber, resolved to regale her ears with a
livelier strain, though with a text no less beautiful and
appropriate
:
Then round the circle let the glass,
Yet in the square, convivial pass;
And when the sun winds o'er the lea
Each lass shall have
her
jubilee.
That aint the cats! exclaimed the damsel in tones of
alarm, starting up in her bed,what's that in the window!
Who are you?
`O it is I,' replied Timothy, with a most affectionate
simpering of voice`it is only I, the gentleman who had
the connubial conversation with you in the supper-room,
and could not rest for thinking of the pelucid
embellishments
of your charms.'
And what, replied the girl, who had become
thoroughly
awake during this gallant speech, and what, Mr.
Pelucid
Embellishment, do you want here? It strikes me that
you won't be much more apt to rest, if you stay here long,
than you would in your own room where you ought to be.
`O, celestial charmer!' exclaimed our hero, `do not
cause my extraction forever! I know your internals must
bleed with the most amorous propensities for my anxious
condition! I am a high Mason; and
We're true and sincere
We all love the fair
They'll trust us on any occasion.
Well, Sir, said Katreen coolly, if you are one of
those wise fellers that strut about with aprons as solemn
as a pack of old women at a granny-gathering,
I will trust
you on this occasion
with a secret: do you want I should
tell it?
`O, I should be extremely extatic to hear it,' replied
Timothy, overjoyed at this supposed symptom of her
relenting
.
Well, then, said she, in no very mild accents, if you,
Sir, don't make yourself scarce in two minutes, I'll give
you something that will make you keep as long as a
pickled
lobster!that's all.
`O, you lily of cruelty!' exclaimed our swain, `O, don't
retard my congenial anxieties, but let me come in: I shall
propagate no noise.'
No, nor any thing else, I guess, said she, tartly; but
I shall though, she continued, leaping out of bed, I shall
thoughscamp of impudence! Will you be gone?
But Timothy, notwithstanding the ominous tones of her
voice, and the rather unloving nature of her remarks, which
might, perhaps, have discouraged one of a less gallant and
sanguine disposition, still persisted in thinking that she was
merely joking, and not believing that she could seriously
be otherwise than enraptured with him, became the more
emboldened as he beheld this fearless daughter of
Amsterdam
standing in her night-clothes beside her bed,
apparently
waiting his approach; and he began to make a
movement to climb into her window. Perceiving this,
she sharply bid him desist, or he should repent it.
Timothy
begged her not to speak so loud, lest she should raise
the folks in the house.
I can help myself, I thank you, she replied, without
calling any assistance; and I will do it too, to your sorrow.
Our hero hearing that she did not wish to alarm the
house, and feeling no great apprehensions on any other
score, now boldly began to mount the window; but
scarcely
had he thrust his head over the threshold of his fancied
paradise, when, (shade of Dean Swift, inspire me to tell
it!) the hidden reservoirs of that paradise were suddenly
uncapta masked battery was unexpectedly opened upon
the unconscious victim, and its projected torrent of liquid
wrath, coming with fatal aim, met him full in the face with
a force that nearly swept him from the window-stool with
the shock!
There! take that, stupid puppy! exclaimed the
gentle
angel within, and if that an't enough, I've got
another
in store for you. It will be quite an addition to your
pelucid embellishments
, I apprehend.
Then Cupid shriek'd, and bade the house farewell.
Reader! did you ever shoot a squirrel in a tree-top? If
you have, and noticed how suddenly he fell from his hold
as the messengers of death reached his heart, then you
may form some idea how quickly our hero dropped from
the window on to the piazza below on receiving this
deadly
shot from the fortress of his charmer.
Almost all diseases, in this age of physiological research,
have their specific remedies: and why not love among the
rest? But when Byron, in his wicked wit, while treating
of the antidotes of this complaint, said or sung
But worst of all is nausea or pain
About the lower regions of the bowels,
Love who breathes heroically a vein,
Shrinks from the application of hot towels,
he must have been wholly ignorant, I think, of the
efficacy
of that potion which was thus promptly administered to
our heroa potion no sooner taken than his Cyprian
fever
,
with all its hallucination and burning agonies, left
him instantly and forever. The lovely and the loved one,
whom, one moment before, his fancy had invested with all
the charms and graces of the Houri, was now to his
disenthralled
senses....bah! he could not endure to think of her.
His first thoughts were involuntarily employed in making
this metamorphosehis second were turned to his own
condition: and for the next half hour, a dark object, in
form much resembling our hero, might have been seen
standing in the neighboring brook, busily engaged in
something
,
the accompanying motions of which seemed not
much unlike those attending the ordinary process of
washing
clothes. But why longer dwell on this sad and
singular
catostrophe? Misapprehensions will often occur among
the wisest and best; and how then could it be expected,
in the present cese, that a mere country girl could
perfectly
understand the rights and privileges to which our hero
was duly entitled by the liberal principles and blessed
spirit
of masonry?
Some physicians have recommended, I believe, salt
water
bathing for promoting sound and healthy slumbers. I
much incline to second the opinion of its efficacy in this
respect; and had he, who discovered this remedy, have
wished to extend his fame in this particular, our hero would
have freely given him a certificate in favor of the practice;
for he never slept more soundly than on the night of his
adventure with the lovely Katreen, the heroine of the Dutch
tavern.
CHAPTER X.
At
the first streak of day light the next morning, our
hero jogged his companion to awake, that they might rise
and prepare for their departure. But Jenks, although an
early riser, and generally first on such occasions, yet
seeing
no particular necessity for so very early a start, begged
for a little more repose. The impatience of Timothy
however
would admit of no delay, and again rousing his friend,
and hastily dressing himself, he proceeded with wonderful
alacrity to get out and harness the team and put every thing
in readiness for immediate departure; all of which he had
accomplished by the time that Jenks, who was all the time
wondering at the unaccountable anxiety of his friend to be
off at such an early hour, had dressed himself and came
out into the yard. The reckoning having been paid the
evening previous, the two friends now mounted their
carriage
and drove off from the house, leaving all its
unconscious
inmates still wrapt in their unbroken slumbers.
For the first few miles of their ride they were mutually
silent, as people generally are, or are inclined to be,
during
the first hours of the morning. Whoever has been
much at the public schools in his youth, and seen a host of
these wayward disciples of Minerva reluctantly turning out
at day-light for prayers and recitation, cannot but
remember
the sour and lugubrious countenances there every
morning exhibitedthe mumping taciturnity, and the cold
and unsocial manner with which each marched on
doggedly
to the task: While, after their morning duties were
over, and the mounting sun, aided perhaps by a smoking
cup of their favorite Batavia, had warmed up their
sluggish
blood to action, the same fellows were invariably seen
returning to their rooms locked arm in arm as amiable and
smiling as the face of spring, and as chatty as the
black-bird
in her sunny meadows.
So with our adventurers during the first part of their
morning's ride. The sun however now began to glimmer
through the heavy column of fog that lay brooding over
the noble Hudson; and its vivifying effects were soon
perceptible.
What do you suppose is the reason, Brother Jenks,
said Timothy, gaping and stretching out his arms at full
length, what do you suppose is the reason that women
have never been allowed to incorporate into our
privileges
of masonry?
`Why, Brother Peacock,' replied the other, `you know
that the faculty of keeping secrets is one of the greatest
and most essential virtues of masonry: and don't you
recollect
a passage on this subject in one of the songs in the
Book of Constitutions, which runs in these words
The ladies claim right to come into our light,
Since the apron they say is their bearing
Can they subject their willcan they keep their tongues still,
And let talking be chang'd into hearing?
Here you see how naturally their claims are urged, and at
the same time how strong are the reasons against their
ever
being admitted.'
True, observed Timothy, but still I have some
instigations
for wishing that there was some method to
extinguish
their wilful functions towards us, and, if they
cannot
be admitted to infest their minds with a proper
understanding
of the rights and privileges which belong to us
Masons, and which you know it is their duty to extend and
yield to us in every case that requires the least
emergency
.
`I have sometimes wished the same,' observed Jenks,
`my wife, besides forever teasing me to tell her the secret,
always makes a great fuss because I am out one night in
a month or so, which all, no doubt, comes from her not
being able to understand the true nature and value of
masonry
.
But I don't suppose there is any help for this
grievance
,
for, as to their ever being worthy of being admitted
into the lodge, and this is the only way any thing could be
done for them, that business, I take it, was settled at the
beginning of the world; for there is another place in the
Book of Constitutions which fully explains this matter. It
is in a piece called the Progress of Masonry, and goes on
in this way
But Satan met Eve when she was a gadding,
And set her, as since all her daughters, a madding
To find out the secrets of Freemasonry,
She ate of the fruit of the forbidden tree.
Then as she was fill'd with high flowing fancies,
As e'er was fond girl who deals in romances,
She thought with her knowledge sufficiently cramm'd,
And said to her spouse,
My dear, eat and be damn'd!
But Adam, astonish'd like one struck with thunder,
Beheld her from head to foot over with wonder
Now you have done this thing, madam, said he,
For your sake no women Freemasons shall be.
Now in this history of the matter given by this book, which
you know is the Mason's Bible, and no more to be doubted
than the other Bible, you see why women in the first place
were cut off from the privileges of masonry; and although
the reasons mentioned in the first verse I repeated are
enough to prevent their being admitted, yet you see if
those reasons did not exist, they could never come to this
honor, because it was forbidden almost as soon as the world
was made; and this I take to be one of the heaviest
curses
that was bestowed upon Eve for eating the forbidden
fruit, (which was pretty much the same, I suppose, as
unlawfully
trying to get into the secrets of masonry) that her
whole sex should forever be denied the honors and
privileges
of our blessed institution.'
These verses, said Timothy, are indeed sublimely
transcendant; but there is one incomprehension about
them which I should like to hear you diffuse upon. They
say that Satan meeting Eve, set her mad to find out the
secrets
of masonry, and so she eat of the forbidden fruit to
get these secrets. Now is it not consequential that Satan
was a Mason himself wrongfully trying to initiate her in
this way?
`I don't exactly see how it was myself,' replied the
other
,
`but these things are no doubt explained in the high
degrees which I have not taken. I suppose however that
Satan might once have been an accepted Mason, but you
know he was expelled from heaven, which is no doubt the
Great Grand Lodge of the Universe, and made up wholly
of Masons.'
Then you do not suppose, said Timothy, that any of
the feminine extraction ever go to heaven?
`Why, as to that,' replied Jenks, `we cannot certainly
tell, but I think it a very doubtful case. If they have no
souls, as our brethren in Turkey and some other parts of
the old world believe, then of course they cannot go to
heaven. But if they have souls, as all in this country,
except
Masons, believe, then it seems rather a hard case that
they should be shut out. Still there are so many reasons
against their ever being admitted, allowing they have souls,
that I scarcely know how to do them away as I could wish,
out of the pity I feel for this unfortunate part of the human
race. You know we take a most solemn oath in the
Master's
degree never to initiate women, idiots, and the like;
I
now if women cannot be initiated on earth, and it seems
to be a divine command that they shall not, for masonry is
divine, how can they ever enter heaven, which, I am
persuaded
is, as I said before, all masonry, and the very
perfection
of masonry? But you don't appear to pay any
attention
to what I am saying, Timothy,' continued the
speaker
,
looking round on the former, who had been, for some
time, engaged in slyly reaching one arm round back of
their seat, and pulling out of their chest a wet shirt,
cravat
,
&c., and spreading them out to the sun`you don't
appearwhy! what in the name of the Old Nick is all
this?when did you wet these clothes, Timothy?' The
latter blushed to the gills, and began to stammer out
something
about bringing them from home in that condition.
Come, come, Tim, none of your locklarums with me:
you got them wet in your last night's scrape, which by the
way, as I was asleep when you came in, I forgot to ask you
about this morning.Did you fall into the brook while
blundering about in the dark?
`Worse than that,' whimpered the confused Timothy,
finding it of no use to attempt concealment.
Worse than that! exclaimed the other, what, then,
did you stumble into some filthy ditch?
`Worse than that,' again replied our hero.
Worse than that!! reiterated Jenks in surprise,
raising
his voice to a sort of howlwhat the dl do you
mean, Tim?speak outdon't act so like a fool!
`WhyI got upto her window,' said Timothy,
hesitating
and stammering at every word`and I went to'
Jenks here burst out into loud, continued peals of
laughter
,
while our hero hung down his head in silence till his
companion's merriment had measurably subsided, when he
sheepishly observed, I am glad you are a Mason, Brother
Jenks, because I know that now you will never divulge
this transacted dilemma.
Our travellers now pushed on rapidly, and about noon
reached the flourishing town of Troy
Place of the free Hart's friendly home,
whose inhabitants they had heard possessed a sprinkling
of that gullible credulity which induced the luckless wights
of its ancient namesake to let the wooden horse into their
renowned city. They determined therefore to give Boaz
an opportunity of making his debut before a public whose
cash and curiosity might qualify them to appreciate his
merits. But they reckoned, it seems, without their host;
for after sojourning in this place about twenty-four hours,
and offering Bruin for exhibition with all the
recommendations
they could invent, they realized barely enough to
pay their expenses. Finding that there was but small
prospect of making much out of the Trojans, our travellers
now proceeded down the river. At the capital they
paused
only long enough to test the virtues of the Albany beef,
[4]
[4]
A term used for Sturgeon, caught in great plenty near Albany.
that great natural benefice of this famine-proof city, for
the bestowment of which I wonder the citizens in their
gratitude have not raised from the bottom of the river a
monumental water-god a hundred feet high, with
something
like the following inscribed on his head:
Here hungry wights, tho' oft their
cake
be dough,
While Hudson rolls no lack of
beef
shall know.
Proceeding diligently on their journey, they arrived about
dark at the city of Hudson. This night brought them a
little piece of good luck from a source on which they had
hitherto placed but small reliance: For putting up at an
inn in the outskirts of the city, where there happened to
reside one of your comfortably funded single ladies, who,
having been in the post-meridian of life without receiving
an offer, long enough to give her the hypochondria,
imagined
herself in a consumption, and, having dismissed
all her physicians for blockheads, was now on the inquiry
for some specific for her fancied malady. Our travellers,
on learning this history of her case from her own lips
during
their meal, began to bethink them of turning to some
account the bottled nostrums, which, as a forlorn hope, they
had stowed away in their waggon. Accordingly Jenks,
after having listened to her remarks and lamentations long
enough to satisfy himself pretty well how the wind set with
her, enquired with apparent indifference, if she had ever
tried the celebrated medicine lately discovered in the
Eastern
States which had cured so many consumptions.
She replied in the negative, and, with a countenance
brightening up with joy and excited curiosity, eagerly
enquired
where any of this medicine was to be had.
On which, Jenks told her that he had charge of a few
bottles which had been sent by him to a gentleman in New
York, one of which perhaps might be spared; but so very
valuable was this medicine considered, that no one, he
presumed
,
would be willing to give the price demanded. This
only inflamed the invalid's curiosity the more, and she
became
very anxious to see this elixir of life. Jenks then,
with some seeming hesitation, went out and brought in a
bottle, which, having been ingeniously tinctured by the
juice of the elder-berry, and rendered aromatic by wild
annis and the like, furnished a liquid both agreeable to the
taste and the sight; and turning out a small quantity, he
descanted largely on its virtues, and prescribed the
manner
in which it was to be taken. Charmed by the taste
and appearance of the beautiful liquid, and her faith
keeping
pace with her imagination in the growing idea of its
sanative qualities, her desire to possess it soon became
uncontrollable
,
and she demanded the price of the bottle.
And, while the cautious vender was hesitating
whether
it was his best policy to say one dollar, or two, she,
taking
this hesitation for a reluctance to part with such a
treasure, observed she must have it if it cost ten dollars.
This remark gave Jenks a clue of which he was not slow to
avail himself, and accordingly he told her that ten dollars
was just the price of one bottle, which was considered
sufficient
to effect a complete cure in the most obstinate
cases
.
This she said was indeed a great price, but still
money
was not to be put in competition with life. Thus
observing
,
she rose, and forgetting the cane with which she
usually walked, bustled out of the room. Jenks now
began
to fear that his avarice had led him to overshoot his
mark, and he regretted that he had not set his price lower,
as she had left him in doubt whether she intended to
become
a purchaser. He had not however much time
allowed
him for regrets; for his patient soon returned, and,
planking ten dollars, took possession of her invaluable
medicine, and proceeded to administer to herself the
specified
does on the spot. After this her spirits soon became
exhilarated, and she declared that she already felt much
better.
Faith will remove mountains, saith the Scripture in
substance
.
I have often considered how peculiarly
applicable
is this scriptural sentiment to the case of those
laboring
under that, by no means the least terrible of diseases,
hypochondriacal affection. The poor afflicted dupe, in
the present instance, no sooner gave herself up to the full
influence of that wonder-working attribute, than she felt,
it would seem, the mountain rolling from her oppressed
feelings.
The next morning, as our travellers were about to
resume
their journey, she came to the door with the bright
look and elastic step of a girl of fifteen, and expressed the
most unbounded gratitude to them for having been the
means of saving her life: She had not felt so well for two
years, and she was certain she should be entirely cured by
the time she had taken the whole bottle of her charming
medicine.
Our travellers drove off almost holding their breaths till
they had got fairly past the last house in the city, when
they began to snicker, and soon to laugh and roar outright
at the strange and ludicrous manner in which dame fortune
had been pleased to visit them in this unexpected little
piece of success. I have often heard it observed,
Brother
Tim, said Jenks, after his fit of merriment had been
indulged in to his satisfaction, I have often heard it
observed
,
that mankind were always prone to measure the
value of every thing by the price that was attached to it;
but I confess I never saw this trait so strikingly exhibited
before. Had I put the price of that bottle at fifty cents,
the old hypoey squab, I will warrant you, would not have
looked at it. Let us then take a hint from this affair for
governing our future operations.
They then fell to contriving in accordance with this
suggestion; the result of which was, that the same price,
which they had just so miraculously obtained, was to be
affixed to each of their remaining bottles of tinctured
water
.
Their black-balls were to be cried up as perpetual
leather-preservers, at a dollar a piece; and Boaz was to
be passed off as some unknown animal, if possible, with
terms for his exhibition sufficiently high to comport with
their new scale for the graduation of prices.
After this weighty business had been well discussed and
definitely settled, they concluded it best to embrace every
probable chance of putting their scheme into operation.
Accordingly they stopped at almost every house on the
road for the commendable purpose of searching out the
sick, and administering to their distresses. But
unfortunately
it never fell to their lot to find any more cases of
consumption, either in fancy or fact, or any other disease
indeed that required the aid of any of their list of
infallibles
.
With their black-balls, however, they met with a
little more success among the Dutch farmers, who
considered
that the preservation of their shoes, so that they
might pass as heir-looms from one generation to another,
was an object by no means to be sneezed at, declaring, in
their honest credulity, none but a Cot tam Yankee would
have found out dat. But with Boaz they found it
impossible
to succeed in this way. At Poughkeepsie they spent
one day, and Timothy made a learned speech to the
multitude
to prove their bear an unknown and newly discovered
animal. But as soon as two or three had been admitted
to the sight, the game was up. Boaz was pronounced
a
bona fide
bear as ever sucked his claws. Whereupon,
symptoms of a mob began to be discernable among the
crowd. One fellow stepped up to Jenks and offered him
half a crown, observing, and pointing to our hero instead
of the bear, that he for one was well satisfied that the
creature
was an unknown animal, and worth the money for the
sight, and concluded by asking where he was caught.
Others
said something about those implements of the low and
vulgar, tar and feathers. In short, matters began to wear
rather a squally appearance.
Qu cum ita sint
since things go on at such a deuced
rate, thought our travellers, it is no more than prudent to
be a jogging. They therefore packed up their duds
without
further loss of time, and took a French leave of these
impertinent Poughkeepsians, who were growing quite too
familiar to suit their notions of genteel intercourse.
The next day, while diligently wending their way towards
the great city, they came to a little village containing a
tavern, store and meeting-house, those three grand
requisites
of village greatness. Here they stopped at the tavern
for a little rest and refreshment. When they were about
to depart, Timothy stepped up to the bar, and offered the
landlord a small bank note out of which to pay their
reckoning
.
The latter took the note in hand, and, giving it a
long scrutinizing look, observed that he had some doubts
about that bill; and at the same time casting a glance of
suspicion at our friends, asked Timothy how he came by
the paper. The latter could only say that it was handed
him by his friend Jenks, and Jenks affirmed that he took it
on the road; and although he knew it to be good, yet to
save all dispute, he would pay the reckoning in other
money
.
Having done this, they requested the landlord to
deliver
up the questioned bill; but he declined, and said he
should first like to know whether it was counterfeit or not;
and as there was a good judge of money in the place, they
would submit it to his inspection. To this Jenks
demurred
,
as causing them a foolish and unnecessary detention.
But the landlord, without beeding his remarks, sent out his
boy for the gentleman in question. In a few moments a
little dapper, pug-nosed fellow, with a huge cravat round
his neck, reaching up over his chin to his mouth, and
looking
as if he had been trying to jump through itwhile a
large bunch of gold seals were appended to his waist to
keep the balance of his watch true, (provided he had one)
came bustling into the room swelling with the conscious
importance of his character as village merchant. Here,
Mr. Nippet, said the landlord, reaching out the bill,
please to give us your opinion of that paper. Mr.
Nippet
accordingly took the bill, and, after having squinted at
it side-ways and all ways with a severe and knowing air,
laid it down, and, with a tone that plainly told that there
could be no appeal from his judgement, pronounced it
counterfeit. All eyes were now instantly turned upon our
travellers with looks of the darkest suspicion; and not
doubting the correctness of the decision of their
counterskipper
oracle any more than a good Catholic would that
of the Pope, they already beheld our travellers, in
imagination
,
snugly immured within the walls of the
Penitentiary
.
They, however, showing the rest of their money, which
proved to be good, and taking much pains to convince the
company of the honesty of their intentions, succeeded so
far in allaying these suspicions, that no opposition was
made to their departing. Nippet, however, who had
preserved
a dignified silence during this process of examination &
acquittal, now, as they drove off, pulled up his cravat and
said, Dem me! if them are fellers aint as prime a pair of
Yankee counterfeiters as ever went uncaged, I will agree to
forfeit the best double-twilled looking-glass in my store.
The effect of this malediction was soon manifested among
the crowd by eager inquiries for the village lawyer and the
sheriff. But let us follow our travellers, who, having got
too far off from the scene of action to perceive any thing of
this new movement, were now quietly pursuing their
journey
,
wholly unaware of the storm that was brewing in the
village they had just left. Perhaps, however, I should not
omit to state that Jenks, for reasons best known to himself,
often cast an uneasy glance behind him, and as often put
up old Cyclops to considerable more than his wonted jog.
After they had travelled about two hours, and while
passing
over an uneven and woody country, somewhere in the
vicinity of `Sleepy Hollow,' that secluded region, which
would forever have remained in its own quiet and
inglorious
obscurity, but for the classic pens of Washington
Irving
and the author of these memorable adventures: the
one having already rendered it famous as the scene of the
exploits of the immortal Ichabod Crane, and the other now
adding the climax of its celebrity by connecting it with the
masonic achievements of the no less immortal Timothy
Peacock,while passing these regions, I say, the attention
of our trayellers was suddenly arrested by the clattering
of hoofs on the road behind them; and looking round,
they saw a man riding at full speed coming after them.
What can that fellow want? hurriedly exclaimed
Jenkssomething about that bill, I fearI wish I had
never tried the experiment of putting
You are the gentlemen, I conclude, with whom I have
some business, said the man, riding up and addressing
our travellers, and at the same time taking out a warrant,
you are the persons, I think, who put off a certain bank
bill at our village a few hours since, he continued,
motioning
them to stop their horse. Here was a dilemma
inindeed
!
Our travellers were thunderstruck. But it was
here, O divine Masonry! that thy transcendant genius shone
triumphant! Here the omnipetence of thy saving and
precious
principles was displayed in its true glory for the
protection
of thy faithful children! And it was here thy
supreme
behest, in obedience to which,
Supporting each other
Brother helps brother,
was kindly interposed between thy sons in difficulty and
the cruel and less sacred exactions of civil law, and set the
rejoicing captives free! Quick as thought our hero rose
from his seat, and looking the officer full in the face, made
the Master Mason's hailing sign of distress. The officer
hesitated, and seemed to be in great perplexity how to act.
On which, Jenks, who had been thrown into more
confusion
than Timothy, now regaining his assurance in
perceiving
they were in the hands of a brother, also rose and
made another masonic sign to the officer which our hero
did not at that time understand. But its potency was
instantly
acknowledged by a corresponding token, and its
redeemnig efficacy as quickly visible.
Here must be some mistake, said the officer, no two
persons in a waggon have passed you on the road,
gentlemen
?
he continued, with a look which seemed to say, we
must invent some excuse for this.
`None whatever,' replied Jenks, fully comprehending the
drift of the question, `none whatever, but perhaps they
were considerably behind us, and might have turned off at
a road which I noticed several miles back, and which leads
I conclude to some ferry over the Hudson.'
Nothing more likely, rejoined the sheriff, but to put
the matter beyond dispute, and enable me to give a safe
answer to my employers, I will ride on to the next house,
and enquire if any travellers, at all answering the
description
of the fugitives, have passed the road, and if
informed
in the negative, I shall of course be exonerated from
any further pursuit in this direction. So, good bye,
Brethren
,
he continued, pointing to a thick wood behind a hill
on the right, good byecaution and moonlight will
ensure
a safe journey to the city. So saying, he clapped
spurs to his horse, and dashing by the waggon of our
travellers
,
was soon out of sight.
Brother Peacock, said Jenks, there is no time to
lose; we must drive out into the woods and conceal
ourselves
and team behind yonder hill till dark. They then
jumped out of their waggon, and taking their horse by the
head, led him out of the road into a partial opening at the
right, and picking their way through the bushes and round
fallen trees and logs, soon arrived at a situation where the
intervening hill cut off all view from the road, and where
a small grass plot and spring furnished an excellent place
for halting and refreshment. Being now in a place of
safety
,
they unharnessed old Cyclops, and gave him the last
peck of oats now remaining of the stock which they had
brought from home. Our travellers now taking a seat,
Jenks proceeded to explain to Timothy, as far as his oath
would permit, the nature of the sign which he had made to
the officer, and which had so effectually ensured their
escape
from arrest. The token he had used he said was the
Royal Arch sign of distress, which no Mason of that degree
ever dare pass unheeded, whatever might be his opinion
of being bound to answer the Master's sign of distress in
circumstances like those in which they had just been
placed
.
As to the latter obligation, he remarked, there was
a difference of opinion among Masons,some believing
they were bound to afford relief, protection or liberty, as
the case might require, whenever the Master's sign was
made; others considering that this sign only extended to
relief in certain cases. Among the latter class, he
presumed
,
stood this officer, by his hesitation when this sign was
made, since he appeared to have no doubts what was his
duty when he saw the sign of the Royal Arch degree,that
sign which was never known to fail a brother in distress,
that sign, indeed, whose potency can palsy even the iron
arm of the lawbid defiance to the walls of the deepest
dungeons, and rend the strongest fetters that ever bound
the limbs of a captive brother.
Timothy could not here refrain from bursting forth into
the most rapturous exclamations in praise of the glorious
institution that could effect such wonders. Its advantages,
its value, and its protective power, were now to him no
longer a matter of hypothesis. He had seen them
exemplified
.
He had experienced their glorious fruits. He blessed
the auspicious hour that first brought the precious light to
his soul, and he resolved that he would never rest till he
had taken not only the Royal Arch, but every higher
degree
,
till he had reached the very summit of the Ladder
of Jacob.
It was now about noon, and our travellers, beginning to
feel the demands of appetite, went to their waggon, and
after
making a pretty heavy draft on their remaining stock
of provisions, repaired to a little bed of moss near a spring
which was overshadowed by a large chesnut tree, and
commenced
their sylvan meal.
Brother Timothy, said Jenks, tossing a half-eaten
biscuit
in his hand and giving a momentary respite to his
masticators, I have been thinking about trying an
experiment
.
You know you preached like a philosopher there
at Poughkeepsie to make them believe that Boaz was no
bear, but some strange and unknown animal, but failed to
make the fellows trust one word of all you told them; and
for the reason no doubt that when they came to see him
with his long black hair, and every way in his natural
trim, their common sense told them that he could be
nothing
but a bear. Well, as I was looking on to notice how
matters went, and hearing you talk with so much high
learning about the unknown animal as you called him, a
thought struck me that if it had not been for the creature's
black coat, you might have made them believe your story;
and if he could be sheared or shaved, it would be nearly
all that would be wanting to make him pass for what you
cracked him up to be.
`What an ingenious contrivability!' excaimed the
other
.
`Brother Jenks, what a fundament of inventions is
always
exasperating the dimensions of your perecranium!
Who else would have ever cogitated such a comical
designment
?'
Now, Tim, continued Jenks, without seeming to heed
the exclamations of his companion, we have all the
afternoon
before us, as it will not do to start till dark, and I put
a pair of sheers into our chest, and several kinds of paint,
thinking I might want them perhaps to fix old Cyclops for
market. So you see we have leisure and toolsnow what
say you to trying the experiment of taking off the bear's
coat close to his skin, and otherwise fixing him as we shall
think expedient?
`By all muchness and manner of means, let us condense
the experiment into immediate operation,' replied our
hero
,
adding the most sanguine anticipations of its success.
The project was then discussed in all its bearings, and
becoming more and more confirmed in the opinion that it
must succeed, the projectors rose for the purpose of
patting
it into execution without further delay. It was
arranged
that Timothy should take a bag, and going out of
the woods to the back side of an orchard which they had
noticed about half a mile back, procure a quantity of sweet
apples to feed Boaz and make him more quietly submit to
the operation; while Jenks was to remain behind and make
all necessary preparations for the performance.
Accordingly, Timothy steered off with his bag, and the
other proceeded to get out his old shears and sharpen them
upon a piece of slate stone, then to prepare his shaving
tools with which it was proposed to go over the animal
after
shearing by way of putting on the finish to the work;
and finally to get out poor Boaz, the unconscious object of
these preparations, who little dreamed that his masters
were about to deprive him of the only coat he had to his
back, and that too when cold winter was rapidly
approaching
.
By the time these preparations were completed,
Timothy
came staggering along over the logs under a load of
nearly two bushels of apples, and reaching the spot, threw
them down at the feet of his companion.
Stolen fruit is sweet, said Jenks, taking out and
tasting
several of the apples, this makes the Scripture good;
for I never tasted sweeter apples in my life.
`I declare to Jehoshaphat and the rest of the prophets,'
said Timothy, `the idea never once entered my conscience
that I was breaking the commandments by taking these
apples without the liberty of licence.'
Jenks now perceiving the uneasiness that his remark
had caused his too scrupulous friend, at once relieved his
feelings by telling him, in the language of the Jesuitical
Fathers, whose learned and logical reasoning bears
so striking a resemblance to that of masonic writers in
support of their institution, that, as he was calculating to
devote his share of the avails of their project to the study
of masonry, whatever was done in furtherance of so noble
K
an object could not be blameable; for the end always
justified
the means, and therefore this act which appeared to
trouble his mind so unnecessarily, was in fact a virtue
instead
of a crime.
They now proceeded to the shearing operationone
plying
the shears, while the other slowly administered pieces
of apples to the animal, and thus kept him quiet during
the performance. In about an hour they completed this
first part of their task, having deprived Bruin of the whole
of his sable wardrobe as far as it could be effected with
shears. Next was the more difficult and tedious process
of shaving. They beat up a large supply of lather, and
diligently betook themselves to this novel exercise of the
barber's profession. This part of their undertaking
proved
indeed to be a slow and troublesome business. But
Boaz
,
either because he was conscious of the important
objects
which the operation involved, or because the razor,
in passing over his skin, produced, by its light and gentle
friction, those pleasurable sensations which are said to be
so highly appreciated in Scotland as to lead to the erection
of rubbing-posts in that country, bore up through the whole
with the patience of a philosopher, and, with the exception
of a little wincing and snapping as occasionally the razor
happened to graze the skin, suffered the operators to
complete
their task without offering the slightest opposition.
This process being at length finished, they smeared over
his skin with some light paint mixed with earth so as to
give him an ashy appearance.
There Boaz! exclaimed Jenks, laughing at the
comical
appearance of the animal, as he stood before them
completely metamorphosed, his body as smooth as the head
of a shorn Carmelite, and his whole figure comparatively as
light and spruce as a Broadway dandy, and with organs of
ideality quite as well developed, (though with a little more
destructiveness to be sure,) there Boaz, if you wont
betray
us by your bearish breeding, we may defy the Old Nick
himself to discover your true character.
It was now past sunset, and the deepening shadows of
evening beginning to fall thick and fast into the deep glens
of the highlands, reminded our travellers that they might
soon depart in safety. Accordingly, having harnessed their
team, and wrapped their shorn friend in an old blanket, to
compensate him for the loss of his natural covering, they
retraced their way to the road by the last lingering gleams
of the fading twilight, and immediately commenced their
journey at a pace which seemed to indicate a mutual
impatience
between horse and owners to bid adieu to this
part of the country with as little delay as possible. Passing
rapidly on and meeting with no molestation, they travelled
till about midnight without stopping; when observing a
field of unharvested corn beside the road, they halted, and
borrowed a quantity of ears sufficient to furnish old
Cyclops
with a good supper. Having rested here about an
hour, they again put forward and drove with the same speed
and diligence for the remainder of the night; and such was
their progress in this nocturnal journey, that, as the rising
sun began to gild the tops of the distant mountains, they
entered the great city of New-York, having travelled in
about twelve hours of hazy moonlight nearly forty miles
without but once halting.
CHAPTER XI.
Lobsters are not fleas, damn their souls.
Peter Pindar
,
for Sir Joseph Banks
.
New-York
!London of Americavast depot of the
agricultural riches of the West, and the proud haven into
whose open and welcoming bosom the winged canvass,
laden
with merchandize, comes drifting from every clime
before
the four winds of heaven! City of fashions!whose
hundred sacred spires rise over congregations there
weekly
assembled, punctual to the dictate of this fickle goddess,
who is even there presiding mistress of the ceremonies!
Congregations whose devotions would be disturbed by the
appearance of one coat out of datewhose feelings would
be shocked by the sight of one ribbon too much or too
little
in a dress, and whose sensibilities would be thrown into
agony by the daring intrusion of one unfashionable bonnet!
City of puffs and exaggeration! where there is no
medium
where
every thing
Is like to Jeremiah's figs,
The good were very goodthe bad not fit to give the pigs.
Where literature, if fashionable, is celestialif not,
damnable
.Where
an author becomes at once a
Magnus
Apollo
,
or a dunce.Where every thing is cried up to the
clouds, or hissed into infamy.Where every performance
or exhibition, of whatever kind or character, is all the go,
the rage, the roar; and the exhibitors or performers are
received with shouts of applause, clapped, encored,
honored
,
worshipped; or spurned, hissed, spit at, and mobbed
from the city.Where every thing, in short, goes by steam
on the high pressure principle.Where every thing is
done in a fury, a whirlwind; and where those who would
succeed
must raise the wind to the same pitch and power of
the surrounding tempest, and ride fearlessly on the gale;
for if they fall short of this, or pause one moment to resist
the current, they are overthrown and trod and trampled
under foot by the rolling mass of life, and lost forever!
Jenks had several times before been in this city, and
having noticed the peculiarities of the place, and learned
how things were done there, and concluding withal that
whatever was done, it were better if it were done
quickly
,
now shaped his course accordingly. Near the centre
of the city stood a livery stable with a capacious yard which
the owner, whom I shall call Stockton, had been
accustomed
to let to the keepers of caravans for the exhibition
of their animals. This Stockton being a masonic
acquaintance
of Jenks, the latter, on arriving at the city,
immediately
drove to his stand, and as his yard was then luckily
unoccupied, found excellent accommodations for the
intended
exhibition of Boaz. Having for a reasonable sum
obtained these accommodations, and seen Boaz safely
locked up in the high enclosure which constituted the
exhibition
room, Jenks immediately went in search of a
painter to take a full sized portrait of his Bruinship to
display
for a sign, while Timothy was despatched to a
printing-office
to get a hundred or two of handbills struck off
describing Boaz as the new and wonderful animal lately
caught in a cave among the Green-Mountains, and setting
forth the time, place and terms of his exhibition. The
painter with his implements, and a large piece of canvass,
was soon on the ground, and after wondering awhile over
this strange subject for his pencil, diligently proceeded to
the task of taking his likeness. While these things were
doing, Jenks and Timothy took the opportunity of dressing
before they made their appearance before the public, and
of taking their dinner. After which, at the suggestion of
their friend, Stockton, they employed an old ex-officio
crier
,
remarkable for the power of his lungs, and the aptitude
of his hyperboles,to distribute their handbills and cry up
Boaz in such manner as he thought best calculated to catch
the attention of the multitude.
By three o'clock in the afternoon, every thing was
prepared
for this wonderful exhibition. The painter had
completed
his task, having given a rough, but striking picture
of Boaz standing on the limb of a tree, about to spring
upon
a deer that was making his appearance in the bushes
below; and the handbills having come, `Thundering Tom,'
as their new crier was called, had already begun his work
of distributing them, making the very pavements tremble
as he passed along the streets, crying with stentorian voice
the exhibition of the new! strange!! wonderful!!! and
unknown animal!!!! caught in the Green-Mountains!!!!!
Now Brother Tim, said Jenks, it is neck or nothing
with us. It will be no half-way business here. Our
pockets
will be filled with cash before to-morrow night, or our
backs will be tarred and feathered, just according as how
the thing takes; but we must act
our
part well or all is
lost to a certainty. I have done the contriving, and you
must do the talking, Tim: You have learning, and can
philosophize
K*
and explain to the visitors. But mind you, Tim,
if you get up any wonderful stories about Boaz, be careful
not to cross yourself by telling different ones, especially
till a new set of visitors come in, and you are sure that all
those who heard your first story are gone. And above all,
Tim, be very careful that you don't let the cat out of the
bag.
After these hasty injunctions, Jenks, with a heart
palpitating
with the mingled emotions of hope and fear, went
out and took his station at the door. It was obvious that
public curiosity had been awakened, and that the wind was
now fairly raised. A crowd was already collected round
the door, gazing at the picture, and listening to the
marvellous
stories that Thundering Tom, who having gone the
rounds in distributing the handbills and returned, was now
administering to them by wholesale. As soon as Jenks
made his appearance, they became clamorous for
admission
when
he nothing loath, though trembling at the
uncertainty
of the result, threw open the door, and, as fast as
he could pocket the half dollars, (fifty cents being the terms
of admission) let in the eager multitude. This was a
moment
of intense anxiety to our travellers, wholly uncertain
as they were, what impressions would be produced by the
first sight of Boazwhether he would maintain his
assumed
character, or whether detection and its supposed
consequence
,
a mobbing, would immediately ensue. They
were soon relieved, however, from all apprehensions of any
trouble at present, by the concurrent voice of the visitors,
who after carefully examining the monster round from head
to tail, all broke out in exclamations of wonder and
admiration
at the appearance of this singular animal, and
declared
themselves highly gratified with the sight.
Timothy
now believing it was time for him to take a part in the
scene, proceeded to relate to the gaping crowd the
manner
of taking the animal, which he said was effected by a
steel-trap that he and his companion had set near a small
lake surrounded by woods and mountains, where they had
observed the creature's tracks, which they took for those
of a catamount. And on going to the trap the next day,
they found it was gone, and the stone to which it was
chained
,
weighing about five hundred pounds, had been dragged
off with it. Following the track which was plainly
marked
by the trap and stone, they pursued on, and soon came
to a young deer with his throat torn open, lying dead
beside
the way; and knowing that the animal must have
caught this deer before he got into the trap, and carried it
so far where he had dropped it owing to his failing
condition
,
they followed on now certain of soon overtaking him.
After going about half a mile, they found he had gone into
a dark and frightful cavern in the side of a steep mountain.
They then raised a band of hunters, and went in with
torches
,
and after incredible difficulty and danger, they
succeeded
,
with ropes, in taking the monster alive, and tying and
muzzling him so securely that they got him home; and
after
taming him as much as his ferocious nature would
admit
of, they had now brought him to the city to let the
people
see him and find out from the learned men what
animal
he was.
This account still increased the general wonder, and the
ferocious character which Timothy had given to Boaz was
now confirmed by his present appearance; for owing to
the soreness produced by the shaving, and the jolting of his
rapid ride immediately after, he was unusually cross and
snappish, and kept in one continual snarl as the visitors
punched him with their canes through the railing within
which he was chained.
Various were the conjectures as to what kind of animal
he could be; and many the sage remarks that were
uttered
on the occasion. One thought he must be some
relation
to the elephanta kind of Tom Thumb elephant, he
said, since he knew of no animal of the four-footed kind
but what had hair except the elephant and this monster;
and asked if there were not a small kind of elephants
somewhere
in a country called Lilliputia, where, as he had read
in some history, all the animals were excessively
diminutive
:
Another said he had been to see all the caravans
that ever came into the city for twenty years, and he had
seen all the animals in the world, he believed, except the
unicorn, which he never could happen to come across, and
according to the idea he had formed of that animal, he
thought it must be very like this monster, and he rather
expected the same thing: And yet another, a spruce and
intelligent clerk from Broadway, observed, that he was
perfectly satisfied what the creature wasit was one of
that class of animals called non-descripts, found in great
numbers in Siberia and other parts of the torrid zone: he
had often heard Doctor Mitchel, in his lectures, speak of
the animal; though he did not know before that any of this
class were ever found in America; but he was not at all
surprised that they should be discovered in such a cold,
rough and desolate wilderness as the Green-Mountains.
These and a thousand other observations of the kind
were made by this, and each succeeding set of visitors that
were continually coming and going in great numbers for
the whole of the afternoon and eveningduring all of
which, Boaz maintained his character of an unknown
animal
unimpeached; and notwithstanding the most rigid
scrutiny and learned inspection, which he was constantly
undergoing, all except the learned Broadway clerk, gave
up that they had never seen or heard of the like of him
before
,
and that he was truly an unknown animal, and a great
curiosity.
Thus went matters gloriously on for our travellers till
nine o'clock in the evening, when, although the crowd
seemed rather to increase than diminish, they were forced
to close the exhibition and shut up for the night. As soon
as they were alone and all still without, they fell to
rejoicing
over their good fortune, and counting their money,
which to their agreeable surprise amounted, from the
receipts
of the exhibition alone, to something over three
hundred dollars. Jenks' eyes glistened like stars in a
frosty
night: and Timothy snapped his fingers and capered
about the room like a mad-man, uttering a thousand
extravagancies
.
Concluding to sleep on blankets in an
apartment
in the building adjoining the exhibition room, and
communicating with it, that they might better see to the
safety of Boaz, it was arranged that Timothy should now
go to some neighboring victualling-cellar for some
provisions
for their supper, while Jenks went to one or two
printing-offices
to get a notice of to-morrow's exhibition
inserted
in the morning papers. This business finished, and the
parties having returned, they now sat down to their meal
spread on the lid of their travelling-chest, and recounted,
with great glee, the many little incidents that had fallen
under the observation of each during the hours of
exhibition
.
But Timothy, said Jenks, after they had indulged
a while in dwelling on the scenes of the afternoon,
Timothy
,
I fear me that this run of luck can't last long: This
afternoon and evening we have had scarcely any to see
Boaz
,
as I observed, but the more ignorant class; and although
many of them were dressed so neat, they were mostly
lounging dandies, and merchants' clerks, that havn't three
ideas above a jackass, except it is about the business
behind
their counters. But to-morrow, as this thing gets
more noised through the city, we may expect more
knowing
company. And when those prying lawyers, and
doctors
with their glasses, come examining and squinting about
Boaz, then we may look out for breakers. And at the best,
I have little hope of keeping up the farce beyond
to-morrow
night, as the hair on his back will begin to start so as
to be seen by the next day at farthest; and I don't suppose
that he would let us shave him again, as he is so sore and
cross with the effect of the last operation. Now I have
been thinking that we had better be prepared for the worst;
so if a blow-up should happen, we shall have nothing to
do to prevent our leaving the city at a moment's warning.
I think we had better sell our horse and waggon if we can
do it to advantage; for if any thing should happen, we can
get away better without our team than with it; and if there
should not, we can never do better with Cyclops than here;
besides, if we sell out and go home by water, we shan't
have to pass through that blackguard village where they
made such a fuss about that bill. And as to Boaz, we can
leave him with Stockton to sell for us.
Timothy agreeing to these propositions, it was decided
that Jenks should go out next morning before the hour
arrived
for opening the door to visitors, and taking
Thundering
Tom along to assist him, should try to find a sale for
the team. This being settled, they began to prepare for
sleep. The cautious Jenks, however, did not lay down till
he had searched round the yard and building and found a
window through which they might retreat into a back
alley
and get off, in case a mob should attack them. After
this, they wrapped their blankets round them, and laying
down on the floor, with their coats for pillows, were soon
lost in slumber.
Bright and early the next morning our travellers aroused
themselves from their golden dreams, and harnessing up
old Cyclops, and going out and getting Thundering Tom,
the latter and Jenks drove towards the lower part of the
city to find a sale for the establishment, leaving Timothy
to feed Boaz and prepare for the coming exhibition. As
luck would have it, while on their way they came across a
man whose horse had just taken fright, and, running against
a stone post at the corner of the street, had dashed the
waggon to which he was harnessed into a thousand pieces,
and broke and torn the harness so as to render it wholly
useless for the present purposes of the owner, who now
stood over the ruins, lamenting his misfortune, which was
the greater he said as he was compelled to return
immediately
into the country with a small load, while he had not
enough money to pay for a new harness and waggon, and he
did not suppose he could get any other without
considerable
delay. Jenks having halted and heard the man tell
this story, at once offered to sell his own waggon and
harness
on the most reasonable terms; and as the man was as
eager to buy as Jenks to sell, a bargain was soon
concluded
to the satisfaction of all parties. It now only
remaining
to dispose of old Cyclops, Jenks then proceeded
onward
,
leading him with a halter, while Thundering Tom
took a parallel street for the purpose of inquiring out a
purchaser. In a short time, however, the latter came
puffing
along after Jenks, and overtaking him told him he had
just learned that the master of the Jersey horse-boat
wanted
to purchase a horse, and he had no doubt but old
Cyclops
would suit, as eyes or no eyes it was all the same for
that business, provided the horse was stout enough. But,
said he, I think you had better leave the management of
parleying with the old fellow to me: I know him well, and
what is better he don't know me,a free, bold speech, and
a price that will do to fall upon, is all that is wanting for
your success.
With quickened pace they then took their route to the
ferry. They no sooner had arrived at the landing than
they called out for the master of the boat, which had not yet
commenced its trips for the day. Presently an old thick-set,
rough-looking fellow came swaggering along towards the
stern of the boat, and demanded what they wanted.
A horse to sell, your honorjust from the country
dog cheap! replied Thundering Tom.
`What are his points and bottom?' asked the master.
He will trot you, said the other, he will trot you, Sir,
to the New Jerusalem in three hours!
`But I want one,' said the master, `that will trot slow
not fast.'
Well then, replied Tom, my horse will trot as slow
as common horses will stand still!
`You are a musical fellow,' said the master`I will
come out there and look at your horseSound?'
As a roach, replied Tom, except an eye that he let
a catamomount have one day to pay him for a broken
skull.
`You lie like the devil,' said the other`nevertheless,
I like your horse: What is your price?'
One hundred dollars, replied Tom.
`Hundred satans!' exclaimed the master: `however, put
that red-headed woodpecker of yours on to him,' he
continued
,
pointing to Jenks, whom he evidently took for a
servant of Tom's, `and let us see him move. I will give
seventy-five if I like him as well as I think I shall.'
Jenks now biting his lip in silent vexation at this taunt
on his personal appearance, mounted old Cyclops, and rode
back and forth some time,after which, and considerable
bantering, the bargain was struck at seventy-five dollars,
when Jenks and Thundering Tom returned to their
lodgings
,
chuckling at the thought of their good bargain; for
the former had instructed the latter to take fifty dollars if
he could get no more. Jenks now giving his companion
ten dollars for the great assistance he had rendered him in
this sale, and in getting Boaz into notice, now dismissed
him, and returned to Stockton's to tell Timothy of his
unexpected
luck in disposing of their establishment so well
and so quickly.
At nine o'clock, Boaz having been well fed, and then
switched into a suitable degree of soreness and ferocity,
and Timothy instructed to keep a bright look-out for squalls,
Jenks took his post and opened the exhibition. The
morning
papers had been distributed over the city, and given
notice of the exhibition to the more domestic and retired
citizens. And this, with the floating rumors that they had
heard the evening before from the rabble in the streets
concerning
the strange animal for show at Stockton's, so
inflamed
their curiosity, that they soon came flocking to see
him. Among these, a band of that class which is called
the cream of society, being made up of the wealthy, and
those at the same time distinguished by family, having
made their appearance with their wives and daughters, one
of them, after examining the animal a few minutes, asked
Timothy if Dr. Mitchel had been to see the monster. And
being answered in the negative, he, with several others,
proposed going after the Doctor immediately, as he could
at once settle the question whether the creature was an
unknown animal or not. So saying, two of the gentlemen
went off in quest of the great walking library of New-York,
leaving their daughters to remain till they returned. The
latter, freed from the restraint which they felt in the
presence
of their fathers, soon manifested a disposition to make
the most of their liberty, and began to quiz and question
our hero, whose good looks and ruddy cheeks seemed to
attract their notice. One asked him whether his
sweetheart
did not cry when he came awayanother whether
the girls in the Green-Mountains rode side-ways when they
rode horseback; and whether they worked in the field
with the men ploughing and reaping: And a third asked
him whether they had meeting-houses and state-houses in
Vermont. To all these questions Timothy made gallant
answers, lugging in some compliment on every occasion.
One of these fashionables of the cream at length seeing an
opportunity when the rest had moved off to one side of the
apartment to listen to some discussion going on there,
approached
close to our hero, and asked him in a half
whisper
if he should know her in the dark. Only by that
breath of Arabian perfumery, he replied. `O you rogue,
you must not know me by any thing; so you wont find me
to-night at Mrs.  assignation house,  street,
No. , precisely at 8 o'clock,' said she, tipping him a
wink, as she twirled off talking loudly about the strange
animal. In a few minutes more another made a kind of
circuit round the room, and passing near him, dropped a
small piece of paper into his hand, and scarcely had he put
away the first before another billet was dropped at his feet
as a gay lass brushed by him, saying she was going to peep
out the door to see if papa was coming. Timothy was
rather
at a loss what to make of all this; and he took the first
opportunity to inspect the billets; and on reading them, he
found to his surprise that that they both named places and
a time of meeting him. What can this mean? thought
hea second act of the play of that Dutch trollop on the
road? or have I at length got among ladies that are
capable
of appreciating my character? Every thing, as he
looked
round on the rich and fashionable dresses of these
ladies
,
conspired to tell him that the latter must be the case,
and he pulled up his cravat and stepped about with an air
of manly dignity which showed that he considered justice
L
was done him. While Timothy was absorbed in these
pleasing reflections, the citizens returned in company with
the
Magnus Apollo
of the city. Jenks, who had
over-heard
enough to learn that some one had now come who
was a great critic about animals, felt rather uneasy when
the Doctor went in, and even Timothy was not altogether
without apprehensions when he saw the learned man
scrutinize
Boaz so closely. Taking out paper and pencil, the
Doctor proceeded to make minutesspeaking or humming
over to himself as he wrote, Strange animalcaught
among the Green-Mountains.....Appearanceentire
destitution
of the capillary characteristic, short, thick and
swinish
.....Habitscynic
and irascible.....Food`what does
he eat, Sir?' said the Doctor, looking up at Timothy
`Flesh and fruit,' replied the latter, somewhat overawed by
the presence of the great man`He was caught when he
had just killed a deer, and we have fed him on apples and
such kind of viands'Apples, viands! hastily
interrupted
the otherThe carneous and pomaceous are distinct
and disconnected; but ah! I understand nowit was the
deer that you meant by the appellative of viand; but to the
animalwonderful! carniverous and pomiverous, &c. &c.
He then examined Boaz over, and asked Timothy a
thousand
questions about himafter which, he recapitulated
his notes, and pronouncing the animal a non-descript in
natural history, he gave his cane a twirl, and saying I
will drop a line to my friend of the Journal at Albany
concerning
this valuable discovery, bowed gracefully to the
company and departed.
No sooner was the decision of the great oracle of the
city promulgated, than hundreds came crowding to see the
non-descript, as he was now termed. Among the rest the
Broadway clerk came in to boast of his sagacity in
discovering
the name of the animal even before the Doctor had
seen him. Nearly all day nothing was heard or talked of
in the city but the non-descript at Stockton's. The street
leading to the place of exhibition was thronged by one
continual
stream of visitors, eager to get a sight of the lion of
the day. Timothy and Jenks pocketed the money in
handfuls
,
and began to think they were made forever. But alas!
who can count on the continuance of the favors of the
changeful goddess of fortune! Our travellers were now
doomed to experience in common with all others the
effects
of her fickleness and caprice. Towards night, while
yet reaping the golden harvest, and now lulled into
security
by their unexpected and unparalleled success, all their
prospects were ruined in a moment by the sagacity of a
New-England drover, who, having been a hunter in early
life, and now being in the city and hearing of the
wonderful
animal, had stepped in to see what it was. After this
man had leisurely surveyed Boaz awhile, he all at once
started up and exclaimed, a shaved bear, as I live! The
words no sooner struck the ear of Timothy, who happened
to be standing near, than he sprang before the man, and
made a masonic signthe drover luckily was a Mason, and
returned the sign. Timothy then very appropriately made
the sign of the Secret Monitor's degree: This was also
understood
and heeded; for the man curling his lip with a
suppressed smile, left the room in silence. Timothy
immediately
stepped to the door where Jenks was still
keeping
his post, and taking him aside informed him of the
occurrence
,
and its fortunate termination through the
instrumentality
of their beloved institution.
O blessed masonry! exclaimed Jenks.
`Yea, blessedthrice blessed and celestially glorious!'
responded Timothy`without this sanctified salvation of
savoring salubrity, we should have been twice disembogued
since we left the land of our depravity; but we have
triumphed
over all, and are now safe.'
Be not too confident of that, Brother Timothy, said
the otherare you sure that no one of the visitors heard
this man's exclamation of shaved bear?
`I declare!' replied Timothy, dropping the elegant, for
the more common mode of expression, as he was wont to
do on most business-like occasions`I declare, I never
thought to see to that.'
Go in immediately then, said Jenks, with much
trepidation
see
if you can discover any symptoms among
them that look like trouble any winks and whispering.
Tim, I am afraid we are ruined after all! I am glad it is
almost night. O, if we can get through this day! he
continued
,
letting his voice fall into a low ejaculating kind of
soliloquy, as Timothy hastily left him for the exhibition
roomIf we can outlive this day, they shall never catch
me in this hornets' nest again till the day of pentecost.
On Timothy's return to the show-room, he soon
perceived
enough to convince him that Jenks' fears and
apprehensions
were not altogether groundless. A midshipman,
it seems, had overheard part of the drover's exclamation,
and, having closely inspected Boaz with his quizzing glass
during Timothy's absence from the room, and discovered
the hairs just beginning to start through the skin, came to
the same conclusion that the creature could be nothing but
a common bear with his hair shaved off. And keeping the
discovery from the public for the purpose of reserving the
frolic of punishing the hoax to himself and his companions,
he was now, as Timothy came into the room, whispering
with one of his fellows to whom he had just communicated
the secret, and conferring on the best mode of kicking up
a row on the occasion. The wicked looks of the two
fellows
as they stood in one corner engaged in a close
conversation
,
occasionally glancing their eyes from Boaz to
Timothy, at once convinced the latter that they had
mischief
in view which was intended for himself and Boaz;
and accordingly he kept a close watch of their movements.
After whispering awhile, these two fellows went out, and
Timothy began to hope he was mistaken as to their
intentions
.
But he was not long left to console himself with
such reflections; for they soon returned with two other
companions, when all, as if to remove all doubts as to the
identity of Boaz, fell to scrutinizing him anew with their
glasses. While they were thus engaged, Timothy's quick
ear caught parts of sentences, as one of the two who came
in last was whispering to the otherDn me for a
lubber
,
if Tom an't rightI've seen many a bear in cruising
no mistakelet's get under weighno time to lose, &c.
Soon after this they all four stole out of the room as slyly
as possible, and went off into the city.
Timothy lost no time in informing Jenks of all he had
seen. The latter on hearing this account, was at no loss
in coming to the conclusion that these fellows, whom he
had himself noticed with suspicion, had gone off to raise a
band of their companions for a mob. And he told
Timothy
that their only chance now was to clear out all the
visitors
as quick as possible, and lock up the exhibition-room.
This measure being concluded on, Timothy went in and
informed the company that they wished to close the
exhibition
for a short time, and that those who wished to
examine
the animal any further could have an opportunity in
the evening. But the company were slow in obeying the
ordersome said they could not come againothers they
had paid their money and had a right to stay as long as
they pleased; and all seemed to think that no harm would
be done by a little delay. What was to be done? Any
appearance of impatience on the part of the keepers might
create suspicion. Jenks stood on thorns as he witnessed the
dilatory movements of the company dropping off one by one
at long intervals. He could have pulled them out by their
necks in the agony of his impatience to see them gone;
but he was afraid to manifest the least uneasiness. As no
new ones, however, were now admitted, the number of
those within gradually diminished; and finally, all but two
or three took their departure. Just at this time Jenks heard
a distant hum like that of an approaching multitude. He
instantly called Timothy and told him to clear the room
with the utmost despatch. It was some time however
before
the latter succeeded in getting the two remaining
visiters
started, as one was telling a story in which he did not
like to be interrupted till he had got through. Meanwhile
the clamor and noise appeared to be rapidly approaching;
and the yelping of dogs could be distinguished among the
other sounds that now began to swell loudly on the breeze.
Jenks could stand it no longer, and was about rushing into
the exhibition-room to drive the remaining loiterers out by
force, when he met them coming out. No sooner had the
feet of the hindmost of these passed out of the reach of
the door, than, swinging it to as if he considered life or
death depended on the act, he hastily locked it, not
however
till he had caught a glimpse of the enemy in full force
rushing into the yard. In a moment they were at the door
thundering for admittance. Our travellers paused an
instant
to listen to the exclamations of the besieging
multitude
.
Is the tar and feathers come, Jack? said one voice.
Send off for more dogs, said another. Bring along the
rail, cried a third. Beat down the doorwhat's the use
in puttering? exclaimed a fourth.
Timothy and Jenks waited no longer, but hastily tying
up the contents of their chest in their pocket-handkerchiefs,
they began their retreat through the window in the rear,
which, as we have before mentioned, the prudence of Jenks,
had provided as a retreat from danger. They had scarcely
let themselves down on the other side before the door of
the exhibition room flew from its hinges before the bars
and axes of the assailants, who now rushed tumultuously
into the room. Damn my eyes, Tom, the knaves have
escaped!but here is the bear, exclaimed one. Let
him loose! turn him into the street! call up the dogs!
said several. Look in that back room, cried the first
the fellows can't be far off, for I saw one of the damned
rascals just retreating into the door as we hove in sight.
Such were the consoling sounds that fell on the ears of
our travellers as they were making their way with all
convenient
speed over fences, through back yards, gates, &c.
into a dark alley that led out to a street on the opposite
side of the squarestill pursuing their way with hot
haste they paused not til they had got two squares between
them and the scene of action. Here, just as they came
out into a long street, their ears were saluted by the
mingled
din of the voices of dogs and men, and looking in
the direction of the clamor, they saw Boaz crossing the
street but one square from them upon the keen skip with
a troop of dogs of all sorts and sizes at his heels, filling
the air with the discordant cries of pup, cur, bull and
mastiff
,
commingling with the shouts of the mob pushing on
hard behind them. All at once Boaz made a halt in the
middle of the street and turned with terrible fury on his
four-footed pursuers. Immediately the last dying yelp of
some luckless cur sent up quivering in the air by the teeth
of the enraged Bear, the bass groan of the bull dog
coming
within reach of his loving embrace, and the death
screech of others, announced to his old masters that their
ursine companion was not idle. While Jenks and
Timothy
stood witnessing with exultation the gallant exploits of
Boaz, the whole pack of dogs, as their masters came up
and encouraged them by their presence, sprang at once
upon the poor animal. A tremendous struggle now
ensued
,
and many a dog paid for his temerity by the forfeit of
his life before their dread antagonist yielded up his breath
and fell beneath the overpowering numbers of his foes.
There is the last of poor Boaz! said Jenks with a
sigh; but he has died like a hero!
In ten minutes from this time our travellers were on
board a sloop which they fortunately found at the wharf
getting under weigh for Albany. The breeze sprang up,
and with the fading twilight the sight and sounds of the
receding city slowly melted in darkness and silence.
CHAPTER XII.
Help, muse, this once, we do implore,
And we will trouble thee no more.
Hudibras
improved
.
It
was a pleasant autumnal morning, and the sun shone
warmly and brightly down into that stupendous chasm of
the Highlands, through which the majestic Hudson is
forever
rolling his vast column of pure and uncontaminated
waters, the accumulated tribute of a thousand hills, to cool
and freshen the turbid bosom of the briny ocean. On the
deck of a sloop moored at a landing near this picturesqe
spot two men were now to be seen sitting, like tailors, with
something between them on which they appeared to be
intensely
employed; while the sounds of axes on shore, and
the appearance of several men throwing wood towards the
vessel, denoted that she had hauled up at this place to take
in a quantity of that article, and that all the crew, except
the two persons just mentioned, were now engaged on
shore for that purpose. Of these two last named
personages
,
one was a dumpy looking fellow of the apparent age
of about thirty-five, with red hair and a freckled face. The
other was evidently much younger, tall and well formed in
his person. His hair and eyes were black; and indeed he
was every way as remarkable for his fine, as his companion
for his insignificant, appearance. After they had been
thus busily engaged awhile the younger one, suddenly
springing on to his legs, bounded several feet from the
deck, snapping his fingers and exclaiming, Nine hundred
and forty-four odd dollars! O thunder and bombs! O
lightning! two lightnings! O Jupiter and Jeremiah!
Nine hundred and forty-four odd dollars! What shall we
do with it all? Upon my sequacity I did not dream there
was so much. O Nebuchadnezzar and the rest of the
patriarchs
,
what a tornado of effulgent fortune has befel us!
Hurra! Huzza! kick over the chairsraise Ned, and break
things! `Come, come, Tim,' said the other, who, though
partaking largely in the raptures of his friend, seemed less
enthusiastic in the manner of expressing them, `come,
Tim, you are out of your senses. They will observe you on
shore, if you crack and crow at this rate. Come, sit down
again, and let us divide this windfall according to
agreement
;
and then we will talk over other matters.' The
parties were soon again seated with the glittering heap
between
them, and with a sort of suppressed chuckling, and
eyes beaming with exultation and delight, proceeded to the
task of dividing the booty. This pleasing employment was
at length satisfactorily completed; and each one gathered
up his portion, and, carefully tying it up in an extra
cravat
,
deposited it in his bundle.
Now, brother Timothy, said the elder, what do you
propose to drive at by way of laying out your money? I
believe, he continued without waiting for a reply, I
believe
I shall go directly home and pay off the mortgage on
my place. I shall have money enough now to square off
every thing to the last cent, and have some odd change
left, I guess. Gemini! who would have thought of such
thumping luck! By George! I'll get the old woman a
bran-fir'd new calico at Albany, and the boys a bushel of
fishhooks. Lord! how the little devils will grin and snap
their eyes when I get home!and the old womanTim,
I kinder like the old creature, after all, if she does raise a
clatter about masonry once in a while.But as I was
saying
,
what are you going to do?
`Why, as to myself, brother Jenks,' replied Timothy, `I
have been thinking that I should make some tarryfication
at Albany; and, if I can get in with the brethren there,
I shall take the higher degrees of masonry, and perhaps
attend to the great study of the forty-seven Euclids,
mentioned
in our lectures.'
You are right, brother Timothy, said the other, you
have now the lucre to enable you to perfect yourself in the
great and noble art of masonry; and I advise you by all
manner of means to attend to it. I have a masonic friend
at Albany who will introduce you into his lodge. If I had
your gifts, Timothy, I would be a great man. When I
proposed to you to join me in this expedition to New York,
I knew what your appearance and gifts of speech would
do. I can contrive as well as the fattest of them, but
hang me, if I can argue. You see how cutely I planned
out this show business of Boaz which has lined our
pockets
so handsomely. And for all that you remember how
they all always seemed to look and listen to you to explain
and expound mattersand how all the ladies gathered
round you, while me, the main-spring of the whole, they
would scarcely notice at all. It makes me mad when I
think of it. But blast 'em, I have now got pretty well
paid for bearing their treatment this time; for mean and
insignificant as they appeared to think me, I had wit
enough, it seems, to Tom-fool the whole posse of 'em there
in New-York, big-bugs and all. But as to you, there is
some encouragement for you to advance in Masonry. You
can stay a few months in Albany, perfect yourself in all
the lower degrees, and take all the higher. And when
you have done this I have no doubt you will be one of the
brightest Masons in all America. You can then travel
where you please and get a good living by lecturing to the
lodges about the country. Your fortune will then be
made, and then you will be a great man, Timothy.
`That is precisely the plan,' rejoined our hero, as he
pulled up his cravat in the dignified consciousness of
meriting
his companion's encomiums, `that is precisely the
plan I ramified and co-operated for myself before I left
home, provided we should meet with that indelible
success
in the exhibition of Boaz which we hoped and
prophetized
,
and which has now, bating the poor animals'
abolishment
,
transpired and expanded to a certain occurment.'
Ah! poor Boaz! said Jenks mournfully, How sorry
I am that we could not have got him away alive! what
a noble fellow for a bear he was, Timothy! and how
bravely
he died!
`Yes,' observed the other with kindling enthusiasm,
`Yes, as I looked on with the most indignant admiration,
and saw them expunging the life of the poor fellow, I
thought of Csar who was killed and assassinated in the
senate by Brutus and a concatenation of others, and who
only had time to look Brutus in the face and say,
tu Brute
,
which meant, I suppose,
too much of a brute
, and this I
take it was the reason why the murderer was called
Brutus
.
But why I similified the two cases was because Boaz
was also assassinated by brutes, like Csar. And I
opinionate
likewise the death of Boaz resembles the way and
manner, that we read some of our ancient brethren were
put to the torture and rackthose two machines that they
used to bind and murder Masons upon, to get their secrets
in the days of poperarity.'
That is very true, rejoined Jenks, and, like those old
martyrs, Boaz may be considered as dying for the cause
of masonry, since he was the means of helping us to money
which you are agoing to lay out in studying, and of course
in extending the knowledge of the art; and if you should
become a great Mason, Timothy, by means of the money
he brought you, he will have been a great benefit to our
order, and ought to have a monument, like those old
heroes
and martyrs, erected to his memory. I wish you would
write a pair of verses about him, Timothysame as if they
were going to be put on a grave-stone,
epitaphs
I think
they call them.
`My mind,' replied Timothy, in answer to this request
or proposition of his friend, `my mind was never much
diverged
towards rhymetry, but we may as well have our time
amplified, on our voyage, in writing something for the
glorification
of his memory, as in any other way, since we
have but little else to procrastinate our leisure
employment
.'
The crew now coming on board and beginning to take
in their wood, this interesting discussion upon the
character
of Boaz, and on the propriety of composing an elegiac
tribute to his memory, was of course suspended. In a short
time, however, the wood was taken inall the business
for which the vessel had moored was completed, and she
was again put before the wind and proceeded slowly on
her voyage. After indulging awhile in viewing the
magnificent
and diversified scenery that opened in beauty and
grandeur on either side of them as they wound their way
along the bends of this noble and picturesque river, our
friends began to bethink them of the task which they
lately
had under consideration, that of honoring the lamented
Boaz with an epitaph. They accordingly borrowed pen,
ink and paper of the captain, and going to a retired part of
the deck, fitted or piled up some square boxes of freight
so that they very well answered the double purpose of seats
and writing desk. Here, being again by themselves, they
resumed the discussion of the subject.
Now, as I told you, Brother Jenks, observed Timothy,
as he spread a sheet of white paper before him, and held
the pen in his hand shaking out its superfluity of ink,
now as I told you, I comprehend the art of poetification
but badly. I have often tried, but I never could make
more than one line of rhyming in my life without
confuscating
my sentiments or debasing the sublimity of my
language
.
And I should rather prefer concocting an oration
instead of making a rhymified curtailment on this grievous
occasion.
`I still think,' said Jenks, firmly persisting in his opinion,
`that a pair of verses would be much more fitting for an
epitaph. If you cannot do it yourself, perhaps we both
could by putting our heads together. Now suppose you
write the first two lines, and kinder give a pitch to it; and
I guess I can think up two more to match them, and so
make it rhyme,what say you?'
I will make the endeavor of a beginning, replied our
hero, If you really think that the most feasible
designment
.
`But is there not some rule,' asked the other, `for making
verses? I conclude all the lines have to be of a particular
length: For unless we know how long each one is to be,
how can we get the others right?'
To be sure, replied the other, I have somewhere
read the rules of making rhymetryI think it was Blair's
Lecturizing, or some other great work on the
decomposition
of language; and I believe the length of the lines is
reckoned by feet
`Inches, more like!' interrupted Jenks`who on earth
ever heard of a line of poetry two or three feet long?'
Why, I don't exactly understand it myself, said
Timothy
,
somewhat puzzled how to get along with the question,
but still I am very explicit that the book said feet, and
did not, as I commemorate, mention inches at all. I don't
know that I can explanitate the business very
discriminately
myself. Yet I suppose these feet are not so long as
common feetprobably not longer than inches, as you
opinionate. But one thing I am certain and conclusive
about, and that is, that all the lines must be measured.
`Well then,' said Jenks, `we wont puzzle our brains any
more on that point, but measure for ourselves. So you may
write off a couple of lines of about a proper length, and I
will try to mate them in due order and proportion.'
Our hero now took his pen, and wrote a caption; and,
then, after thinking awhile, now putting his pen almost to
the paper, now taking it suddenly back to relapse into
musing
again, and exhibiting sundry other of the usual
symptoms
and sufferings of mental parturition, he at length
dashed off two whole lines without the least pause or
hesitation
,
and handed them over to his companion, whose
more mechanical genius, it was expected, would enable
him to match them with alternate rhyme. Jenks was for
proceeding to business in proper form, and doing every
thing in a workmanlike manner. He accordingly took the
paper and first laid it squarely before him. After this was
adjusted, he thrust his hands into his breeches' pocket, and
drew out a little folded box-wood rule, which, as he said,
being somewhat of a joiner, he always carried about with
him. He then took the exact measure of the length of the
two lines which Timothy had written, in inches, fourths,
eighths, &c., agreeably to the rule which his literary friend
had suggested. Having ascertained the measure in this
manner, he next took a separate piece of paper, and
pricking
off a corresponding space, drew two perpendiculars
for boundaries on the right and left, so that he might write
his lines horizontally and at right angles between them,
and have their required length indicated without the
trouble
of repeated measurement to find when he had got them
of the right length. Having thus hit on a satisfactory
plan for preserving the measure which his friend had
adopted
,
he then read the lines that were to be mated, and,
humming over the closing or final words of each, put his
M
brains to the task to get two others of corresponding sound
to make the rhyme. These he had the good fortune to hit
upon without much trouble, and having done so, he
carefully
placed them close against the right perpendicular, for
the final or rhyming words of the two lines which were to
constitute his part of the performance. Nothing now
remained
but the less important task of finding sentiment
and words to fill up the lines. And this, after running over
the words in the two lines of Timothy awhile to get the
jog of them, as he expressed it, he very soon and very
happily effected; and then, with much self-gratulation,
transcribed and placed them exactly under Timothy's lines
in their order, thus completing one verse of their
undertaking
to the mutual satisfaction of the parties. Another
verse was then begun and finished in the same manner;
and thus they proceeded through five entire verses, which
brought them to the conclusion of their performance.
This notable production of partnership poetry I have most
fortunately been enabled to obtain; and to remove all
doubts of its genuineness I can assure the reader that I
now have it before me in the original hand writing, and on
the same piece of paper on which it was first written. I
shall make no apologies in offering it entire, believing that
my masonic readers at least will be capable of justly
appreciating
its merits, and concur with me in considering it
a morceau of genius too precious to be lost. It is as
follows
:
AN EPITAPH ON A FOUR-FOOTED BROTHER.
Here lies the poor Boaz, our dogmatized brother,
Most potently skill'd at the grip or the token;
And yet all his Masonry proved but a bother
He made signs of distress, but his guts were ripp'd open.
Like Sampson he fell on the loss of his hair,
But the arches of glory bent o'er him in falling
For the Philistine dogs by the dozen were there,
By the help of his jaw-bone laid kicking and sprawling.
Like the Templars of yore he died for the cause,
And ne'er flinch'd till his frontier exposures were riven
But I guess he's at rest, now sucking his claws,
For the crows were last seen with him going towards heaven.
And he there, bidding sun, moon, and lesser lights, hail!
Aye shall stand by his great brother Bear in the stars
And snarl at the lionsnap off the ram's tail,
And fight the old dog-star like thunder and mars.
Let masonic pig-asses in tempests of rhyme,
Then trumpet his honors from ocean to sea
And the curse be decreed, on account of this crime,
That no dog shall hereafter a freemason be.
Such the chaste, classical and elegant offspring of the
masonic muse as invoked by the combined efforts of our
two friends in behalf of the memory and virtues of their
lamented brother, Boaz! It perhaps were needless to
attempt
its praise, or to say how much it resembles, in
beauty
and pathos, many of those much admired songs and odes,
which through the consenting judgment of ages, are now
found gracing the pages of the Book of Constitutions. I have
been particular in describing the original mode of
versification
which the writers of this unique and inimitable
production
here adopted, in the construction of their rhymes,
in order to give modern rhymers, especially the ode-makers
of the masonic household, the benefit of the improvement.
They will not fail, I think, to see at once its advantages, and
avail themselves of the system accordingly. Some may
perhaps say that this system is liable to objection, as
having
a greater tendency than the old one to lead those
adopting
it to sacrifice the sense to the rhyme. But in answer
to this I would say, that I believe there is little danger of
making matters much worse in this respect than they
always
have been among even the most celebrated rhymers:
For some of the most approved of these, it would seem,
have considered, with the humorous author of the work
from which I have quoted at the beginning of this chapter,
that
Rhyme the rudder is of verses,
which implies that the rhyme must govern, whatever shall
become of the sense or sentiment. We learn from one of
the annotators of Pope, in one of the first editions of his
works published after his death, that the great poet finished
and sent to the press the copy of his Essay on Man,
with those well known introductory lines proposing as they
now read to
Expatiate free on all this scene of man,
A mighty maze, but not without a plan!
written in the following manner:
Expatiate free o'er all this scene of man,
A mighty maze,
and all without
a plan!
But on being told by a judicious literary friend that the
whole treatise went directly to contradict this proposition
which he had laid down as the foundation of his work, all
going to prove a great and connected plan in all the
operations
of the Deity, he, with a most accommodating spirit,
took his pen and altered the last line of the couplet as it
now stands,
A mighty maze,
but not
without a plan!
Thus transforming himself from an atheist, a believer in
chance, and a want of any fixed order in the works of
creation
,
as the line, as he first had it would imply, into a
consistent
believer in the settled and determinate plans of
providence, and all this too, as one would judge, only
because
he luckily hit on another phrase that would effect
the change without injuring the rhyme! If the
consideration
of rhyme then could thus influence the great and
acknowledged model and father of versification, what may
not be expected from the children? Alas then for those
who depend, for moral or ethical guides, on the maxims
and precepts of rhyming philosophers!
CHAPTER XIII.
Intry, mintry, cutry corn,
Apple seed and apple thorn;
Wier, brier, limber lock,
Three geese
in a flock.
Nursery Ballad
.
On
the second morning after leaving the great
emporium
of trade, and the patroness of mobs and shaved bears,
our travellers arrived safe and sound, in purse and limb, at
the busy mart of Fort Orange, as Albany was called by
the original Dutch settlers. Leaving Timothy in a sort of
Dutch doggery, or sailor's hotel, situated near the wharf,
Jenks immediately went in search of the friend to whom
he had proposed to introduce the former. He soon
returned
,
however, with the news that this friend was absent from
the city. In this dilemma he advised Timothy to put
himself
on his own resources for an introduction into society,
telling him if he would rig himself up with a new suit of
clothes, and take lodgings in some fashionable hotel with
a well furnished bar, he could find no difficulty in
becoming
acquainted with the brotherhood. The two friends
then took a formal and tender leave of each other, after a
mutual promise of correspondence by letter till Timothy
should rejoin the other in a few months, the next spring at
the farthest, under his hospitable roof in the
Green-Mountains
.
Our hero felt much regret at first in being separated
from his friend, and thus suddenly deprived of his company
and council. But lack of a just confidence in himself
being
never a very prominent defect in our hero's character,
he now felt, therefore, but little hesitation in putting
himself
at once in the way of public notice. In accordance
with the suggestion of Jenks, and more perhaps in
compliance
with the dictates of his own feelings, he determined
in the first place to obtain that by no means uncurrent
pass-port to good society, a fine suit of apparel. He
therefore took his bundle in his hand and went directly in
search of a merchant tailor. Having found one he at once
stated his wish to purchase a genteel suit of clothes. The
man eying Timothy an instant, observed, he presumed
he had none that would fit, and was about turning away
when his eye glancing on a roll of bank bills which our hero
was holding in his fingers, he suddenly recollected a suit
or two that would doubtless suit to a hair. It was
surprising
,
he said, that he should have forgotten them.
Suit after suit was then produced by this vulgar fraction of
M*
humanity, and a bargain was soon completed to the
mutual
satisfaction of both parties. And Timothy, having
enrobed
himself in his new purchase, and made his toilet with
suitable care in a private room furnished him by the now
very accommodating tailor, immediately set out to look up
a boarding house. After going the rounds of the public
houses awhile, and making all necessary inquiries, he at
length took lodgings in a popular hotel in the best part of
the city, which eminently possessed the requisites
mentioned
by Jenks, it being celebrated as a house of choice
liquors, and as a resort of all those who justly appreciate
them. Timothy's next object was to form some masonic
acquaintance. And in this he was peculiarly fortunate.
At the dinner table, to which he was soon summoned after
engaging his board he threw out the usual masonic sign
as he lowered his empty glass from his lips, and had the
pleasure of seeing it answered by a young gentleman who
sat opposite to him. As soon as the company rose from
the table Timothy made a sign or beck to this newly
discovered
brother, and was followed by him, though with
evident
reluctance, to the room which the landlord had
assigned
to the former. They were no sooner alone in the
room than this person observed that he regretted very
much the low state of the funds of his lodge, and he was
fearful that little or nothing could be spared at that time,
still however he was always willing to hear a brother's
story
.
Timothy, as soon as he could find a place to break in
upon his alarmed brother, proceeded to inform him that he
had no desire to draw on the charities of his brethren, but
having a few hundred dollars at his command, and being
very desirous to perfect himself in Masonry, he knew of no
way in which he could spend his money more profitably or
pleasantly; and all the assistance he desired was such
introductions
to the brethren of the place as would be
necessary
in pursuing this object. The merchant, for he
proved to be a young merchant of the city, on hearing that
no draft was to be made on his charity, as he seemed
rather
hastily to have anticipated, immediately broke through
the atmosphere of restraint and repulsiveness in which he
had enveloped himself on entering the room, and suddenly
became very sociable and friendly. He highly
commended
our hero's intention of pursuing such a noble study as
Masonry. He greatly respected such people, he observed,
and always felt bound to sell them goods much cheaper
than he sold them to others. His name he said was Van
Stetter, and his store was in  street, where he was ever
extremely happy to see his friends.
A general understanding having thus been effected
between
Timothy and Van Stetter, they fell to conversing on
other topics; and before they had been together one hour
they had become, by the strength of the mystic tie, not
only familiar acquaintances but sworn friends. The
merchant
then arose, and repeating his friendly offers, and
promising to furnish a supply of masonic books as soon as
Timothy should wish to commence his studies, bid the
latter
a good day and departed. Much did our hero
congratulate
himself, when the other was gone, on his good
fortune
in thus happily securing so valuable an acquaintance;
and he could not help again blessing, and admiring anew,
that glorious institution which could so soon convert an
entire stranger into a faithful friend.
Being now fairly settled, and every thing appearing
bright before him, Timothy's first care was to write a long
letter to his parents, informing them of his singular good
fortune, and of his present determination to remain for the
present in Albany in order to become a great man in
Masonry
,
which would perhaps take him till the next spring to
accomplish. Having performed this pleasing task, and
dispatched his letter by mail, he spent several of the
following
days in viewing the different parts of the city, and
its various curiosities, before sitting down to those
important
studies in which he felt conscious he was destined
shortly to become a great and distinguished adept.
In the course of a few days Van Stetter, who had been
absent on business most of the time since the introduction
above mentioned, called at Timothy's room and brought
him a large supply of masonic books; and at the same
time informed him that the lodge of which he was a
member
held a meeting that evening, and gave him an
invitation
to attend as a visiting brother. Timothy was
overjoyed
at this gratifying intelligence and thankfully accepted
the kind invitation of his friend. Accordingly at the
appointed
hour, they repaired to the lodge-room. Here they
found a goodly number of the brethren assembled,
although
the lodge was not yet called to order. This gave
Timothy an excellent opportunity of being personally
introduced
to most of the members, by all of whom he was
received and treated with many flattering attentions. And
not a little elated were his feelings by such a reception
from men of the appearance and consequence of those by
whom he was now surrounded. He felt that glow of
inward
complacency which is ever experienced by modest
merit when treated according to its conscious worth; and
he perceived at once how greatly he had been underrated
by the world. But now he had at last got into that sphere
for which his high endowments had designed him, and from
which he had been kept only by his inauspicious fortune
that had thrown him among those who were
incapable
of appreciating his merits. Equally gratifying
likewise
was this meeting to our hero in other respects. The
gifted promptitude with which the work of the lodge was
performedthe splendour of the furniture, the rich
dresses
,
and the dazzling decorations of the members, together
with the convivial elegance of the refreshments, did not
fail to make a lively impression on the mind of one who, as
yet, had seen only the interior of an ill-furnished
lodge-room
in the Green-Mountains; and he went home filled
with renewed love and veneration for the mystic beauties
of divine Masonry.
In about a week after the lodge meeting above
mentioned
,
a meeting of the Temple Royal Arch Chapter was
holden
at Temple Lodge Room in the city; and Timothy, at
the suggestion of his friend, Van Stetter, preferred his
application
to that body for receiving the Royal Arch degree.
Having presented his credentials from the Lodge, where he
was initiated and received the subordinate degrees, to
several
of his masonic acquaintance, he was by their
recommendations
balloted in; and, as there was another
applicant
for the degree present, it was proposed to make up the
team, as it is beautifully termed in masonic technics, by a
volunteer, and exalt both the candidates that very evening.
The imagination of Timothy had long dwelt with rapture on
the happy hour which was to make him a Royal Arch Mason,
and now as that much desired event was at hand, his
feelings
and fancy were wrought up to the highest pitch of
expectation
;
and it was with the most trembling anxiety,
and fearful interest that he entered upon this new and
untried
scene in the vast labyrinth of masonic wonders. Yet
he manfully submitted to the ceremonials; and as brightly
as he had pictured to himself the glories of this degree he
found the reality still more splendid and impressive. But
I will not attempt to describe the deep and mingled
emotions
,
the rapid alternations of fear, amazement and
admiration
which took possession of his breast as he passed
through those august and awful ceremoniesas he now
encountered the living arch, formed by the conjoined hands
of two long rows of the brethren, and thus compassing
numerous
manual cross-chains which rose and fell like so
many
saw-gates, over the impeded path of the
low-stooping
candidate who strove on beneath in all the bother and
agony
of a poor wretch running the gauntlet, sometimes
cuffed
and buffetted, sometimes knocked back, sometimes
pitched forward, and sometimes entirely overthrown and
kept scrambling on his back, like some luckless mud-turtle
in the hands of a group of mischievous urchins, till the
sport had lost its charms of novelty for the tittering
brotherhood
as
he now took the rough and rugged rounds of
his dark and perplexing pilgrimage, sometimes hobbling
over net-ropes, chairs and benches, sometimes tumbling
headlong over heaps of wood and faggots, and sometimes
compelled to dodge, curl down his head, hop up, or dance
about, to save his pate and shins from clubs, brick-bats and
cannon balls, that fell and flew about the room in all
directions
on the
breaking down of the walls of Jerusalem
as now
he was lowered down into the dark, subterraneous vault to
find the sacred ark, in the shape of an old cigar-box, and
was scorched,suffocated, and blown almost sky high by a
terrible
explosion of burning gun-powderas now he kneeled
at the altar to take the
voluntary
oath, under the pressure
of sharp instruments and uplifted swordsas he now
listened
to the deep toned and solemn prayer of the High
Priestand, in fine, as now he was admitted to the light,
and beheld the splendid furniture of the lodge-room, the
gorgeous robes of scarlet and purple of the Council, the
white garments and glittering breast-plate of the High
Priest, and the crimson habiliments of the Grand King,
wearing the awful mitre, inscribed, Holiness to the
Lord.
But these scenes of almost oppressive sublimity were
occasionally
relieved by those of a lighter character; and
the comic and amusing, like sunshine through a summer's
cloud, often broke beautifully in to enliven and diversify
the performance.
As the old Jewish guide who personates Moses leading
the children of Israel through the wilderness, under the
masonic
title of Principal Sojourner, now conducted the
hoodwinked candidates through or rather over the
semblant
wilderness of the lodge-room, consisting, as before
intimated, of heaps of wood, brush, chairs and benches,
the company, bating the unavoidable affliction of battered
shins and broken noses, met with many amusing
adventures
.
On arriving at each of the guarded passes on their
rout, or veils as they are technically called, the guide was
compelled to give certain pass-words before they were
suffered
to proceed. But Moses, being now somewhat old, and
having grown rather rusty in the use of these words, it
having
been about a thousand years since he had used them
much, was often sadly puzzled to recollect them, and
made many diverting mistakes in endeavoring to give them
at the places where they were required. I am that I am,
being the pass-words for the first veil, Moses, as he
approached
the master, exclaimed in his Jewish brogue,
What a ram I am? The master shook his head. I
am dat ram, den, said the improving guide`No!' said
the master. Well den, said Moses, I am dat I ram
not quiteI am dat I am. `Right, worthy
pilgrims
,'
said the master, `proceed on your way. I see you
have the true pass-words. You will find many difficulties
to encounter. Your next pass-words are
Shem, Ham and
Japhet
don't forget them.' Thus permitted to proceed, they
pursued their journey and soon arrived at the next veil. But
here again, alas for the memory of poor old Mosesthe
pass-words, which he had been so strictly charged to
remember
,
had quite escaped him; but the old sojourner
had no notion of giving up in despair, and accordingly he
at once put his wits to the trumps in trying to stumble
again on the words of this masonic
Se same
. And soon
beginning
to rally his scattered ideas, and remembering the
pass-words consisted of the names of three men of
scriptural
notoriety, he, with that inimitable humour and
drollery
with which Masonry has here so appositely invested his
character, now cried out to the master,
She shake, Me
shake and Abed-we-go
. But the master gave him so stern
a look of rebuke that it threw him at first into some
confusion
.
Soon recovering, however, he hammed and hawed
once or twice, and, in a subdued tone of voice, said,
Shadrach
,
Meshack and Abednigo
. `No! no!' said the master.
Well, it was some tree peoples I be sure, said the
guide scratching his head and looking round in obvious
perplexity, it was, let me see, it was, `
Shem, Japhet and
Bacon-leg
.'
The master still shook his head, but with a look of more
encouragement.
It was den, it was Shem, Japhet and Ham which be de
same nor bacon-leg.
Try again, worthy pilgrim, said the softening master.
Oh! Ah! exclaimed Moses with
urekaen
rapture, I
have it now, it was `
Shem, Ham and Japhet
.'
Such is a faint sample of the scintillations of wit and
the bright flashes of thought and fancy that were made to
sparkle and shine through this splendid performance; and
accompanied as these chaste and innocent sallies always
were by the most exhilerating shouts of laughter and
applause
from the surrounding companions, it failed not to
render the scene one of indescribable interest.
Nor were other parts of the performance much less
replete
with interest and instructive amusement. After the
finding of the long lost ark, the opening of that sacred
vessel
,
and the discovery of the bible in the presence of the
council, who make the walls of the lodge-room resound
with hallelujahs of rejoicing on the occasion; the
detection
of a substance which the High Priest guesses,
presumes
and finally declares to be manna, comprised a
scene alike delightful to the curious, the thoughtless and
the learned. And then the closing, the closing act of this
magnificent drama! the marching in a circle of the gay
and glittering companionsthe three times three raising
of the arms, stamping of the feet and spatting of the hands
the breaking off into tripple squads and the raising of the
Royal or Living Arch, chanting in deep toned cadences
beneath its apex of bumping heads, that sublime motto of
metrical wisdom
As we three did agree
The sacred word to keep,
And as we three did agree
The sacred word to search,
So we three do agree
To close this Royal Arch.
What could be more grand, more imposing and
beautiful
!
Our hero stood wrapt in admiration at the spectacle.
The early associations of his childhood rushed instantly on
his mind; for he here at once beheld the origin, as well as
the combined beauties of those exquisite little juvenile
dramas which have ever been the praise and delight of
succeeding generations:
Come Philander let's be a marching.
And again that other no less beautiful one, where the
resemblance
is still more striking
You nor I nor no man knows
How oats, peas, beans and barley grows,
Thus the farmer sows his peas,
Thus he stands and takes his ease,
He stamps his foot, he spats his hands,
He wheels about, and thus he stands.
In this degree also, besides the invaluable acquisition of
the long lost word which is here regained, the key to the
ineffable characters or Royal Arch Cypher, and many other
secrets of equally momentous consequence, our hero
gained
much historical information which was equally new and
important, and which served to correct some erroneous
impressions
which he had derived from those uncertain
authorities
,
the common uninitiated historians. It was here he
learned for the first time the interesting circumstance that
the bible was discovered and preserved by Zerubbabel and
his companions, all Royal Arch Masons; and consequently
that but for Masonry all Christendom would even to
this day have been groping in pagan darkness. Here
also
was brought to light the astounding fact that Moses, as
before intimated, lived to the unparalleled age of about
one thousand years! This fact which is obtained only
through the medium of Masonry, he inferred with
indisputable
certainty from that part of the degree which
represents
Moses present and yet hale and hearty, at the
destruction
or breaking down of the walls of Jerusalem, and
indeed for years after, which every chronologist knows would
make him of the age I have mentioned. These two facts
alone, if nothing else were contained in this degree, would
be sufficient to render it of incalculable importance; but
these were but as a drop of the bucket compared with the
great arcana of hidden knowledge which was here
unfolded
,
and all of it too of equal importance and authenticity
of the specimens just given. Deeply indeed did the thirsty
soul of Timothy drink in the treasured beauties of this
concealed
fountain of light and wisdom. All that he had
before
seen of the glories of Freemasonry fell far short, in his
N
opinion, of the mingled beauty, wisdom and magnificence
of this closing act in the great and stupendous drama of
ancient Freemasonry. Nor was he at all singular in this
opinion. Other great men have considered this degree
the same, as I am gratified to learn from a recent work by
my acute and accomplished masonic cotemporary, Mr. W.
L. Stone, who considers this degree far more splendid and
effective than either of its predecessors; while of those
predecessors, or inferior degrees, he says they impressed
lessons on his mind which he hopes will never be
effaced
.
Thus we here see one of those singular and striking
coincidences which will often happen in the views and
impressions
which have been entertained on the same point
by two such minds as those of our hero, and the unbiased
author above quoted, when they would have no means of
knowing the opinions entertained by each other.
But as beautiful and perfect as our hero considered this
noble degree, there was yet one little scene which he
believed
to be capable of improvement. It was that in
which the High Priest, on opening the discovered ark, finds
a substance which he and the Council, after tasting,
smelling
and divers other evidences of doubt, concluded to be
manna. Now the improvements suggested, consisted in
calling up old Moses, who was then on the spot to settle
the question at once, whether the substance was manna or
not; for he, it will be recollected, was the very person
who put it in the ark, eight or nine hundred years before,
when he and his people were in the wilderness, feeding on
this same manna, of course he would at once determine
whether this was the same kind of stuff which formerly
served for the fish, flesh, fowl, bread and pudding, of his
breakfast, dinner and supper. This suggested
improvement
,
however, in which I have the happiness to concur
with my hero, is now submitted to the craft with the most
humble deference, but should it meet with their
approbation
,
and especially that of my friend Mr. Stone, they and
he are heartily welcome to the suggestion; and I shall
wait with some anxiety for the appearance of the next
edition
of the work of that author, to see whether he considers
the proposed alteration, worthy of adoption. But to return to
our hero. How was his mind raised and expanded by the
scenes of this glorious evening! A few months before, he
would have thought, in his ignorance, the use of that
awful epithet, I am that I am, in the manner above
described
,
to be nothing less than the most daring impiety,
and the representation of God in the burning bush, the
height of blasphemous presumption. But now, he the
more admired the privileges of that institution which
permits
its sons to do that with impunity, and even praise,
which in the rest of the world would be audacious and
criminal. And he could not help looking with pity on the
condition of all those yet out of the pale of the masonic
sanctum sanctorum. For he was now fully satisfied that all
wisdom, virtue and religion are here concentrated. And
he felt himself immeasurably exalted above the rest of
mankind, like one of the superior beings in full fellowship
with God, whom he had just seen represented as one
mingling
in the ceremonies of the lodge-room.
CHAPTER XIV.
There are more things in heaven and earth, Horatio,
Than any but Freemasons ever dreamed of.
Shakespeare improved
.
The
next morning, Timothy, having passed a night of
much crural uneasiness, rose early, and went down to the
bar, with a view of getting some brandy to bathe his shins.
Here he encountered Van Stetter, who, being just in the
act of taking his morning potation, warmly pressed the
former to join him, telling him that the internal application
of a double fog-cutter, would prove a much more pleasant
and effective medicine, to one in his condition. But our
hero rather declined the prescription, observing that he
usually drank but little spirits, and he had always thought
that the habit of daily drinking was inconsistent with
correct
morals. Van Stetter at first endeavored to laugh
Timothy out of such countryfied whims, but finding him
serious
in what he had said, recourse was next had, to
argument
.
I did not expect, said Van Stetter, to hear such silly
scruples from so bright a Mason as you are, Mr. Peacock.
`I was not under the awarement,' observed Timothy,
`that masonry propelled its approbation towards drinking.'
There is where you are sadly in the dark, replied the
other. Do not the highest and brightest of our sublime
order, set us the example of a free use of the enlivening
bowl? And do not the precepts of the most approved
writers among the craft directly sanction the practice?
You cannot have forgotten those soul-cheering lines in
the Book of Constitutions
The world is all in darkness,
About us they conjecture,
But little think,
A song and drink,
Succeeds the Mason's lecture.
Fill to him,
To the brim,
Then, Landlord, bring a hogshead,
And in a corner place it,
Till it rebound with hallow sound,
Each Mason here will face it.
`It is very true,' observed Timothy, his early impressions
beginning to give way before the direct, and not to be
mistaken, meaning of this quotation, `it is true I have read
the lines, and often heard them songnified in the
lodge-room
;
and would not be understood to nullify, or
extenuate
their veracity; but I had supposed that they applied
only to the circumvented potables of the craft in
lodge-meetings
,
where I take it the liquor is in a sort sanctified
by the ratification of its use in masonic purposes, after the
similified example of the wine in sacramental
churchifications
.'
That cannot be the case, said the merchant, for if
it was as you suppose, drinking would have been made a
part of the ceremonies, instead of being resorted to, as it
always is, only in time of refreshment. No, brother
Peacock
,
you entertain very erroneous notions on the subject.
The meaning of these lines, and numerous other passages
of the same import, to be found in this great guide and
teacher of all true Masons, evidently is, that the craft are
particularly privileged to indulge in the luxury of good
liquors, on all proper occasions, when they should never
prove cravens at the bumper.
`I begin to see through my perceptions more clearly,'
said our hero, `and I am free to confess that your remarks
have transfused so much rationality into the matter, that it
is now transparent to my cogitations. But I take it that
there is nothing in the Book of Constitutions, that inclines
to a recommendment of morning drams, which I have been
taught to believe are injurious to the obstetrical department
of the stomach.'
Now hear that, exclaimed Van Stetter, laughing,
was there ever such a scrupulous animal for a man of
your cloth;such a doctor of doubts and divinity
preaching
and hesitating over a fog-cutter! Why, man, it is the
very thing for the stomach, to correct the crudities and
keep out the fog and chill in such dark mornings as these.
But to put the matter at rest in your mind, I can refer you
to a verse in one of the odes in the Book of Constitutions,
which expressly gives its approbation to the wholesome
practice of moistening our systems with a good glass of a
morning. It runs thus:
When the sun from the east salutes mortal eyes,
And the sky-lark melodious bids us arise,
With our hearts full of joy, we the summons obey,
Straight repair to our work,
and to moisten our clay
.
Timothy could no longer withstand such arguments,
backed as they were by these palpable quotations, taken
directly from the very scriptures of Masonry. And with
that frankness, which is the peculiar characteristic of
noble
minds, when convinced of the truth, he freely gave up
the point in dispute, making many apologies for his unjust
prejudices, and manitesting no little chagrin at this
detection
N*
of his ignorance of masonic principles. But my
readers in general, I trust, will hold him at least excusable,
when it is recollected that as yet he had enjoyed but
limited
opportunities of imbibing the true spirit of masonic
philosophy
to free him from those prejudices which he had
received from the feeble light of uninitiated wisdom, and
to correct those narrow notions which had been implanted
in his mind by the lessons of the nursery. And even my
masonic readers, I cannot but indulge the hope, will
extend
their charity, and kindly overlook this sin of
ignorance
in a brother; and more especially so, when they
learn, how cheerfully he now gave evidence of the
sincerity
of his conviction, in the manful acceptance of the
proffered
glass, and never afterwards, either in theory or
practice
,
had the slightest indication to relapse into that error
from which he had been thus kindly rescued.
Time, with our hero, now rolled pleasantly away. His
days were spent in the most assiduous devotion to his
masonic
studies; and his evenings at the lodge-room, or at
the store of Van Stetter, in company of a few choice
spirits
of the mystic tie, occasionally diversified, however, by
visiting places of public resort, and taking moonlight
rambles
about the city. In one of these rambles, a little
incident
occurred, which, as it may serve to illustrate some of
the less known principles of Divine Masonry, is perhaps
worthy of a place in these instructive adventures. As
Timothy was returning homeward one night, at a rather
late hour, and passing a house, which Van Stetter had
before pointed out to him as the residence of a new star in
the courts of pleasure, he heard a great outcry within;
while at the same time, a lady appeared at the door, crying
aloud for assistance. Rushing immediately into the
apartment
from which the noise proceeded, he beheld two men
in a desperate conflict, which was instantly brought to a
close, however, by one felling the other to the floor with
a heavily loaded cane. At the first glance which Timothy
cast at the conqueror, (who paused a moment over the
apparently
lifeless body of his prostrate foe,) he knew he had
seen the man somewhere beforea second look told him,
to his surprise, it was no other than the pious dignitary,
whose deep and devotional tones of voice, on the evening
of his own exaltation to the Royal Arch degree, had filled
his mind with such solemn reverence. The recognition
was mutual, but attended with evident confusion on the
part of the man in the broil, who making the Royal Arch
sign to Timothy, instantly glided out of the house, leaving
the latter in care of the dead or wounded man, still lying
on the floor without the least sign of reanimation.
Scarcely
had our hero time to recover from his surprise, when the
lady, who had run out for help, returned with two men, all
of whom eagerly inquired for the aggressor. On finding
he had just escaped, they sharply interrogated Timothy
respecting his name, abode, and his knowledge of the
person
who had committed the deed. To all of which he
gave true answers, except the last item in the catechism,
which he well knew his obligation required him to
conceal
.
Being convinced that Timothy was no accomplice
in the transaction, they proceeded to take up the yet
lifeless
man, and put him on to a bed, suffering the former to
depart unmolested. As soon as our hero reached his
lodgings
,
he took his friend Van Stetter aside and informed
him of the whole adventure, expressing his surprise that a
man so gifted and apparently devotional in the prayers and
other religious exercises of the lodge-room, should be
found visiting such establishments.
Van Stetter could scarcely refrain from laughing at the
last observation of Timothy, but kindly attributing it to
inexperience in the indulgences vouchsafed by the liberal
principles of Masonry, he immediately undertook the task
of setting the matter in its proper light. In the very
prayer to which you have alluded, brother Peacock, said
he, you may infer a sanction of the indulgences which
you seem so inclined to censure in our illustrious
companion
.
You will recollect, probably, this passage in the
prayer in question: `We bless thee that when man had
fallen from his innocence and his happiness, thou didst
leave him the powers of reasoning, and capacity of
improvement
,
and of pleasure
.' Here you must see that the
capacity
for pleasure which our exalted brother was improving,
is accounted as a privilege to the craft, for which they
should be thankful to heaven. And again the same prayer
says, `Give us grace diligently to search thy word
in the
book of nature
, wherein the duties of our high vocation are
inculcated with divine authority.' Now if we are to look
to the book of nature for our guide, as is here directly
intimated
,
where is the brother whose nature does not
occasionally
point to these pleasures in which you seem to doubt
the propriety of indulging?
Timothy could not gainsay this argument, drawn as he
knew it was from the most solemn part of the mystic
creed; and he silently acquiesced in the views of his more
experienced brother. I see how it is with you,
continued
Van Stetter, after a short pause, and it was the same
with me before my mind received the full light of Masonry.
You cannot at once break through the mists of early
prejudices
and notions, which are perhaps wisely enough too,
intended to restrain and govern the uninitiated world, who,
in their blinded condition, have nothing better to guide
them. But we, who have been admitted to the true light,
have laws and rules to guide as superior to all others, and
whatever they sanction, we need have no scruples in
practicing
.
But as I see you are now convinced of all this, let
us return to our first subject. There may something grow
out of this affair that will require consideration on another
point. You say the man scarcely gave signs of life when
you left him?
`I certainly considered the poor fellow,' replied Timothy,
`but little better than totally extinguished.'
Did you learn who he was, and what gave rise to the
squabble, asked Van Stetter?
`I heard the lady say,' said the other, `that he lived
with a saddler in the upper part of the city; and, as far as
I could digest a legible conjecture as to the causes of the
belligerent catasterophy, from all I heard devised and
intimated
on the subject, I opinionate that the man had a
premature
engagement with the lady, which she nullified in
favor of the more superfine embellishments of our worthy
companion.'
Nothing more likely, observed Van Stetter, but did
you learn whether they knew who our brother was?
`I suppose not,' replied Timothy, `as the lady said it
was a Mr. Montague.'
Good! exclaimed the other, he had the caution to
go under an assumed name. Perhaps all may go well, but
I fear the wounded man may know our companion, and
expose his name, should the poor creature get so as to
speak. Now what I have been coming at, brother
Peacock
,
is thissuppose this man dies, or is like to die, and
our exalted brother in the difficulty should be discovered
and arrested; and you should be summoned as a witness
against him, what should you swear to?
`Swear to?' replied Timothy, `why I should swear to all
I knew, why not?'
What! said Van Stetter, would you betray a
brother
Royal Arch, when the other party does not even belong
to the craft in any degree?
`Why how could I help it,' said Timothy, surprised at
the earnest and censorious manner of the other, `how
could I help telling all I know about this casual dilemma;
for I shall be under bodily oath to tell the truth, the whole
truth, and nothing but the truth?'
Would you dare to break your solemn obligations?
said the other, with a withering frown. Have you not
sworn, under the dreadful penalty of having your scull
cleaved from your head, that
you will aid and assist a
companion
,
Royal Arch Mason, when engaged in any difficulty;
and espouse his cause, so far as to extricate him from the same,
if in your power, whether he be right or wrong?
And would
not your companion be in difficulty in such a case? and
would it not be in your power to extricate, or clear him,
by swearing that he was not the man that you saw knock
down the other in the broil? And again have you not
sworn in the same fearful oath,
that a companion, Royal
Arch Mason's secrets, given you in charge as such, and you
knowing them to be such, shall remain as secure and inviolable
in your breast, as his own, murder and treason not excepted?
And did not your companion in this case, make you the
sign, and thus give you in charge the secret of his being at
that place, and of the deed he had committed? What say
you to all this? Speak! for we must know who there is
among us that will dare to betray the secrets of the
craft.
Our hero was dumbfounded. The difficulties of the
supposed case, now for the first time, flashed vividly across
his mind. On the one hand was his civil oath, a breach of
which he had been taught to hold as the most heinous of
crimeswhile on the other, stood his masonic obligations
with their terrible penalties, in direct conflict with his civil
duties, staring him full in the face! It was a dilemma
which he had never foreseen; and now as it was a situation
in which probably he would soon be placed, his heart sunk
within him at the distressing thought. Troubled and
confused
,
he knew not what to say or think, and he humbly
threw himself on the mercy of his friend, imploring
forgiveness
if he had done wrong, and asking advice how to act in
case he should be called into court, and wishing to hear
explained how these two conflicting obligations were
reconciled
with each other.
Van Stetter, now instantly softening down to the most
soothing and friendly tones, assured Timothy that there
was no doubt or difficulty at all in the case. That it was
an undoubted duty to protect a brother in trouble,
whatever
might become of his civil oath, which every true
Mason
took, when it was forced upon him in these cases, with
the mental reservation, that he would tell all except what
might be inconsistent with his more sacred masonic
obligation
.
And when he did this, he would commit no crime
in stating what would be necessary to extricate a
companion
from difficulty, while at the same time he could save
himself from the awful guilt of breaking the oaths of his
order. Saying this, and exhorting Timothy to be true and
steadfast, should any thing happen to put his fidelity to the
test, Van Stetter bid his friend good night, and retired to
his own apartment.
The events of the following day showed that the fears
and anticipations of our two friends were not unfounded.
Their luckless companion was arrested and brought before
a city magistrate, on the charge of assault with intent to
kill. And Timothy was summoned to appear forthwith as
a witness against him. Scarcely had the officer finished
reading his summons, before Van Stetter, who had early
been apprised of what was going forward, appeared, and
requesting a moment's indulgence of the former, while he
transacted some important business with his friend, took
Timothy aside, and informed him that the brethren had
already
held a hasty consultation on the business, which
began to wear, he said, rather a serious appearance.
The fellow is scarcely expected to live, he continued,
and they have found a new witness in a man who was
most unluckily going by the door as the accused was
coming
out, when he left you, and what was still worse, this
witness caught a glimpse of his face, and knew him, which
led to his arrest. Now if this man appears, as he doubtless
will, as well as the girl, we fear it will be a tough case. But,
as good luck will have it, the magistrate is a Royal Arch, and
if you prove true, Timothy, we think all will turn out
right. We have concluded that the only safe way will be
for you to swear plumply, as I intimated last night, that
the accused is not the person you saw engaged in the
affray
.
This will save him. And now, brother Peacock, in
one word, can we trust you? All eyes will be upon you,
and it is the very time for you to immortalize yourself with
the brotherhood of this city.
Our hero having mastered all his scruples on this
subject
,
and being most anxious to retrieve his masonic
character
,
which he feared had suffered in the eyes of Van
Stetter, by his late doubts, now felt proud by the
opportunity
of evincing his fidelity to the brotherhood; and
assuring
his friend of his fixed resolution to be true, he
joined
the officer and proceeded to the place of trial. On the
way, several of his masonic acquaintances, falling in with
him, still more encouraged him to persevere in his
determinations
by their looks and by whispering in his ear, as
apportunities presented, their brief exhortations to be
steadfast in the good purpose. On arriving at the court
room, our hero found the trial was already in progress.
The grounds of the prosecution having been stated, the
girl, at whose house the broil happened, was called on for
her testimony. Besides the particulars which led to the
quarrel, she plumply and positively swore to the identity
of the prisoner at the bar, with the person who gave the
deadly blow. This testimony, of itself, so clear and full
as it was, very evidently impressed the minds of the
by-standers
,
with the opinion of the prisoner's guilt; and
being
strongly confirmed by the next witness, who was
equally positive that the person whom he saw coming out
of the house at the time and place mentioned by the other
witness, was no other than the accused, the cause began
now to be considered a clear one, and not an individual
present, except the brotherhood, supposed that there was
the slightest chance for the acquittal of the accused. But
how little did they know of the saving virtues of
Freemasonry
of
the power and strength of its mystic tie. Events
soon told them that they had reckoned without their host.
Our hero was now called on to the stand. Casting his
eyes around on the spectators, he met the riveted and
meaning glances of many a brother, waiting in breathless
solicitude, for that important testimony which was to
furnish
the promised proof of his fidelity. He read at once
in their looks, their expectations and requirements, and he
was happy in feeling that they were not to be
disappointed
that
they were about to behold so conspicuous an
example
of his devotion to the glorious principles of
Freemasonry
.
He then, with an air big with the consciousness
of the responsibility which devolved upon him, proceeded
to give in his testimony, stating that he was present at the
affray when a man was struck down and wounded by a
severe blow from another man, but positively denied that
the accused was the person who committed the deed, or
that he was present at the time or before or after it
happened
.
The girl looked at our hero with undissembled
amazement. And the council for the prosecution would
not believe that the witness testified as he intended, till he
had put the same question over and over again, and as
often received the same positive answers. A murmur of
surprise and suspicion ran through the crowd, and the low
muttered words,
perjury, bribery
&c. from the friends of
the wounded man occasionally became audible. But
Timothy regarded not these out-breakings of malice and
blinded ignorance, for he saw that in the grateful and
approving
looks of his brethren around him, that assured him
of their protection and a safe immunity from the
operation
of any of those narrow rules of local justice, which the
uninitiated might attempt to enforce against him. The
trial was now soon brought to a close. The accused
bringing one other witness to prove him at another part of
the city, within a few minutes of the time when the broil
was stated to have taken place, there rested his defence.
The council for the prosecution, having been so taken by
surprise, by the testimony of Timothy, his own witness, as
to throw him into confusion, and spoil his premeditated
speech, proposed to his brother to submit the facts without
argument, which being acceded to, the court now took
the case. When the magistrate, taking up the only point,
at issue, whether the accused was or was not, the person
who committed the deed, and balancing the testimony of
the last witness, proving the accused in another part of the
city at or near the time, against that of the man passing
by, who was greatly liable to be mistaken in deciding
upon
personal identity by moonlight, and weighing the
assertions
of Timothy, an unimpeached witness against those of
a girl of ill fame, was at no loss in perceiving which way
the scales of justice preponderated; and he therefore
pronounced
a full acquittal of the prisoner.
O
There was no noisy exultation on the part of the
brotherhood
at this triumph of their principles; but though
every
thing was conducted with that prudence and caution
so characteristic of the order; though scarcely a sign of
rejoicing was visible among them; yet Timothy, on leaving
the house, and on his way homeward, soon discovered, in
the silent and cordial grasp of the hand, in the speaking
look, or the low whispered Well done thou faithful, how
important that triumph was considered, and how highly
estimated were those services by which it was
accomplished
.
Our hero was ever after the favorite of his city
brotherhood
.
CHAPTER XV.
For mystic learning wondrous able,
In magic, talismen are cabal;
Whose primitive tradition reaches
As far as Adam's first green breeches.
For
several of the following weeks, our hero devoted
himself almost wholly to masonry. And considering the
great natural aptitude of his genius for this noble study,
and considering the unwearied pains taken for his
instruction
by the brotherhood since his late important services
for the craft, and the lively interest they now manifested
for his advancement, it is, perhaps, scarcely to be
wondered
at, that his progress was unrivalled. He attended all
the frequent meetings of the Chapter, many of which were
holden on his own account, and proceeded with rapid
advances
through the most prominent degrees of knighthood.
We regret that the limits assigned to this work will not
permit
us to follow him further in his brilliant career in the
lodge-room, describing, as we have so far attempted to
do, the peculiar excellencies and leading features of each
of these important and splendid degrees. But this not
being
the case, we can only say, that new beauties and
wonders
,
new fountains of light and wisdom, were continually
unfolding themselves to his enraptured mind, as he
proceeded
,
step by step, through the august mazes of this
stupendous
system.
Thus passed the time of our hero till about the middle
of winter, when the Grand Chapter of the State of New
York assembled at Albany for their annual session. At
this session, which lasted about a week, nearly all the
great, the high and illustrious of the order in the state,
embracing
most of its highest civil officers, were present.
What a golden opportunity for the young aspirant of
masonic
honors! Here was the great Clintonhere the Van
Rensselaers, the Van Derheighdens, and scores of other
proud Vans,
Who boast their descent from Burgher Patroon,
And, like bull-frogs from ditches, now croak to the moon.
Not a little proud was our hero to be admitted into the
company, to set beside, and be placed upon an equal with
these high titled dignitaries of masonry. And, as he
walked
in their gorgeous processions, often arm in arm with the
most distinguished, and glanced at his own fine form, his
elegant dress and the splendid ensignia with which it was
surmounted, betokening his own elevated rank in masonry,
his heart swelled and expanded with exulting delight, and,
in the repletion of his happiness, he sighed, this it is to
be great!
But the splendor of parade that marked this brilliant
assemblage
of the wealth, rank and talent of the land, as
magnificent and imposing as it was, still yielded in
comparison
to the richness of the intellectual repast which was
here afforded. The wise, the learned and the eloquent,
all brought their rich offerings to the mystic shrine. But
among all those who contributed to this glorious feast of
the mind, the celebrated Salem Town, Grand Chaplain,
took, by far, the most conspicuous part on this important
occasion. Besides the performance of the customary
clerical
duties of his station, this profound masonic
philosopher
favored the Chapter with the fruits of his prodigious
researches, in the shape of lectures, or addresses,
delivered
each day during the session, on the origin, history and
principles of Freemasonry. Our hero was an eager and
delighted recipient of his learned instruction,and he thought,
as he daily sat under the pure droppings of this masonic
sanctuary, that he had never heard such wisdom.
In his first lecture, this great and good man gave a
suscinct
and lucid history of the origin of Freemasonry. After
a few general prefatory remarks, and after stating what
were the secrets of masonry, such as the signs, pass-words,
&c. which might not be told, he proceeded to discuss that
which might be told, introducing the main subject of the
lecture with the following bold and beautiful antithesis:
But it is no secret that masonry is of divine origin
.
[5]
[5]
See Town's Speculative Mosonry, Chap. I, Edition I, page 37.
With
this triumphant assertion, he proceeded to consider the
proofs of the proposition, with all that logical accuracy
and conclusiveness which so eminently characterize his
published productions. He said the earth was created
to unfold the great councils of eternity. That man was
created a social being, and it was therefore necessary to
form associations for the purpose of carrying into effect
the views of heaven, which the energies of civil
government
were too feeble to accomplish. And that as
masonry
was the oldest and the most noble of all these
associations
,
it was hence intended to become the repository of
the will of heaven, and hence the medium by which that
will was to be promulgated to the world. Thus leading
the hearer to the irresistible conclusion, not only that
masonry
was of divine origin, but that the earth itself was in
fact created for the use of masonry. It would be just like
many pragmatical professors of whys, ergos and
wherefores
,
to carp here and say that the premises in this
masterly
argument were all assumed. But the out-breakings
of spleen and ignorance! who heeds them? The argument,
in substance, is here, and will speak for itself,I have no
fears that my intelligent readers will not justly appreciate
it. But should any still entertain the least doubts on this
subject, let them follow this great reasoner into the
succeeding
lectures, where the same argument is resumed,
with such accumulations of testimony as to convince the
most skeptical. I allude more particularly to that
masterly
parallel which he drew between Masonry and revelation,
and which subsequently appeared in his great work on
speculative masonry. In this parallel, after enumerating a
long array of coincidences, to prove that Masonry and
revelation
must have been one and the same, co-existent, and
of common origin, and reserving, like a skillful logician,
the strongest and most striking for the last, he puts all
doubts at defiance, and caps the climax with the
following
:And
finally, the Scriptures teach us in general
terms, all the duties of charity, to feed the hungry and
clothe the naked, to visit the widow and fatherless,
masonry
dwells upon these subjects in every degree, and lays
her members under solemn obligations to exercise
christian
charity and benevolence. The word of God teaches
us to love our enemies, and render good for evil.
Masonry
will feed a
brother
, though a personal enemy, even at the
point of a sword, should his necessities
absolutely
require
it!
Having thus conclusively settled the question of the
divine
origin of Masonry, the learned lecturer proceeded to
show the existence and continuance of the institution from
the creation down to the present time; and, taking the
simple, single fact, that Masonry and geometry are
synonymous
terms for the basis of his argument, he was here
again triumphantly successful in establishing this
important
point. For, as the principles of geometry were
involved
in the creation of the world, in the construction of
Noah's ark, and the ark of the Tabernacles, built by Moses,
nothing could be clearer than the conclusion that God,
Noah and Moses, were eminent Freemasons. In a manner
equally learned and ingenious did he trace the footsteps of
Masonry from Moses to Solomon, the well-known Grand
Master, and thence to Alexander the Great, Pythagoras,
Hypocrates, the Roman Generals, and lastly the Druids and
O *
the princes of civilized Europe. After he had thus
completed
his masterly history of ancient Freemasonry, he
then passed on to consider the general tenets and
character
of the institution. And here the soundness of his
moral
and political principies, and the powers of his eloquence
were no less conspicuous than the learned research and
logical acumen which he had displayed in the
historical
part of his subject. One of his addresses at this
stage of his lectures particularly arrested our hero's
attention
.
While treating on the unity and fellowship of
Masons in all parts of the world, however they might
differ
in things unessential or indifferent to the order, such
as Christianity, Paganism, Mahometanism, piracy and the
like, he set forth, with the most glowing eloquence, the
privileges and advantages of masonry. Here is a
privilege
,
said he, no where else to be found: Do you fall
into the merciless hands of the unrelenting Turk? even
there the shackles of slavery are broken from your hands
through the intercession of a brother: Do you meet an
enemy
in battle array? the token of a Mason instantly
converts
him into a guardian angel. Even the bloody flag of
a pirate is changed for the olive branch of peace by the
mysterious token of a Mason. He then related several
interesting anecdotes illustrative of these remarks: One,
where an American was captured and imprisoned in Egypt,
and escaped by the aid of a Turkish Mason: Another,
where an American, imprisoned in Edinburgh, among
other
prisoners, was liberated by the craft in that city, on his
being recognized as a Mason, while all the rest of the
prisoners
,
not being Masons, had to submit to their fate. And
yet another, where a whole crew falling into the hands of
a pirate, were preserved from death by one of their
number
being a Mason and giving the token to the piratical
leader, who, proving a worthy brother, graciously spared
the lives of all his prisoners.
Timothy could scarcely keep his seat for the liveliness
of his emotions while these anecdotes were relating. The
escape of himself and his friend Jenks from arrest, in the
affair of the counterfeit bill, in the Highlands, occurred
instantly
to his mind in confirmation of the lecturer's remarks.
The late recent affair too, of the arrest and escape of his
exalted companion from a disgraceful punishment, rushed
forcibly to his mind. Never before had he perceived the
advantages of Masonry in so strong a light as set forth in
these anecdotes. For he at once saw that the lecturer had
told but half the storyhaving left the most important
inferences
yet to be drawn by the hearercommon sense
told him that if a Mason could thus escape the operation
of the rigid rules of war, or the despotic laws of a Turkish
despot, how easily he might put all other laws at complete
defiance. And in the case of the pirate, it was no less
manifest that the same sacred token, which saved the
innocent
crew, must be reciprocally obeyed by snatching
that piratical leader from the gallows should he
unfortunately
fall into the hands of his enemies, those unfeeling
ministers of the law, and undergo condemnation. Our
hero was lost in admiration of the institution which
vouchsafed
all these precious immunities to its members; and
again and again did he bless the day that enrolled him
among that favored number, and made him a recipient of
those saving virtues and invaluable privileges.
Such are a few, among a thousand others that might be
cited, of the bright specimens of the logic and learning,
and wisdom and eloquence, which the illustrious Grand
Chaplain displayed in the course of these celebrated
lectures
.
Well may the fraternity be proud of the man whose
genius has not only shed such lustre on their institution,
but irradiated its kindly light into the minds of the
purblind
uninitiated, till thousands have been brought to the
fold of Masonry. Such minds do not appear in every age,
but, like comets, at intervals of centuries, come blazing
along, shedding abroad their glorious effulgence, and
dispersing
the gloom around them. Seven cities, it is said,
contended for the honor of the birth-place of Homer. Of
the birth-place of the great lecturer, we are not apprised.
Should not the public be put in possession of information on
this point, without further delay, to prevent such unhappy
contests hereafter, as those which vexed the Grecian cities
in disputing for the distinguished honor of giving birth to
their favorite bard? The literary birth-place of the Grand
Chaplain, however, is fortunately established. That high
distincton falls to the envied lot of his doating Alma
Mater
,
the Otter-Creek Minerva, who would not long sit
demure
and unnoticed in her Green-Mountain bower, had
she a few more such hopeful sons to brighten her into
fame by the light of their reflected honors.
For the remainder of the winter, and most of the spring
following, our hero unremittedly devoted himself to the
great object he had chosen, on which to concentrate the
energies of his mighty genius. And the progress he still
continued to make, plainly evinced, that these golden
opportunities
had fallen to the lot of one who was highly
capable
of improving them. Besides perfecting himself in
the lectures of all the subordinate degrees, he paused not
in his onward career till he had taken all the ineffable
degrees
,
and all the degrees of knighthood which the
Chapters
,
Councils or Encampments, to which he could have
access, were capable of conferring. And so thoroughly
did he study the lessons or lectures of each, that he soon
acquired the reputation, even among the expert and
accomplished
Masons of the cipatal, of being a proficient of
no ordinary promise.
Having now arrived at a proud summit in the path of
masonic advancement, he began to bethink him of leaving
the city, in order to avail himself of his acquirements in
some way, to replenish his purse, which his winter's living
in the capital, together with expenses incidental to the
many degrees he had taken in Masonry, had now reduced
to rather alarming dimensions. While revolving these
things in his mind, he received a most welcome letter from
his old friend, Jenks, giving him an urgent invitation to
revisit
the Green-Mountains, and deliver an oration before
the lodge, which had the honor of making him a Mason,
at the approaching anniversary of the birth day of St. John,
which they had concluded to celebrate. Highly flattered
at the complimentary nature of this invitation, he
immediately
resolved to accept it, being gratified at the thought of
so fine an opportunity of showing his former masonic
associates
,
a specimen of the improvement he had made since
he left them. Accordingly he wrote a long letter to
Jenks, in which, after detailing his personal adventures
since they parted, he announced his willingness to
undertake
the proposed task of preparing an address for their
approaching celebration, and promised to be on the spot in
season to deliver it in person. Having done this, and come
to the conclusion of remaining several weeks longer in the
city, that he might have access to masonic books, while
engaged in preparing his oration, he now diligently
betook
himself to the pleasing task. Night and day, did he
labor in this grateful employment, till he had brought his
performance to a most satisfactory conclusion. After this
he spent several days in committing his oration to memory,
speaking it over in his room, and practicing before a large
mirror, after the manner of Demosthenes, to get the
action
,
which consisted, in his opinion, in gesticulation and
commanding attitudes. Not, however, that he meant to
copy the manner of the great Grecian orator, for he had
another prototype in view, of a far superior kind, as he
believed
,
in the Grand Chaplain, and him he endeavored to
imitate with the most sedulous care, in catching his
graceful
attitudes and melodious modulations of voice. While
engaged in this interesting employment, and in making
preparations for his departure, he accidentally one day
happened at the post-office, where he most unexpectedly
found two letters for him. Hurrying back to his room, he
proceeded to examine them. Percieving the
superscription
of one to be in his father's hand, he tore it open and
read it as follows:
O,
Tim
,I have lately found out a most Jo-fired
discovery
!
You know Tim, about the time you was born, I
joined the Masonsat least I thought I did. Now I have
lately found out that business was but little better than a
damn'd hoe-axe. Bill Botherem, the scamp of tophet,
damn him! Well, yer see, he made me believe he could
take me in, and so he did, and be damn'd to him! but he
had no right to, besides more than half of his jigerations
there, initials, I think they call them, were no Masonry at
all amost. And all the scorching and drenching, and all
that flumydiddle about tin pans and pistols and number
ones and number twosand all that botheration about
going over with it again, cause a fellow could'nt help
swearing a little, to let off the steam, was nothing but
some of Bill's divlish cheatery and whimsification. For I
have found out there is nothing in Masonry against
swearing
in a natural way at all amost. Well, yer see, Bill has
at last got found out in his diviltrees. A little while after
you went away, one of the fellows who helped Bill in that
scurvy business, joined the true lodge, and told on't after
he'd kept the secret in his clam shells more than twenty
years. So neighbor Gibson, who is a Mason, came to me,
and told me all as how I had been Tom fooled, and
advised
me to join the true lodge, and so I did, and have now
got the bony fide Masonryand by the Lord Harry, how
easy 'tis! Bill's Masory could not hold a candle to it!
Well, yer see, we now considered what was to be done with
Bill. But some thought he did'nt fairly break his oaths,
and some said it was so long agone that we'd better let it
drop, and so we did, only concluding to let all the
brethren
and other trusty folks know in a kinder private way,
that Bill was a villain. But Bill, yer see, did'nt know as
how we'd found him out, and so he lately tried another
trick, and really made a young fellow a Mason privately,
and told all the true secrets, they say. But what is the
drollest is, he's got found out in that too. The fellow,
yer see, was courting a gall, and told her alland you
know how things drop through wimen. She told it to a
Mason's wife, and so it got to the lodge. We have taken
the young fellow in, but they all say something must be
done with Bill
this time
, or he will ruin the whole tote of
us. And sure enough. Thunder! must all the world
know all the didos we cut up in the lodge-roomwimen
and all? A pretty kettle of fish that! I am clear for
bringing the perjured scoundrel up to the bull-ring. But
we are in a bother how to come at it in a legal kind of a way,
as yer may sayand so we want you should come home
and insult on the business. So you'd as well ax those
great bug-Masons there in York State, their advice, and
then pull up stakes for Mug-Wump, in no time. Brother
Gibson, says he is agoing to write you too. Your mother
has got the extatics to see you, and so I remain your
honorable
father.
PELETIAH PEACOCK.
The other letter was in Royal Arch cypher, and from
the person mentioned in Mr. Peacock's letter, which,
being translated for the benefit of the uninitiated, reads as
follows:
Dear Brother
,Botherworth has perjured himself.
Vengeance must be hadbut the mannercome and
assist
us.
In caution,
GIBSON.
Timothy could scarcely restrain his indignation
sufficiently
to read these letters through. The insult here
practiced upon his father alone, called loudly for
punishment
,
but this, despisable as it was, seemed as nothing to
the awful guilt of Botherworth, in breaking his obligations
and turning the sacred rights of Masonry into mockery!
Shuddering at the very thought of the deep damnation
that the wretch had brought upon himself, our hero lost
no time in laying the case before some of the most
experienced
and learned of the craft in the city, and finding
them unanimous in their opinion on this subject, he took
their advice as to the best manner of proceedure when he
arrived at the scene of action, and proceeded to make
preparations for an immediate departure for the spot to
which he felt that a high duty now called him, and to
which he was determined to hasten with no other delay
than that which might be required on his way to meet his
engagement with his Vermont brethren, at their
approaching
festival.
Accordingly, the next day after a tender parting from
his city brethrenone of whom, I scarce need say which,
presented him with an elegant gold headed cane on the
occasion,our hero took stage and bid a reluctant
farewell
to the city, where every thing had conspired to
contribute
to his happiness and to advance him in the path of
mystic greatness.
Nothing worthy of relation occurred on the two first
days of his journeyand on the second night, he had the
pleasure of grasping the trusty hand of his old friend
Jenks, at his home in the Green-Mountains.
CHAPTER XVI.
O what a fall was there, my countrymen!
Some luckless star, with baleful power
And mischief fraught, sure rules the hour.
Once
more, gentle reader, must we make a brief pause
among the ever-green mountains of that rugged, yet
fertile
and flourishing state, which, in so many respects, may
be termed the Switzerland of America. That fearless and
sturdy little sister of the Republic, who has ever stood the
unflinching sentinel of the out-post unrelieved, asking no
assistance for herself, and eager to meet the first foe that
would attempt to encroach on the bright domain of her
beautiful, though often unmindful sisterhood. That state,
in fine, whose sons are hardy, industrious, healthy, and
physically vigorous as the green, rock-grasping forests that
clothe their native mountains, patriotic to a proverb, and as
ignorant of the vices, as many of their contemptuous
Atlantic
neighbors are of the virtues, and, at the same time,
more intelligent, perhaps, as a mass of people, than those
of any other spot on the face of the globe.
The anniversary of the birth-day of St. John happened
this memorable year, as it generally does in New-England,
I believe, on the 24th day of June, and not in one of the
autumnal months, as among the observant brotherhood of
the southern states, and some parts of Europe. It was a
lovely day, and of that season of the year when the scenery
of this part of the country, more especially appears in all
its glory. The zephyrs were gently ruffling the deep green
foliage that exuberantly covered the mountain sides, or
waving the vigorous growth of the rich fields of corn and
wheat, in the fertile valley beneath, within which our hero
was this day to make his public debut, as the young
Boanerges
of Masonry.
In an old pasture or common adjoining the road about
one hundred rods from the tavern, the identical tavern
where Timothy first opened his eyes to the glorious light
of Masonry, a platform of new boards had been built up
and elevated six or eight feet from the ground, over which
was erected a booth of green boughs, and in front was
placed
a row of small ever-green trees leaning their tops
against the stage in a slanting position for the double
purpose
of ornament and of screening from the view of the
audience the unseemly chasm beneath. This was the
rostrum
prepared for the orator of the day. At the distance
of some fifteen or twenty feet in front, and parallel with the
stage, were numerous rows of benches, composed by
laying
boards on short logs or blocks, for the accommodation
of the audience. And at the right of these, through an
artificial grove of maple saplings, sharpened and set into
the ground, ran a long table, with seats on each side,
fitted
up in a style in good keeping with what we have
already
described. While baskets of cold baked meats, bread,
various kinds of pastry, fried cakes, cut into curious
fantastical
shapes, but mostly typical of masonic emblems, such
as square, compasses, &c., the ingenious devices of the
landlord's and other masons' wives, called in to assist in the
mighty preparations,honey, preserves, and nicknacks
without number, as well as bottles of beer, cider, and even
Malaga wine, with the usual accompaniment of glasses,
were already on the ground, and placed, at a short
distance
from the table in the custody of Susan, the landlord's
daughter, and her brothers,personages to whom the
P
reader was introduced in a former chapterthe former of
whom from the gayest and most frolicsome had now become
metamorphosed into the demurest of damsels, wearing a
checkered apron and beauless bonnet, modes which she
adopted at a camp-meeting, soon after receiving the visit
of his majesty of the black face and nine-foot tail, as
described
in the chapter to which we have just alluded.
But leaving these, now actively employed in preparing the
dinner table for the brotherhood, and such others as might
choose to join them on this joyful occasion, let us return
to the inn where the company of the day were mostly
already
assembled.
About eleven o'clock in the forenoon, the drum beat at
the door, and the long line of the brethren, issuing from
the lodge-room, formed procession in front of the house,
and, preceded by martial music, moved on to the place
we have described, the master of the lodge and orator first,
the subordinate officers next, then the masonic privates, or
brethren generally, and lastly, the citizens with their own
or mason's wives, sweet-hearts, or partners protempore;
for hundreds of both sexes, and all ages, had flocked in
from the neighboring country, coming on foot, in
gigwaggons
,
on horse back, like beavers, with their better
parts behind them, and even in ox-teams, to witness the
novelties of a masonic festival.
When the procession reached the place prepared for the
exercises of the day, the orator, master and chaplain for
the occasion, ascended the stage, while the audience were
seated on the benches prepared for them in front.
Now was a moment of intense and thrilling interest to
our hero. Never did he feel a more lively sense of the
responsibility
which rested on him. He perceived himself
the focus of all eyes, and he knew that high expectations
were formed of the performance on which he was about to
enter; but he felt proud in the consciousness, that as
bright as these expectations might be, they were still more
brightly to be answered. And as he glanced at his own
fine coat, so favorably contrasted with the rustic
habiliments
of those around him, his flowing ruffles, his
snow-white
vest, and above all, the rich crimson sash and other
glittering badges of his proud exaltation in Masonry, now
displayed over his person in the most tasteful arrangement,
he felt a glow of self complacency at the thought of the
unparalelled sensation that his appearance was about to
make on the hungry expectants of the gaping and
wonder-struck
multitude. And, in fancy, he already heard the low
whispered plaudits of the wise, the suppressless awe and
astonishment of the ignorant, and the tender and
languishing
sighs of the heart smitten fair. But why delay the
anxious reader with the anticipated banquet of intellectual
luxuries when the bright reality is before him. As soon
as the brief clerical exercises were over, our hero
gracefully
rose, advanced to the front of the stage, and, after
saluting the three masonic points of the compass,
designating
the rising, meridian and setting sun, with as many
elegant bows, he looked slowly around on the audience, in
imitation of his reverend Albanian prototype in oratory,
and, drawing himself up with that dignity so peculiarly his
own, addressed the listening crowd as follows
Illustrious Companions, Right Worshipful Masters and
Beloved
Brethren, of our ancient, co-existent, honorable and
refulgent
Institution of Free and accepted Masonry:
With the most profound ebulitions of diffident
responsibility
,
I rise to address you on this stupendous occasion.
Assembled as we are to ruminate on the transcendant and
ineffable principles of that glorious institution whose
existence
is co-ordinate with the origin of antiquity, and whose
promulgated expansion extends from where the rising sun
elucidates the golden portals of the east, to where it sets in
the oriental extremities of the west, let us in the first
place, promenade back through the mysterious ages of
ancestry
and exaggerate a short biography of its radient
progress
from its suppedaneous commencement, down to its
present glorious state of splendid redundance. It is
agreed by all, that Freemasonry existed among the earliest
generations of our posteriors after the general deluge.
Learned men of our order, however, have discovered that
it begun its origin at a much more antiquated period of
the universe even before progenerated man had heard the
audible voice of the grand architect of the world, bidding
him enter and behold the
light
of the exhilerating
heavens
.
And I am conclusively of the opinion that it must
have commenced its created existence somewhere near the
beginning of eternity. From traditional knowledge,
known only to the craft, it has been long dogmatically
settled, that masonry is of divine origin. The
expulsion
of the rambellious angels from Heaven, it may be
lucidly argufied, was for unmasonic conduct. Hence it is
implicitly proved that there was a grand lodge in that
luminous
expansion. The first indefinite evidence of the
existence of masonry on this subterraneous hemisphere is in
the garden of Eden. It is the most conjectural
probability
that after the Great Almighty Supreme, and
Worshipful
Grand Master of the mundane Universe, had expelled
those unworthy masons from the Grand-lodge of the
celestial
canopy, he sent forth his trusty wardens to ramify a
subordinate lodge among the puerile inhabitants of the
earth, that they might pass through a state of reprobation
before they were permitted to transmigrate to the great
and lofty encampment of Heaven. And it was
problematically
these who initiated Adam into the secrets of
masonry
,
and clothed him with the apron, that universal
expressment
of our order, which we read, he wore as he
meandered
the orchards of Paradise. Eve, I comprehend
was not allowed to consolidate in the blessings of
masonry
,
because, as our Book of Constitutions, so clearly
explanitates
,
she turned cowan and attempted in an
unlawful
way to get at the secrets by eating the forbidden fruit
of the tree of masonry which Satan, an expelled mason of
the most serpentine deviltry, told her would make her like
one of the initiated. Hence the orderous name of
Eve's-droppers
,
whom it has ever since been the original
custom
of our order to place tylers at the door, with drawn
swords, to scarify and extrampateand hence also the
reason why her daughters, those lovely but unfortunate
feminine emblements of creation, have never been
allowed
to mingle in the lodge-room. The next
certain
information which has been transplanted to us
concerning
masonry, relates to the terrible apochraphy of the
flood, which furnishes the most devastating testimony of
the continued existence of our art in the personified
character of the thrice illustrious Grand Master Noah.
For a proof of this mysterious circumstantiality, we need
only concentrate to the ulterior fact, that masonry and
geometry
are the same, or which is called by learned
ventriloquists
,
synonymous identities. Now as Noah planned and
constructified the ark, that expansive battlement of the
convoluted waters, and as this could never have been
architecturized
and developed without, with a literary
endowment
of geometry, hence it is an evident and obvious
manifestation
to the most itinerant comprehension, that Noah
was a most superabundant mason. And here, beloved
brethren, who but must pause, in the most obstreperous
admiration, over the great and magnified benefits which our
blessed institution has protruded on the terrestial
inhabitants
of the revolutionary world. There we behold the
astonishing
veracity, that, but for Masonry, no ark could
have been made and digested for the predominant
salvation
of those who were afterwards devised to multiply the
earth, and all mankind in consequential inference, must
have been forever extinguished, and found emaciated
graves in the watery billows of annihilated eternity!
Thus we see how emphatical and tantamount is the
proof that those two illustrious Israelites, Adam and Noah,
were free and accepted masons; and it is equally
doubtless
that there were thousands of others, even in those
unfathomable
ages, who belonged to the same institution;
and, although our records are not particularly translucent
on the subject, I have no doubt but Methusalem,
Perswasalem
and Beelzebub, and all the rest of the old patriarchs,
were worthy and accepted brothers of our divine order.
P*
But to proceed in mythological order, the next
perspicuous
mason that we meet with in our accounts is Moses,
who was, as we all know that have been exalted to the
seventh degree, a Royal Arch Mason. It is a probable
coincidence
,
I think, that this August degree, as it is usually
called, (on account, I suppose, of its having been
discovered
and first conferred in the month of August,) was for
the first time developed to this superlative brother and
companion from the burning bush amidst the tremendous
ambiguity and thunderiferous rockings of Mount Sinai.
For it was here that the omnific word, I am that I am,
which none but the craft will presume to depreciate, was
delivered to Moses for the benefit of the order through all
exterior ages. From this time to the days of the great and
refulgent Solomon, little is irradiated in our historical
inventions
concerning the state of our artificial institution:
But all traditional probabilities unite in concurring that all
the superfluous characters of that undiscovered period were
engaged in extending the art with the most propagating
velocity. Among the most predominant of these, I should
place Joshua and Sampson. We peruse, in scriptural
dispensations
,
that Joshua, the great General of the Jewish
militia, while monopolized in battle with his obnoxious
invaders
,
being hard run, and wanting more time to
disembogue
his hostile enemies, commanded the sun and moon to
stand still, and they obeyed him. Now I have no
questionable
doubt but this pathetic achievement, which has so long
discomfited the uninitiated to expounderate, was
effectualized
by the art of masonry: Joshua, we know, was highly
identified, and, like Companion Royal Arch Moses, held
facial intercourse with the Illustrious Grand Puissant of the
World, and I think it the most probable preponderance
that he made the grand hailing sign of distress to the great
masonic deification enthroned on the circumjacent
canopy
of heaven, who observed the sign and immediately
stopped
those great geological luminaries to answer the
distressing
emergencies of brother Joshua, and deliver him
from his extatic difficulty. Thus we again behold, in
admirable
wonder, the powerful omnipotence of masonic
chicanery which can even control the revolving
astronomies
of heaven! Equally suppositious likewise is the
evidence that Sampson, that almighty wrestler of
antiquity
,
was a bright and complicated mason. For proof of
this congenial fact we need only perambulate that part of
the Bible which treats of his multangular explosions among
the interpolling Philistines. There we find it implicitly
stated that Sampson had thirty companions with him at his
wedding feast. Now is it not highly presumptious that
these must have been Companion Royal Arch Masons?
I think the evidence most conclusive and testimonial:
Sampson therefore was a brother of that glorified degree,
and a mason whose prodigious muscular emotion must
have made him a most pelucid ornament to the institution
through the remotest bounds of posterity. It was not
however
till that primeval period of triumphal magnificence,
the reign of King Solomon, the great Sovereign
Commander
,
and Prince of the Tabernacle, that masonry shone
forth in all its glory and concupisence. It was then that
the tremendous stupefaction of the temple, the wonder of
all cotemporary posterity, uprose to the belligerent
heavens
in all the pride of monumental aggrandizement wholly
by the geometry of masonic instrumentality. From this
time, which is termed the Augustine period, in honor of
the August, or Royal Arch emblazonments of architecture,
that enhanced this emphatic epoch, our divine art soon
expanded, with the most epidemic enlargement, over the
circumambient territories of the congregated world. It
was then that our great patron, St. John, came out of the
wilderness, preaching the beauties of masonry, and
wearing
the sash, or girdle, of a Royal Arch Mason, (thus
preposterously
proving that he was one of the glorious
fellowship
,
and had arrived to that superlative exaltation,) and
established and secreted a day for masonic designment,
which he called the Anniversary, and which has always
since, from time immemorial, been caricatured by the
brotherhood as the glorious anniversary of St. John. The
same great and ostentatious day, beloved brethren, which we
are triumphantly permitted at this time to celebrate; and
a day which all the worthy and accepted will forever
coagulate
in celebrating till the last hour of time shall
evaporate
,
and mankind be abolished in the deluge of
eternity
!
It was there too that Nebuchadnezzar and
Pythagoras
,
Tubal Cain and Homer, Alexander and Zerubbabel,
Hiram and Bachus, Zoraster, Zedekiah and Vulcan,
Aristotle
,
Juno, Plato, and Apollo, Frederick, Pluto and
Voltaire
all,
all bright and luminous masons, shone along
the transcendant galaxy of futurity like the opake meteors
that irrigate the conflagrated arches of heaven!
Having now, my beloved and auspicious brethren,
disseminated
before you a brief historical circumcision of the
origin and progressive intensity of our wonderful
institution
,
let us preponder awhile on its momentous beauties,
its ambiguous advantages, and its inevitable principles.
Of all the ties that bind and inveigle mankind together
in this sublunary vale of the universe the tie of masonry
is the most inveterate and powerful. By this, men of all
sexes and credentialsmen of the most homotonous
opinions
and incarnate malevolence, are bound together like
Sampson's foxes, in municipal consanguinuity and
connubial
entrenchments. It is this that clothes the morally
destitute
,
and protects the indigent incendiary from
prosecuting
enemies: It is this that dries the tears of unfathered
orphans, and dispenses with charity to the weeping widow.
It is masonry which mystifies the arts and sciences, and
opens the only true fountains of inanity to the world. It
pervades the halls of justice in sinuous counteraction, and
snatches the prosecuted from perilous enthralment. It
opens the prison to relieve the faithful delinquents, and
defies the world in arms to stop it. It also illaqueates the
domestic tenement, and populates society. It exhilarates
its members, rubifies their intellectual receptacles, and
exalts
them above the vulgar mass of credulity. And
finally
,
it concentrates, refines and vitiates all who come
within
the pale of its Sanctum Pandemonium, whether they be
found roaming the burning wastes of arctic sands, or
inhabiting
the torrid regions of the frozen North.
Such, brethren, is Speculative Freemasonry! And such
will it continue till it countermarches all the terraqueous
altitudes of the world, when, as my most appropriate and
magniloquent friend, the Thrice Illustrious Salem Town
supposes, a masonic millenium will come, and usher the
whole earth in rapid pervasion. Then will all become one
great exasperated family of freemasons, except, perhaps,
a few of the most disinvited exclusives, such as idiots and
feminine excrescences.
But here let me offer my derogatory consolation to my
fair hearers whom I see listening around me in lovely
admiration
.
Let me have the assurance to tell them, that
although
they may not be allowed to amalgamate in the
regular forcipations of the lodge-room, yet they are never
so safe as when in the circumventive arms of a free and
accepted
mason. And we are bound by our obligations in
the most inoperative manner to refrain from our indulgent
latitudes towards these fair and necessary implements of
creation, and particularly so if we know them to enjoy the
equivocal honor of being the wives or daughters of our
exalted
brotherhood. Then let them always seek the
gloririous
disparagement of monopolizing their connubial
paramours
from among our amorous fraternity. O! let them
come to us for aid and embracing protection; and we will
fly forward with our arms wide extended to meet and
enrapture
them.
At that fated instant,
Heu miscrande puer!
the luckless
orator, in suiting the action to the word by rushing
eagerly
forward with protruded arms towards the fair and
blushing
objects of his address, unfortunately pressed too hard
against the single board, which composed the only railing
in front, for its feeble powers of resistance to withstand.
When the faithless barrier suddenly gave way, and, alas!
alas! amidst a flourish of his long-studied and most elegant
gestures, and with his countenance wreathed with the most
inviting smiles, he was precipitated from his lofty stand
down headlong on to the bushes which stood bracing
against the front of the stage, and, these quickly yielding
near their tops to his rearward weight, and giving him a
new impulse by way of a counter somerset, he finally
landed
in broken tumbles, feet downwards on the ground
beneath
where,
by a most strange and still more luckless
concurrence, he struck directly astride an old ram, the
leader of a flock, which, unobserved, had taken shelter
from the burning rays of the sun, in this cool retreat in
which they were now quietly reposing when their strange
visitant descended among their affrighted ranks. The
horned old patriarch, little dreaming of such a visit from
above, and being less appeasable, or less mindful of the
honor thus unexpectedly paid him, than Alborak, the
ennobled
ass of the Turkish prophet, was not slow in
manifesting
a disposition to depart without waiting
particularly
to consult his rider as to the course to be taken. And,
after one or two desperate and ineffectual lunges to free
himself of his load and retreat back under the stage, he
suddenly floundered around and made a prodigious bolt
through the partial breach, just made in the bushes,
appearing
in the open space in front of the stage before the
astonished multitude with the terrified orator on his back,
riding stern foremost, with one hand thrown wildly aloft,
still firmly grasping the precious manuscript, and the other
despairingly extended for aid, believing in the fright and
confusion of the moment, that it could be no other than
the devil himself who was thus bearing him off in triumph.
After proceeding a few short, rapid bounds in this
manner
,
the no less frightened animal made a sudden turn, and,
tumbling his rider at full length on the ground among the
feet of a bevy of screaming damsels, leaped high over heads,
benches and every thing opposing his progress, leading
the way for his woolly tribe, now issuing in close column
from their covert with the speed of the wind, running over
the prostrate orator, regardless of his snow white
unmentionables
,
vest and flowing ruffles, and trampling down or
upsetting all in their way as they followed at the heels of
their determined leader. Forcing their passage in this
way through the crowd till they came against the end of
the long dinner table, now fully spread for the company,
and covered with all that had been prepared for the
occasion
,
the file leaders came to some insurmountable
obstacle
,
and the whole flock were brought to a stand; when,
as the very demons of mischief would have it, they
suddenly
tacked about, mounted the table, which furnished a
clear road for escape, and the whole train of forty sheep,
enfilading off one after another swift as lightning, raced
over its whole length from one end to the other; and,
unheeding
the scattering fragments of meats, pies,
vegetables
and nutcakes which flew from beneath their trampling
feet in all directions, and the rattling din of knives, forks,
broken crockery and glasses which attended their
desolating
progress, triumphantly escaped, shaking off the very
dust of their tails in seeming mockery at the company
whom they left behind, some fainting or shrieking, some
grappling up clubs and stones in their phrenzy to hurl
after
the retreating fiends, or calling loudly for dogs to assail
them, some cursing and raving at the loss of their dinner,
some hallooing or breaking out into shouts of laughter,
and all in wild uproar and commotion.But we drop the
curtain, leaving epicures to yearn with compassion, young
masonic orators to sympathize, and the brotherhood at
large to weep over the scene!
CHAPTER XVII.
Amoto quaeramus seria ludo.
Horace
.
Our
tale, gentle reader, must now assume a more
serious
aspect. From the more light, and often somewhat
ludicrous incidents through which we have passed to this
stage of our narrativeincidents from which more gifted
pens than ours might have plentifully drawn the shafts of
effective satire, or the food for merry laughterwe now
reluctantly turn to scenes calculated to cause other
reflections
to
awaken other and more painful emotions.
About ten days subsequent to the events recorded in our
last chapter, William Botherworth, whose frolicsome
exhibitions
of masonry improved occupied a conspicuous place
in the first or introductory part of these remarkable
adventures
,
received from a commercial acquaintance of the
neighboring port the following letter:
Wm. Botherworth
,
Sir,As war is now declared, and a fleet of the
enemy's forces said to be hovering round the coast, we are
fearful that they will reach this place, in which case our
property would be exposed to destruction. The quantity
of hops which you left in store with us might be removed
into
the interior without much trouble or expense; and I am
very anxious that you should come to town immediately to
devise measures respecting them. I wish you to come
tomorrow
,
as after that I may be absent several days. Do
not fail of being here by to-morrow evening.
Yours, &c.
S. RODGERS.
Pshaw! said Botherworth to himselfpshaw, man!
your wits must surely be wool-gathering. In the first
place the British will never get there; and if they should,
they will doubtless respect all private property. They
must be wanton fiends indeed to destroy my few hundreds
of hops. However, Rodgers may know more than he tells,
and perhaps, on the whole, I had better ride down
to-morrow
and see for myself.
Such were the passing thoughts of Botherworth as he
run over for a second time this brief epistle, so artfully
calculated to arrest the attention of the person to whom it
was addressed. And, putting up the letter with the
conclusion
that he should obey the summons, as unnecessary
and even singular as it appeared to him, proceeded to
make such little arrangements about his farm as he
considered
his intended absence for a day or two would
require
.
Botherworth, although by nature a person of great
buoyancy
of spirits and cheerfulness of disposition, qualities
which he still in a good measure retained, had yet of late
years manifested much less inclination for convivial
companionship
,
or for mingling with society at large, than
formerly
.
And becoming of consequence more domestic, he
had supplied himself with a good selection of books with
which to furnish that recreation and employment of his
leisure at home which the excess of his social feelings had
formerly led him to seek too much perhaps abroad in the
usual routine of profitless amusements. From these,
together
with the early advantages which he had enjoyed of
seeing the world and becoming acquainted with mankind,
he had by this time acquired a stock of general knowledge
much more extensive than is commonly to be met with
among men in his sphere of life; while at the same time,
aided by a mind naturally acute and discriminating he had
formed original views and settled opinions upon almost all
subjects connected with the different classes and
organizations
of society and its various institutions. The
circumstance
of his expulsion from the masonic lodge for causes
growing out of the prevailing characteristic of his more
youthful years, as before intimated, creating probably some
degree of acrimony and sensitiveness of feeling towards
the fraternity, had led him to bestow much study and
reflection
on the nature and principles of that peculiar
institution
.
The result of all of which was to establish in his
mind the honest, though at that period, the singular,
conviction
that the whole system was founded on principles
radically wrong, and unjust and unequal in their
operations
towards the rest of society; and, to say nothing of its
ceremonies and lofty pretensions which he had always felt
disposed to ridicule, that its oaths and obligations could
not be either legally or morally binding upon those who
had taken them. And it was with these views and
impressions
that he had ventured, a few months previous to
the time of which we are speaking, upon the act of which
the reader has been already apprised, that of imparting to
Q
a young friend, in a confidential way, all the essential
secrets
of Freemasonrylittle dreaming, at the time, as he
had formerly made partial experiments of the kind with
impunity, that consequences so melancholy to himself were
so soon to follow, and even now wholly unconscious that he
had been betrayed to the infuriated, but cautious and
dark-doing
brotherhood.
In the evening following the day which brought him the
letter above quoted, Botherworth came into his house with
looks so uncommonly pensive and dejected as to attract
the notice of the family; for still a bachelor, though now
upwards of forty, he had living with him at this time, in
capacity
of house-keeper, a quaker lady whose husband
followed
the sea, with her two children, both fine boys, to
all of whom Botherworth was much attached. Taking a
seat at an open window, he long sat gazing out, in
thoughtful
silence, on the surrounding landscape, that lay spread
in tranquil beauty before him. The stars were beginning
to twinkle through the gathering curtains of night; and
the full orbed moon, majestically mounting the deep
cerulean
vault of the orient heavens, and brightening each
moment
into more glorious effulgence, as the twilight, streak
after streak, slowly faded in the west, threw her silvery
beams, with increasing splendor, over the broad and
diversified
landscape, now glimmering on the placid stream,
now kindling in refracted brightness and beauty on the
cascade, and now shedding a varied and sombre glory
over hill and dale, town and woodland, as far as the eye
could reach, round the adjacent country, all quiet and
noisless
as the repose of sleeping infancy, except when the
voice of the plaintive whippoorwill, responding to his mate
on the distant hill, at measured intervals, broke sweetly in
upon the silence of the scene.
Miriam, said he at length, partially rousing himself
from his long reverie, and addressing the quakeress who
sat knitting in quiet cheerfulness near him, Miriam, what
a beautiful evening!or rather, he continued after a
pause, beautiful, and happifying it seems to me it should
be, with all these bright and glorious objects before us.
`And why is it not so, friend William,' said the person
addressed.
I know not, replied the other, but every thing
to-night
to me appears to wear a singularly gloomy aspect.
Even this scene, with all its brightness, which ever before
as I remember, looked pleasant and delightful, now
appears
strangely mournful and deathly. And why is it?
Can it be that nature ever sympathises with our feelings,
or rather is it, that the state of our feelings produces this
effect? What are those favorite lines of yours, Miriam,
which I have often heard you singing, containing, I think,
some sentiments on this subject?
`It is not according to my people's creed to sing,'
meekly replied the quakeress, `yet not deeming the
forbearance
essential, I sometimes transgress, perhaps
wrongfully
;
but does thee wish me to sing the lines now?'
Botherworth replying in the affirmative, the lady, who,
though untutored by art, was yet one of those whom
nature
has often gifted with powers of minstrelsy more
exquisite
and effective than any thing which the highest
acquirements
in musical science alone can bestow, now
commencing in a low, soft, melodious voice, sang the
following
stanzas:
When the pulse of joy beats high,
And pleasure weaves her fairy dreams,
O, how delightful to the eye
How gladsome all around us seems!
Fountain, streamlet, garden, grove,
All, all, in semblant brightness drest,
And breathing melody and love,
Reflect the sunshine of the breast.
But when sorrow's clouds arise,
And settle on the mind in gloom,
How quickly every bright hue dies
Of all that joyousness and bloom!
Earth and skies with mingled light,
The vocal grove, the streamlet's flow,
Now seem to sicken on the sight,
Or murmur back the sufferer's wo.
Thus foreverdark or fair,
As our own breasts, life's path we find;
And gloom or brightness gathers there,
As mirror'd from the changeful mind.
Miriam, said Botherworth, again apparently
awakening
from the moody abstraction into which he had
relapsed
when the quakeress had ceased, Miriam, do you
believe
we shall have an existence in another world?
`Surely, friend William,' said she, in evident surprise
at the question, `surely thee cannot doubt the scriptures?'
No, I do not, replied the otheron them my only
hope of a hereafter is grounded, for, but for them I should
be forced into the fearful conviction, that with the body
the soul perished. Human pride I know flatters itself
with the thought of immortality, and in the wish, the
strong hope, believes it, calling this belief, which grows
only out of the desire, as I have often thought, a proof of
the soul's future existence. But is there any thing in
nature
in
reason, that sufficiently indicates it? The soul
and body comparatively begin their existence together
are in maturity at the same time, and at the same time
decay
,
and apparently terminate their existence. When the
oil in the lamp is consumed, the light goes out, and is
seemingly extinguished for ever. But the thoughtthe
bare thought of annihilation, how dark, how dreadful!
`What makes thee talk so,' again soothingly asked the
quakeress, `and appear so gloomy to-night. Thee art
generally jocose, and I sometimes think too vain and light
in thy conversationbut now. Thee art well, friend
Wiliam
?'
Yes, I am well, Miriam, said he, mournfully, but it
seems to me as if this pleasant evening was to be the last
I shall ever behold. But what matters it, should it in
reality
be so? I have no wife or children, no relations
indeed
,
but the most distant, to mourn for me. The world
in which I once delighted to mingle, will move on without
me, unconcious of its loss. The gay will still be merry and
laugh, as I have done; the mercenary will still traffic and
contrive, absorbed in their own interests, and the
ambitious
will still go on, pursuing the objects of their aim, and
thinking only of their own advancement. The little
vacancy
in the ranks of society which my absence may
occasion
,
will quickly be filled by others, probably more
deserving
.
And who will miss me?
`Why!thou dost indeed surprise me!' said the
agitated
listener, laying down her knitting work with increasing
emotion`It pains me, friend William, to hear thee talk
so. Why does thee expect to die now more than any other
time?'
I have no reason for thinking so, relied Botherworth,
in the same desponding tone, none that would generally
be considered as one, I presume; but as I before
intimated
,
there is a dark and fearful cloud upon my soul. For
several hours past, I have felt some unaccountable
influence
acting on my feelings under which they seem to
labor
in troubled agony as if they, and not my reason, were
instinctively sensible that some danger, some hidden evil
was impending over methe whole operating upon me,
in spite of all my endeavors to shake it off, like what the
sailors used to call the death-spell which sometimes seized
the victim doomed soon to perish by battle or storm. But
what it is, or when, or where, the bolt is to fall, I know
not. To-morrow I am going to town to be absent perhaps
several days. If any thing should happen to me, you will
find my will in my desk which you may deliver to the
person
to whom it is directed, and in proper time you will
learn what I have done for you and your children.
So saying, he bid the quakeress a tender good night,
and leaving her with tears standing in her eyes, retired to
rest.
Among all the various branches of the reputed
supernatural
,
as enchantment, witchcraft, second-sight visions,
prophetic dreams, apparitions, signs, warnings &c., which
have successively been in vogue in different countries, and
Q*
in different ages of the world, but which are now mostly
exploded as discovered to have been but the tricks and
inventions of the artful and designing, or accounted for on
natural principles, there is no one that has received less
attention from intelligent and philosophical writers than
that which is generally known by the term of
presentiments
.
And, yet, it appears to me there is no one of them
all, that is so well entitled to consideration, as regards the
many and authenticated facts which can be cited in
support
of its real existence, and at the same time so difficult
of solution when that existence is established. History,
biography and the records of travellers and journalists
furnish
numerous instances of men having experienced deep
forebodings of the fate which soon awaited them, but
which no human foresight could then reasonably have
predicted
.
Men too, whose character for intelligence and
courage, exempted them from the presumption that they
might have been under the influence of imagination or
superstitious
fears. Among these, for example, may be
instanced
the brave Baron De Kalb, who fell at the south in
the American Revolution, and the gallant Pike, a victim of
the last war, both of whom, previous to the battles in which
they respectively perished, felt an unwavering conviction
that their earthly career would be terminated in the
approaching
contest. The conflagration of Richmond
theatre
furnished also one or two most striking examples of
this kind. If these and the like instances are not
attributable
to sheer chance, which, it appears to me we are
hardly warranted in presuming, then it follows that the
doctrine of presentiments is established as having a
foundation
in fact, and is not the less entitled to credit
because
it has a particular and not a general application.
But once admitting the existence of this mysterious
principle
,
where is the human philosophy that can explain its
operation or fathom its causes? If I rightly understand
the history of these cases, and I have heard some of them
from the lips of those who described from actual
experience
,
the operation seems to be instinctive, and chiefly
confined to the feelings or animal sensibilities, and
apparently
originating with them, while the impression on the
mind is vague and undefined, suggesting no distinct ideas,
and seemingly putting it in action only for the purpose
of contriving or providing escape from the boded danger.
Indeed the intellect appears to have but little to do with
these impressionsand often, while the mind rejects them
and seems to convince itself that they arise from assignable
causes, the same dark, boding, irrepulsible feeling, in spite
of all the suggestions of reason, again and again returns
to haunt the agitated bosom. To what then is this
principle
to be assigned? To instinct, like that which is said to
forewarn the feathered tribe of approaching convulsions of
nature? Or is it a direct communication from higher
spiritual
beings made to the animal, not the intellectual part
of our existence? But this last supposition would involve
the proposition that spiritual, can communicate with
animal
existence without the intervention of minda
proposition
never yet admitted among the settled principles of
philosophyit would open the door to a new and
unexplored
field in the doctrine of pneumatology. Whence
then shall we turn for a solution of this inextricable
subject
?
Where are the enterprising Locks and Stewarts of
the age, that they pass the subject unnoticed? If a vulgar
superstition, is it not prevalent enough to require a
refutation
?and
if not, why do they shrink from the
investigation
,
and the attempt of solving the mystery?
The next morning, Botherworth arose lively and
cheerful
.
The cloud had evidently passed from his brow; and
taking his breakfast in his usual serenity of mind, and
sociability
of manner, and without the slightest allusion to the
events of the preceding evening, set forward on foot to
where he expected to intersect a public stage, which
before
night would land him at his place of destination.
CHAPTER XVIII.
Off with his head: so much for Buckingham.
Once
more change we the scene of our eventful drama.
On the same evening during which the events described in
our last chapter transpired, another scene having an
important
bearing on the catastrophe of our tale was acting
in a different quarter. Of this scene, it is our next
purpose
to lift the curtain.
In a spacious hall, situated in one of our flourishing
seaports
,
and consecrated to the uses of the mystic order, now
sat a small circle of the brotherhood in deep consultation
on some matter evidently of high import to the interests of
their revered institution. Though few in numbers, they
were obviously, from their dress, age, and deportment, a
select and chosen band composed of the high and
honored
,
and the wise and trusty of the fraternity. They
appeared
to be intently engaged in examining various books,
manuscripts and papers, which lay spread on the table
before
them, and which, after having been perused by one,
were handed on to another, with a low, passing remark, and
sometimes with a direction by the finger to some
particular
passage, till they were thus passed round the whole
circle. After having been engaged awhile in this manner,
an elderly personage, who appeared to be acting as the
presiding dignitary on the occasion, giving a rap on the
table with his small ivory gavel, now rose and observed,
This charge, Brothers Knightsthis charge, or
accusation
,
which has been presented by our illustrious visiting
companion in behalf of our respected brethren of
Mugwump
,
against this poor infatuated man, being amply
proved
and established by testimony which, by the usages of
the craft, has always been admitted in similar cases, it
remains
only for us now to consider what order shall be taken
in regard to this unpleasant transaction. And involving,
as I scarcely need tell you it does, a crime of the foulest
turpitude, and touching, in the most vital part, the interests
and safety of our exalted institution, it is meet that we
proceed
with due caution, and proper deliberation, in
determining
what punishment should be awarded to the
execrable
wretch who has thus dared to violate his oaths, and
trample under foot one of the most sacred and essential
jewels of masonry. To this end, a full expression of the
individual opinions of all present is highly desirable.
So saying, and shaking back his silvery locks with
impressive
dignity, he resumed his seat; when, after a
moment
of profound silence, a tall and somewhat youthful
looking person arose, and extending forth his hand, while
his elbow gracefully rested on his side, addressed the
listening
conclave as follows:
Illustrious Companions, and
Brothers most puissant and powerful:
I will own that I am imbued with the most deep and
momentous indignation at the constipated atrocity of this
most unheard-of, unthought-of, and diabolical instigation
which we are now congregated to nullify and dissertate.
And while I candidly confess, that I have drank deep of
the hallucinating fountains of masonry, and mounted high
its perpendicular glories, that I have often sat in learned
ostentation with the most illustrious Grand Kings, holy
and illustrious Knights, and Potentates and their exalted
Princes of our celestial order, in the circumambient State
of New-York, where masonry has arrived to such a pitch of
cohesive perfection as to monopolize all the most
ponderous
offices of their government, and embrace by far the
most inflated portion of their society. While I confess
all these great and exulting advantages for masonic
developements
,
I feel a more qualified presumption in obtruding
my delectable opinions on your obsequious attention. And
as regards the proper and punishable infliction which
ought to be fulminated on the head of this indelible
reptile
,
I have but one concentrated opinion. We swear and
solemnize in all the subordinate degrees that we will suffer
our lives to be abolished if we violate our obligations; and
in the higher and more mystified exaltations of masonry,
we are commanded to bring all others who violate their
infringements
to the most speedy and condign punishment
. In
the obligation of Knight Adepts of the Eagle or Sun, which
I, and some of you, I comprehend, have been superlatively
glorified in taking, we find these sentimental commands:
We are bound to cause their death, and take vengeance on the
treason by the destruction of the traitor
, all of which is
beautifully
illustrified in that evangelical degree, by the fate of
the
man peeping
. Now my conclusive opinion forces me
to the most inveterate belief, that as the perjured wretch,
who is now under investigation for betraying the secrets
of masonry, has not had the honorable conscience, like
Jubela, Jubelo, Jubelum
, to deliver himself up to be
excruciated
by the penalties of his obligation, it is our most
nefarious
duty to execute them ourselves, and blot out the
monster
from the face of his existence.
With this burst of eloquent indignation and brilliant
display of masonic erudition, our hero, (who, having
lived
through his Green-Mountain
ramification
as he probably,
in his own flowing language, would have expressed it, had
now arrived at the scene of action, and, as the reader I
presume has already discovered, was no other than the
gifted speaker,) slowly sunk back into his seat, not
fainting
,
like the great Pinckney at the close of his speech, but
calmly adjusting his ruffles over a bosom heaving with the
proud consciousness that his zeal and faithfulness in the
cause of masonry could only be equalled by the eloquence
and ability with which he had enforced its divine precepts.
As soon as the hum of applause which followed this
powerful
appeal had a little subsided, a member; who had not
appeared to join in these manifestations of approbation,
hesitatingly arose, and, with the marks of doubt,
irresolution
and perplexity, deeply depicted on his countenance,
timidly observed,
I am very fearful, respected Brothers, that we shall act
too precipitately in this painful business. I am aware that
most of our obligations conclude with penalties or
imprecations
of death; but these are ancient forms, and
adopted
probably in the dark ages, when laws and customs were
altogether different from those of the present day. And I
am not, I confess, without some misgivings and doubts
whether we are authorized, in these times of civilization
and wholesome laws, to execute these penalties according
to their literal meaning. Indeed I believe that some
intelligent
masons are of the opinion that an expulsion is all
the punishment that we now have any right to inflict for
betraying the secrets or
Here a general sneer of contempt and indignation
interrupted
the speaker, and Who thinks so?who says
so?where are the cowardly traitors that dare avow
it? hastily demanded half a dozen members at once,
starting
on to their feet and bending their angry and almost
withering looks full on the abashed and shrinking speaker.
Order! exclaimed the Master, giving a loud rap on
the tableOrder, Brethren! Our councils vouchsafe a
free expression of opinion, and each member has a right
to utter his sentiments, however erroneous and unmasonic
they may be. And it is the duty of the brethren to curb
and circumscribe their passions within due bounds, and
endeavor
to enlighten the erring by reason rather than with
the language of menace.
Thus rebuked by the Master, the brotherhood,
restraining
their agitated forms and disturbed feelings, again sunk
into silencenot however, without throwing many a dark
and meaning look, and many a glance of suspicion on the
weak and erring brother who now sat mute and trembling
and seemingly sinking to the floor under the weight of his
own conscious unworthiness.
Order having now been restored in the conclave, the
discussion was resumed. Several speeches of a very
determined
tone, and full of fiery declamation, were now
made in opposition to the remarks of the doubting
brother
.
After which, a member of the conclave who had been
a cool and dispassionate, and so far a silent observer of
the scene, now rose and calmly observed,
That for one he never approved of the use of harsh
terms in expressing the performance of those disagreeable
duties which justice sometimes required at their hands.
They often served to alarm the timid and faint hearted;
besides, they were not in accordance with the general
policy
of the craft. Such things should be expressed, he
said, as they should be done, with that caution and
prudence
which constituted some of the most cardinal virtues
of the true mason. But as to the principle laid down by
his illustrious and eminently gifted brother Peacock, aside
from the terms in which it was expressed, he was surprised
that any doubts should be entertained by any intelligent
mason on a point which he considered so well settled by
the precedents and examples to be found in the history of
the institution. So saying he then took up a book, and,
turning to a passage at which he had previously turned
down a leaf, proceeded to read the history of the degree
of Elected Knights of Nine, also of the degree of Elected
Grand Master, or Illustrious Elected of Fifteen; the
former
giving an account of the death of Akirop, who, having
been guilty of some crime of an enormous nature, had fled
from Jerusalem and concealed himself in a cavern, where
he was seized by a band of trusty brethren, allotted to that
honorable service by their Grand Master Solomon, and
slain by Joabert, who in his impatient zeal thus anticipated
that justice on the traitor which of right belonged to the
Grand Master to execute. The latter passage described
a similar transaction.
Now, Right Worshipful Brethren, said the speaker,
closing the book and looking down upon it with a sort of
embarrassing modesty as he stood carelessly balancing it
in his hands,this work, although perhaps it does not
become me to speak of its merits, yet having been
diligently
compiled from the best historical authorities, and
carefully compared with all the traditional accounts on the
subject, and moreover having been fully approved and
recommended
by competent judges, whose names are
hereto
prefixed, as a true and authentic historythis work, I
say, it seems to me, is calculated to throw all the light on
the subject now under consideration which can possibly
be needed to indicate the course of our operations. We
here see that the brethren were so anxious for the honor
of bringing the traitor to justice for this crime, which,
whatever it might have been, is ranked in the oath of the
degree the same as the crime of divulging the secrets, and
subject to the same punishment, that Solomon was
compelled
to restrain their commendable zeal, and decide by
lot who should be the favored few to perform this
important
and glorious service. And we further see that when
Joabert, in his just indignation against the traitor, had too
impatiently slain him, Solomon was even offended with
this zealous brother, not on account of the act, but
because
he had deprived him of the enviable chance of
meting
out justice to the villain with his own hands; but by
proper intercession, however, he not only became appeased
and forgave Joabert, but invested him with the highest
honors in reward for this heroic service to the institution!
Now will any mason dare attempt to impeach this high
example, or question the rectitude of the conduct of that
eminent Grand Master of antiquity? And are
we
, who are
but the dust of the balance in the comparison, are
we
sitting
here coldly hesitating, and doubting the right and
justice of the act which the illustrious King Solomon, who
has so long and so proudly been hailed by our admiring
order as the great and shining light of the East to guide
their humble footsteps in the paths of masonic wisdom
the right and justice of the act, I say, which the illustrious
Solomon thus esteemed and thus rewarded? Is this such
a specimen of light and improvement as you should be
willing the shade of that mighty man, looking down from
his lofty seat in heaven, should behold in his followers?
I beg leave to close my remarks with a quotation from the
same work:
King Solomon, our patron,
Transmitted this command
The faithful and praiseworthy
True light
MUST understand.
And my descendants also,
Who're seated in the
East
,
Have not fulfilled their duty,
Till light has reached the
West
.
R
Closing his observations with this beautiful little
specimen
of the inspiration of the mystic muse, here so
appositely
introduced, the learned speaker sat down amidst the
warm, deep, rapturous, and long-continued applauses of
the approving brotherhood, who thus, with almost united
acclaim, pronounced the sense of the conclave on the
subject
matter in debate.
Nothing further being offered in opposition to the
affirmative
of this important question, and there having been
such decided indications that the arguments and cited
authorities
of the last speaker had, in the minds of the
conclave
,
unanswerably and irrevocably settled the fate of the
victim, this part of the discussion was now dropped, and
the mode of disposing of the unfortunate man was next
brought under consideration. Here there appeared to be
some diversity of opinion: Some proposed that lots should
be cast, after the example of King Solomon, for
designating
the performers of this important duty: Some that the
villain should be put out of the way by the first of their
number who should meet him alone in some by-place to
which he might be easily allured: Some thought that he
should be dealt with by the full council in the lodge-room
where the penalties should be executed in a true and
strictly
masonic manner, else it would be but little better than
actual murder; and others that it should be done by
volunteers
who should be left to choose their own time, place
and manner of performing the meritorious deed. None of
these however seemed fully to answer the minds of all
present. It was in this emergency that the genius of our
hero, which often seemed to be masonically intuitive, shone
conspicuous. He proposed that as many balls as there
were members present should be put into an urn, three of
which should be stained with blood, or some red substance,
as indicative of the duty of those who should draw them:
and that the urn should then be passed round, when each
member should draw out one of these balls, and, without
examining it, put it in his pocket till he had left the lodge
room, when those who, by inspecting their respective balls
when alone, discovered themselves to be the fortunate
men, should meet each other at midnight in the most
central
church-yard, hold a private meeting, and concert
measures for the execution of their duty, which was
however
to be performed according to masonic technics,
though in some secret place, and without the knowledge
of any other of the members.
This ingenious and truly masonic plan of our hero was
received by the conclave generally with the most flattering
approbation. Some praised it because it embraced in
substance
the plan they had suggested: Some because it was
better calculated than any other way to prevent giving rise
to any of those little jealousies and feelings of envy which
might be created towards those who had the superior good
fortune to be designated for the honor; and yet others of
the prudent and cautious cast approved of the measure on
account of the safety it insured to all concerned, in case of
discovery and a meddlesome interference of the civil
authorities
,
who would thereby be deprived of witnesses
except
in the immediate actors, or principals, who could not
be compelled to criminate themselves. In short, all saw
the advantages of the proposed plan, and it was
immediately
adopted.
The several members of the conclave now commenced,
with great alacrity, making preparations for carrying the
plan of operations into instant effect. An urn, containing
a number of the marbles used in the common ballotings of
the lodge-room, corresponding to the number of members
present, was brought forth and set upon the tablewhen
Timothy, heroically pricking a vein in his own wrist, took
three of the balls and bathed them all over with the blood
thus produced, till they were deeply and indelibly stained
with the significant and ominous color. After which they
were returned and shaken up with the balls remaining in
the urn. The brethren were then formally arranged at
equal distances from each other round the long, eliptical
table, about which the conclave had been irregularly
gathered
during their discussion, and the solitary lamp, which
had set in the midst, was removed to a distant corner of the
room. The fate-holding urn was then taken by a Warden
and passed slowly and silently along the gloomy circle, and,
while the distant and feeble light dimly threw its sidelong
and flickering rays athwart the livid and ghastly-looking
visages of the darkly grouped brotherhood, displaying the
varying indications of the deep and contrasted emotions
with which they were respectively agitatedfrom the
demoniac
smile of anticipated vengeance, to the cold and
settled gravity of predetermined justicefrom the stern
and fiery glance of the headlong and danger-daring, to the
hesitating start or convulsive shudder of the misgiving and
doubtfulall, in turn, were subjected to the test, and
successively
put forth their tremulous hands and drew out
their uncertain allotments.
This fearful ceremony being now concluded, the Master
then stated to the conclave that this meeting not having
been a regularly opened and conducted lodge, but acting
as a select investigating tribunal, and the criminal not
having been present, it had been deemed advisable to hold
on the following evening a Grand Council of Knights,
before
which the guilty wretch, (measures having been taken
to have him in town,) would be arraigned to answer to the
dreadful charge which had been preferred and proved
against him,this mode of procedure being considered
most conformable to ancient usages when one of the craft
had been found guilty of treasonable or other heinous
offences
against the institution. And here, if he did not,
like some of the ancient traitors, imprecate his own doom,
the fearful sentence which had this evening been matured,
would be pronounced against the perjured offender, and
he would be left to those on whom the high duty might
devolve of meting out the measure of justice adequate to
the enormity of the crime. The conclave then broke up,
and the brethren, after lingering awhile to make
arrangements
and devise measures for the operations of the next
day and evening, stealthily retired to their respective
abodes.
No sooner had our hero reached his lodgings and found
himself alone, than he eagerly pulled forth the uncertain
ballwhen, to the unspeakable delight of his aspiring
soul, he saw himself one of the honored and fortunate
three who were commissioned for the important dutya
duty which the lapse of ages might not again afford the
enviable chance of performing.
With such heroic and exalted feeling glowing in his
devoted
bosom, he sat off at the appointed hour for the
designated
rendezvous of the chosen trio, the result of whose
deliberations will be seen in our following and final
chapter
.
CHAPTER XIX.
There is no doubt but Morgan richly deserved his fate.
Massachusetts Newspaper
.
Many
were the strange facesstrange to the citizens
generally, though not to the brotherhoodwhich were
seen in the different parts of the town on the day
following
the conclave described in the preceding chapter: For
many distinguished for the eminence they had attained on
the mystic ladder, coming on various pretences from the
neighboring towns and cities, had here now assembled to
assist their brethren in their deliberations, and in
concerting
and carrying into effect all those provisional measures
for secrecy and safety which might be required for
ensuring
the present and ultimate success of their fearful
undertaking
.
It was nearly sunset when Botherworth arrived in the
place. After putting up, and taking some refreshment, at
a public house, he immediately repaired to the quarters of
Rodgers, the commercial correspondent of whom we have
already made mention. That gentleman, however, though
apprised of Botherworth's arrival within a few moments
from the time it happened, as were most of the
combination
R*
of which the former, as the reader may have already
suspected, was an active member, not wishing to meet the
latter till about dark, both because it would not comport
with that part of the plan of operations which had been
assigned to his management, and because he was
unwilling
to risk his countenance with so much concealed
beneath
it, in a confronted meeting by full day light, had now
just stepped out, having left word that he should return in
a short time to attend upon such as might call in his
absence
,
or wait on them at their lodgings. On learning
this from the person in attendance, Botherworth slowly
sauntered back to his hotel, and amused himself with a
newspaper till it became too dark to allow of his reading any
longer by day-light. He then arose and left the house
with the view of going a second time in search of Rodgers.
He had proceeded but a few rods, however, when he was
met by the person in question. At the first sight of this
man, Botherworth made, he knew not why, an involuntary
start, recoiling from his approaching person as from the
contact of a viper, and felt for the instant all those dark
and fearful sensations of vague apprehension, which the
last evening at home he had so unaccountably
experienced
,
again rushing over him; but making a strong effort
to repel these unwelcome intruders, he soon succeeded in
so far mastering these feelings, as to salute Rodgers with
considerable show of cordiality. His greeting was
returned
by the other with equal attempts at cordiality, but with
an air and manner no less embarrassed and hesitating,
though arising from causes far different, as the conscience
of the latter but too plainly informed him.
The mutual civilities and common-place questions usual
on such occasions being over, Rodgers carelessly observed
that his partner had just returned, as he had learned a few
minutes before, from an excursion to the neighboring port,
and had probably brought news with him which would be
interesting to them both, and perhaps necessary to know
before coming to any determination on the business which
had caused their present meeting: he would therefore
propose
a walk, if agreeable, to his partner's residence, which
was situated, he said, in an opposite part of the town.
Botherworth, readily assenting to this plausible proposal,
and not being acquainted with the situation of the house
in question, immediately gave himself up to the guidance
of the other, and they proceeded leisurely along,
frequently
pausing, at the suggestion of Rodgers, to inspect the new
buildings which they passed in their route, late
improvements
in the streets, and such other objects as the latter
could find for enlisting the attention of his companion, and
consequently for delaying their progress. Upon all these
Rodgers now seemed uncommonly communicative, and, as
Botherworth thought, strangely disposed to linger. In this
dilatory manner they proceeded on, the latter expecting
every moment when they should arrive at the place of
destination
,
till they had reached the very outskirts of the town,
and it had become quite too dark for further observation
on the objects around them. Botherworth mentioning
both of these circumstances to his companion, asked him
if they had passed the residence of his partner. On which
Rodgers replied that the evening was so pleasant that he
had gone somewhat out of their direct route for the
purpose
of observing and pointing out the novelties which
were always springing up in a town of that size, and they
had now got considerably beyond the place; but they
would immediately return by the shortest course. So
saying
,
and taking the arm of his still unsuspecting
companion
,
Rodgers turned about, and, with a quickened pace,
struck into another street leading back into the most
populous
part of the town. In this way they passed rapidly
on, frequently making short turns, and crossing into other
streets, till Botherworth (it now having become very dark,
and he not being familiarly acquainted with this part of
the town) became wholly at a loss as to the street they
were traversing: when all at once, Rodgers, who had all
along been extremely sociable, and was now in the midst
of a ludicrous story, suddenly turned into the yard of a
tall building, and, with a sort of hurried motion, pulling
the other along with him, and interrupting himself only to
say, in a quick, parenthelical tone, Here-herethis is
the place, made directly up to the open door, and
unceremoniously
entered.
Here finding themselves in what appeared to be a broad
space-way, or passage leading to other parts of the
building
,
they continued to advance forward, groping their way
through the almost utter darkness before them, till they had
proceeded some fifteen or twenty feet from the entrance,
when Botherworth, wondering that no light was to be seen
in any direction, and thinking that things wore a rather
strange appearance for a private dwelling, began to pause
and hesitate about proceeding any farther. Just at this
moment a slight bustle from behind attracted his attention,
and partly turning his head he distinctly heard the sound
of slowly turning hinges: and whirling suddenly round, he
imperfectly distinguished some persons cautiously pushing
to, and closing the door, behind which, in a dark corner
of the space, they appeared to have been standing in
concealment
.
Scarcely had he time to rally his thoughts,
before
Rodgers, now relinquishing his arm and stepping out
of his reach, gave a sharp rap on the wall with his cane.
Botherworth's suspicions being now thoroughly aroused,
he sternly demanded of Rodgers what building this was,
and what was the meaning of all these singular movements.
But before he received any reply, and while repeating the
question in a louder and more startled tone of voice, a man
suddenly appeared with a light at the head of a broad flight
of stairs leading up from the space-way to a large hall on
the second floor, and began to descend, holding the lamp
in one hand and a glittering poniard in the other, while
his person was invested with all the showy insignia of one
of the higher orders of masonry. Botherworth gazed on
the scene now unfolded to his eyes, in mute amazement.
At the entrance through which he had passed into the
building, stood two men, one just in the act of
withdrawing
the key from the door which he had locked on the
inside
,
and both armed with the same weapons and clothed
with the same badges as worn by the brother who
appeared
in the opposite direction. Rodgers was standing at the
further end of the space-way, pretending to be looking for
some door or place for escape, and affecting great flurry
and surprise, as if they had got into a wrong building by
mistake: while the man coming down stairs, having
paused
about midway, now stood fumbling and trying to unfold
a paper which he held in his hands. A moment of
profound
silence ensued, in which all parties stood gazing at
each other in deep surprise or awkward embarrassment.
Botherworth, however, who now saw the whole truth at a
glance, was not long in giving utterance to the rising
tempest
of his emotions. Treacherous wretch! he
exclaimed
,
with bitter energy, turning his eyes, fiercely sparkling
with indignation, and throwing out his clenched fist towards
the mute and shrinking form of Rodgers, treacherous
wretch! is this the game you have been playing all the
while to decoy me into this pit-fall! Speak, villain! he
continued, uplifting his arm and advancing toward the
dumb-founded and trembling betrayer, speak, perfidious,
doubly damned villian, or I will
`Stop, stop, sir,' cried one of the men at the door,
rushing
quickly between them, `this course will not avail you
here.'
Here!where? exclaimed Botherworth, turning
roughly on the intruder, and who
are you
, to assume the
right of interfering in our private quarrels?
`
Where you are
, and who
we are
, these badges will well
inform you,' retorted the other, pointing to their aprons,
`and as for this man, whom you are so harshly assailing,
he has done but his duty, as the business we have with you,
sir, will shortly show you. Brother,' he continued,
motioning
to the man on the stairs, `why delay to execute your
mission?'
Is your name William Botherworth? now asked the
latter, in some trepidation, descending the remaining steps,
yet keeping at a respectful distance from the person
addressed
.
`And supposing it is, what then, sir?' said Botherworth
scornfully, in reply.
Then, in that case, and you seem to admit the fact,
replied this doughty minister of the mystic mission, holding
out the paper which quivered in his hand like the leaf of
an aspen, then, sir, I have here a summons for you, in
behalf
of our Venerable Council, above assembled, and by
order of our Most Potent Grand Master, to appear before
them, and answer unto certain matters and charges then
and there to be preferred against you, of which you may
not fail to comply.
Botherworth, after sending an anxious glance round the
apartment and scrutinizing anew the looks and persons of
those around him, as if searching for some avenue of
escape
,
or weighing the chances of overpowering his captors
in a sudden onset, and seemingly rejecting such
expedients
as hopeless, at length, in a tone of mingled
submission
and defiance, observed, `Well, be it soI see I am
ensnared, and in your power, and what I am compelled to
do, I may as well do unconstrainedI will go in, but if the
liberty of speech is not also denied me, they shall hear
some truths
, though all the mock King Solomons in the
country should be present.'
So saying, he motioned to his keepers his readiness to
attend them to the hall; when two of them immediately
closed in on each side of him, after the manner of the
guards of a prisoner, and, while the less stout-hearted
brother, who had acted as grand summonser on the
occasion
,
nimbly mounted before them to herald their coming
to the council, they all ascended the stairs, leaving
Rodgers
(who was, it seemed to be understood, having now
fulfilled
his part in the drama, to be excused from any farther
attendance) alone to his own enviable reflections on the
noble and generous part he had acted towards his
confiding
acquaintance. On reaching the hall door, one of the
brothers gave the appropriate rap, which was immediately
answered by another within, when, after waiting a few
moments
,
the door opened, and they were ushered into the
same spacious lodge-room mentioned in the foregoing
chapter.
Here a scene, in which the splendid, the grotesque and
the terrible, were strangely blended, now burst with
over-powering
brightness on the dazzled and unexpecting
senses
of Botherworth. The lodge had been opened with the
imposing and fearful degree of
Elected Knights of Nine
, as
being, in the opinion of the brotherhood, more
appropriate
than any other to the important occasion which had
called them together. The hall, intended to represent
the audience chamber of King Solomon, who is said, by
the standard historians of the craft, to have instituted, in
his wisdom and mercy, this tragical order of knighthood,
was decorated with hangings of white and scarlet, pictured
in flames, as typical, probably, of the leading characteristics
of the degree, like the fiery and torture-painted robes worn
by the victims of the Inquisition on their way to the stake.
Nine bright lights in the east and eight in the west sent
forth their steady streams of reflecting light, and filled the
room with the most dazzling effulgence. The Most
Potent
Grand Master, personating Solomon, was seated in the
east under a purple canopy, embroidered with skeletons,
death's heads and cross-bones, with a table before him
covered with black, dressed out in all his royal robes, with
a crown on his head and a glittering sceptre in his hand.
While the brethren, arranged in formidable array on
either
side of the throne, and clad in the deepest black with
broad ribbons of the same color pending from their
shoulders
,
and terminating in tasselled dagger sheaths, with
aprons of white, but sprinkled with blood and painted with
the figures of bloody heads and arms, holding bloody
daggers
,
and with broad brimmed hats on their heads,
slouched
over their eyes, now stood with drawn poniards in their
uplifted hands, fiercely scowling at the new comer at the
door, and looking like a gang of bandits just interrupted in
some bloody achievement with the gory evidences of their
unholy deeds freshly reeking upon them. The whole
presenting
a scene to the unapprised spectator, as wild and
incongruous, as it was terrific and revolting. A spectacle
more calculated perhaps to inspire awe, to dazzle and
appal
,
than any one to be met with, in the whole round of
masonic machinery, and a spectacle indeed, before which
even the naturally fearless Botherworth could not keep his
stout heart from quailing.
After a few moments of profound silence, maintained
apparently
in order that the imposing scene before him
might have its full effect on the mind of the prisoner, the
brethren, at some slight signal from the throne, all sunk
back into their seats, crossing their legs at the knee and
resting their heads on their right hands;when the
Master
knocked eight and one with the handle of his poniard
which was instantly repeated by the Grand Warden in
the west, and then by all the brethren together. The
noise of this instructive ceremony having died away, and
all again become hushed in silence, the Grand Master,
laying
aside the poniard and elevating his sceptre, looked
round the Council and said: Elected Knights and
Princes
of Jerusalem present, let the accused now be presented
before our tribunal of justice and mercy. The two
brother
Knights, who conducted Botherworth into the room,
and who still retained their places at his side, now led the
latter forward near the middle of the floor and directly in
front of the throne; when the Most Potent, in the deep
and passionless tones of a judge, addressed him as follows:
William Botherworthyou stand charged of wantonly
and wickedly violating the sacred obligations which you
have voluntarily taken never to reveal, except to a
brother
,
the secrets and mysteries of our divine institution, by
communicating the same to one of the profane and
uninitiated
.
You are also accused of having, in an early period
in your life, set at nought the sacred injunctions of our
institution
by a pretended initiation of one seeking the true
light, wherein our awful solemnities were impiously
turned
into ridicule and mockery, and our order greatly
scandalized
.
To these dreadful allegations which have been fully
substantiated to us and of which we have proofs at hand,
what do you plead in defence, and what reasons offer, why
the ancient usages of our honorable fraternity should not
be conformed to, touching the punishment of so heinous
and high-handed offences?
With a slight quivering of the lip and tremulousness of
the voice, but with a firm and undaunted countenance,
Botherworth, looking slowly round on the portentous faces
of the brotherhood, and settling his keen and indignant eye
on the Master, replied:
`Most Worshipful Master, and you gentlemen, abettors,
or Knights, or whatever title you, or either of you may
please to assume, to sit in judgement upon me, addmitting
all the facts set forth in your charges, the truth of which
you assume to have been already established against me,
though I have never been confronted with my accusers, or
allowed even the shadow of hearing or trialadmitting I
have confidentially communicated to an individual the
secrets
or ceremonies of an institution from which I have
been long ago expelledadmitting all this, I hold myself
justified and blameless in the act. I account myself
absolved
from the obligations which you say I have violated
obligations
which I never voluntarily or understandingly took,
but which were forced upon me, trembling under the often
applied torture of sharp pointed instruments, and confused
and bewildered by the new and startling objects around
meobligations which, even in any circumstances, those
imposing them had no just right or authority to administer,
which in themselves, are immoral and illegal, enjoining
as they do, in many parts of them, acts contrary to the
laws of the land and prohibited by the precepts of
revelation
,
and which, therefore ought not, and cannot be
binding
on the conscience or conduct of those who
unfortunately
become subjected to their unjust and soul-damning
enthralment. And having violated no law of my country
contravened no rule of morality or any way infringed
upon the rights of individuals, I deny, fearlessly deny, the
right of your institution, to which I owe no allegiance,
to arraign, and bring me to judgement, and I will hold
myself
amenable to none of your tribunals.'
S
Perjured wretch! exclaimed the Master, kindling in
resentment for the insulted dignity of his sacred office,
and shocked at the audacious heresies of the accused,
perjured wretch! dare you in the same breath confess
your sacred oaths violated, and exult in your unatoned
guilt? We are not wanting in authority to judge, or
power
to execute. Tamper not with the sword of justice, for
it is not slow in vengeance. Villain! fear and tremble!
`I fear you not,' resumed Botherworth, in the same
undismayed
and reckless tone, `I neither fear your authority,
or tremble at your threatenings. I will say nothing of the
singular and volume-speaking fact that I now stand a
guarded
prisoner before you, in a free country, and in the heart
of a christianized and intelligent community, arrested by
no legal authority, and retained in duress by those who
have no right to control my actions. I will say nothing of
the base and detestable plan of deceit and treachery, by
which I was entrapped and brought into this place by one
of your number, acting doubtless under commission from
this illustrious Council. I will say nothing of these, for
they flow directly from that system of darkness and
iniquity
which are the Jachin and Boaz, the very pillars and
keystone
of your boasted institutionthey are but the
legitimate
fruits of those fearful oaths which require of the poor
blinded and haltered candidate, at the very threshold of
your pagan temple, to give his sanction to murder and
suicide
;
and which go on enjoining, as he advances step by
step along its bewildering labyrinths of moral pollution,
the same connivance or commission of acts of a deeper and
deeper turpitude, till at length he finds himself, as the
occasions
arise, doubly, trebly, and irretrievably sworn to
the participation or execution of half the foul deeds to be
found in the whole dark catalogue of crime! I will not
trouble you with a further recital of my private opinions
of the character of your institution, nor of those settled
and honest convictions which long ago forced me to the
choice of burning my Bible and rejecting its law of
universal
love, charity and forgiveness, or of discarding
forever
my masonry with its whole system of selfish favoritism,
iniquity and vengeance,and which, I need not tell you,
resulted in the determination to retain the former and
renounce
the latter. I will not detain you, as well I might,
with arguments and allegations like these. But, in answer
to your question when you ask what reasons I have to offer
why the ancient usages of your order should not be
conformed
to respecting my punishment, I again repeat, that
no law either human or divine has given you jurisdiction
over me. I again boldly deny your right to judge or
control
me. I fearlessly impeach your pretended authority,
and, aware as I am of the fearful doom which a
conformity
to those usages would involveof the dark and
murderous
designs which your menaces imply, I bid you beware
how you attempt to execute your hellish purposes. I bid
you beware how you lay a finger upon me for evil. The
loud cry of murder will reach beyond the walls of your
infernal
conclave, and summon up a host to my aid. But
should you succeed in the foul designs which you are
plotting
against me, I bid you remember the prophetic
warning
which I now give you
my blood will not long be
unavenged
;
but crying up from the ground, will be answered
in the judgement of heaven, which will soon smite your
proud fabric to the dust, and lay open to a hooting and
exasperated world your ridiculous mummeries, your
unhallowed
and impious mysteries, and your bloody register
of crimes!'
As Botherworth closed this audacious speech,
arraigning
with such daring mockery the exalted purity and
justice
of the divine institution of masonry, and bidding
defiance
to its heaven-delegated authority with such
high-handed
insults, there was a deep and general commotion
in the Council. Dark and sullen looks of hatred and
detestation
,
and quick and fiery glances of indignation were
every where bent on the blaspheming speaker, and,
accompanied
by the heaving breast, the short, suppressed
breathings
,
and the low, broken mutterings of out-breaking
wrath, now but too plainly indicated the determined
and unanimous purposes of the outraged and agitated
brotherhood.
The Most Potent now hastily rising from his seat, with
every muscle quivering with rage, and with a voice half
choked with emotion, rapped furiously on the table,
exclaiming
,
Anathema maranatha! Anathema maranatha!
Swift as echo came the startling raps of the
brotherhood
in response.
Nekum! cried the Master.
Vengeance! responded the Council.
So mote it be! said the Master.
Amen, amen, amen, amen! exclaimed the
brotherhood
in eager reply.
The formalities of order were now no longer attempted
to be maintained in the Council; and the members,
hastily
leaving their places, began to scatter promiscuously over
the floor of the lodge-roomsome gliding stealthily out of
the door, some gathering into small groups about the room
and whispering together with quick and earnest, but
restrained
gesturessome passing in and out the
preparation-room
and disrobing themselves of their masonic
habiliments
or badges, and others with hurried, nervous steps,
and excited countenances, moving to and fro in seeming
preparation for some approaching event; while the low,
half suppressed murmur of eager voices which ran through
the hall, and the expectant looks and attitudes every
where visible, seemed to indicate that the crisis was now
at hand.
Botherworth was by no means unmindful of these
ominous
appearances; and, not being very strictly guarded at
this moment, he began to edge along by degrees towards
the door, which, though still effectually tyled, afforded
nevertheless the only avenue for his escape from the hall.
His progress, however, was quickly arrested by the
watchful
brotherhood, who no sooner observed the movement
than they immediately gathered round the spot where he
stood, some falling in between him and the door to
obstruct
his way, and others, with affected indifference and
carelessness, jostling about his person. But Botherworth,
not relishing such familiar proximity just at this time,
sternly bade them stand off at their peril. This repulse
had a momentary effect in making them give way; yet
they soon again closed up around him, and, though
awkwardly
mute, still continued the same manuvres of
frequently
changing places, turning round and rubbing
against his body. Becoming more and more suspicious
of this singular conduct, he again attempted to disengage
himself and make his way out of the crowd, when all at
once one of the brethren, who, like the tiger, had been
watching for a favorable opportunity to seize his prey,
suddenly
sprang upon him from behind, and grasped him with
both arms fast round the middle. A brief but desperate
struggle now ensued. With a prodigious effort,
Botherworth
wrenched himself from the grasp of his antagonist,
and hurled him headlong to the floor: But before he could
avail himself of his advantage, both of his own legs were
grappled by another of his foes, and he himself was
prostrated
in turn. A dozen now sprang upon his body at
once, and with maniac grasp confined him to the floor,
while one darting to his head, passed a large
pocket-handkerchief
over his face, and, holding both ends, drew it
forcibly
through his mouth just as the stifled cry of murder
was escaping his lips. Holding him in this situation till he
had nearly exhausted his strength in his ineffectual
struggles
to get free, his victors then proceeded to disable him
from making uny farther resistance. They first firmly tied
his wrists together behind himnext closely pinioned his
arms with a rope, one end of which was left dangling in
his rear for future purposes; and lastly, so effectually
gagged
him as to prevent the possibility of his raising an
alarm by any articulate cries for assistance. He was now
helped on to his feet, and, after being threatened with
instant
death if he attempted to groan or make any noise, led
down stairs by two of the brethren walking each side and
holding their poniards to his breast, while a third holding
on to the end of the rope, and armed with the same
weapon
S*
to prick him if he faultered, followed behind. At the
door stood a close carriage drawn up in readiness to
receive
the prisoner, and two of the three brothers who had
been allotted the preceding evening to the last important
duty, and who had now left the lodge-room for the
purpose
on the breaking up of the Council, were in attendance,
anxiously awaiting his appearance from the hallone of
whom, having mounted the driver's seat, was now holding
the reins, while the other, who was no other than our
hero
,
was seated within to take charge of the unfortunate
man on the way to the place which had been appointed
by the three for the final catastrophe, and whither the
third one of their number had already proceeded alone to
see that all things were duly prepared, and to await the
arrival
of his companions.
When the keepers of Botherworth had got him to the
door, they made a brief pause, and, in a quick, under-tone
of voice, exchanged the pass-word with their companions
in waiting. They then, after peering about a moment in
the darkness to discover if any one was approaching,
hastily
urged him forward, forced him into the carriage, and,
in willing ignorance of the identity of the brothers to whom
they had delivered their charge, instantly retreated back
to the recesses of their sanctum sanctorum to join their
brethren in resuming the deliberations of the conclave.
But having no occasion to witness the further proceedings
of the rest of this illustrious assemblage, let us bid them a
final adieu, and follow the fortunes of our hero, who was
now about to fill the measure of his masonic glory in the
closing scene of our changeful and sad-ending story.
As soon as Timothy had seated the prisoner by his side
in the carriage, securely possessed himself of the end of
the rope by which he was pinioned, and sternly enjoined
the strictest silence at the point of his poniard, he made a
signal to his companion, and immediately they were in
motion
on their way out of town.
Trembling with the most painful solicitude and fearful
apprehension lest something should occur to excite
suspicion
,
or frustrate their purposes, did our hero and his
trusty
companion pass slowly and cautiously along the
different
parts of the town, and though the streets were now
dark and deserted, or illumined only by here and there a
light dimly twinkling through the gloom, and silent as the
city of the dead except occasionally perhaps the distant
and dying sounds of the receding steps of some benighted
debauchee stealthily pursuing his way homeward, yet they
suffered not their vigilance to abate, nor would their
feelings
allow them to breathe freely, till they had passed the
last straggling tenement of the suburbs,when feeling
comparatively relieved from this agitating sense of
insecurity
and fear, they struck off into an uninhabited road, and
proceeded rapidly onward to the place of destination.
After
a drive of about half an hour, during which the gloomy
silence of the way was only broken by the deep sighs and
stifled groans that sometimes involuntarily burst from the
bosom of the agonized and wretched prisoner, or the
rumbling
of distant thunder now occasionally heard in the
south, which seemed to send forth its low, deep utterance
in mournful response to his sufferings, the carriage halted
near an extensive sheet of water.
The brother who had acted as driver, having
dismounted
from his seat, and fastened his horses, now repaired to
the carriage door and threw it open;when he and our
hero helped Botherworth out upon the ground, and after
placing him between them, and cautiously securing their
holds on his person, they turned into a narrow lane, and
forced him along till they arrived at the water's edge.
Here lay a boat in which their pioneer brother was now
standing, just handling the oars, and making ready to push
off from the shore. The boat was a large skiff with three
boards thrown across for seats, besides the low one near
the stern for the oarsman, but with nothing else about it
uncommon or suspicious except a fifty-six pound iron
weight which lay in the bottom in the rear of the middle
seat.
As soon as the brother in charge of the boat was
recognized
as such by his companions on shore through the
official medium of the pass-word, the prisoner, after some
ineffectual attempts at resistance, was dragged on board
and placed on the centre cross board or high seat. Our
hero took the seat in front, and his compani on the
driver
the one next behind the prisoner, while in rear of all,
the third of the consecrated band, betook himself to the
seat and office of oarsman. Thus arranged, they headed
round, and immediately pushed out towards the middle of
the wide expanse of sleeping waters that lay shrouded in
darkness before them.
For some time they rowed on in silence, while the gloom
seemed every moment growing more and more deep and
impenetrable around them. When all at once a broad
and lingering flash of lightning burst upon the waters in
the brightness of noon-day, displaying a scene in the boat
at which the brotherhood themselves startled. The
oarsman
with his lips in motion counting the stroaks of his
oars, a calculation having been made of the number
required
to carry them far enough from the shore for their
purpose, was now bending lustily to his work, while the
large drops of persperation were falling fast from his
anxious
and troubled brow. The brother sitting immediately
behind the prisoner, was egerly engaged in tying the end
of the rope, by which the arms of the latter were confined,
to the iron weight that lay between them in the bottom of
the boat. While the victim himself, still unconcious of
the fatal machinery preparing at his back, was glaring,
with the attitudes of surprise and horror, upon the face of
Timothy, whom he seemed now for the first time to have
recognized as his old acquaintance; for the latter had not
only kept his return a secret from all but the brotherhood,
but, for reasons best known to himself, had carefully avoided
confronting Botherworth in the late lodge meeting. And on
thus unexpectedly discovering among his foes the person
whom he had supposed some hundred miles distantwhom
he had often obliged as a friend and neighbor, and to whom
now, but for the connection in which he found him, he
would have confidently appealed for aid in this
emergency
,
the astonished and heart-struck man started from his
seat, and gazing an instant on the rapt and lofty mien
before
him with a look which spake that to which the
Ettu
Brute
of Caesar were meaningless, sunk dispairingly down
with a groan of unutterable anguish as the last
glimmerings
of the wasting flash played faintly over the deeply
depicted wo of his distorted features. A loud peal from
the approaching thunder-cloud came booming over the
broad face of the bay, and all again was hushed in silence
and darkness.
Our hero's philosophy and sense of masonic justice as
stern as was the one, and as exalted and deep-rooted as
was the other, were, it must be confessed, a little shaken
by this unexpected incident. The thought that he was
about to lift his hand against one whom he had long
familiarly
known as a kind and agreeable neighbor produced
indeed
some unpleasant sensations, and made kim for the
moment almost relent of his noble purposes. But other
thoughts soon came and brought with them an antidote
for this excusable frailty of feeling. He thought of his
insulted
father whose injuries had never been avenged. He
thought of the just behests of that institution to which his
heart was weddedwhose sacred principles he had
irrevocably
adopted as his only guide of action in life, and his
pass-port to heaven in the hour of death, and whose
violated
laws now seemed to cry aloud for vengeance on the
audacious wretch who had spurned and trampled them
under foot with such impious defiance. And above all,
he thought of his own solemn oaths in which he had
unreservedly
sworn on the holy bible, invoking the everlasting
God to keep him steadfast.
To sacrifice the traitors of
masonry
.
To be ready to inflict the same penalty
(that
suffered by Akirop)
on all those who disclose the secrets
of
their degrees, and
to take vengeance on the treason by the
destruction of the traitor
and were not these sacred
obligations
to be regarded? What were the ordinary
injunctions
of the civil laws of the country to these? What
indeed
had they to do with him in such a case? He was
entirely
aloof from their prohibitions, and above their
control
.
He was the honored subject of another, and
paramount
government, and under its high sanction he was now
acting. And as for incurring any moral guilt by the deed
he was about to commit, that was inconsistent and
impossible
;
for in one of those sublime and exalted degrees he
had taken he had been
made holy
, and consequently was
now placed beyond the liability of sinning. He thought
of all these, and as they passed through his mind, he
wondered
at his momentary weakness. His bosom again
became
steeled, and his arm nerved for the high and
enviable
duty before him, and he grew impatient for the moment
of its execution to arrive.
Meanwhile the thick and blackening mass of cloud in
the south was rapidly approaching. Nearer and nearer
fell the thunder-claps, and more and more vividly played
the lightnings around the wide-stretched and lofty van of
the dark, moving columnnow shooting fiercely and
perpendicularly
down from their vapory battlements above to
the face of the startled deep beneathand now, like the
fiery serpents of the fabled Tartarus, crinkling and leaping
from wave to wave along the wide arena of their terriffic
gambols till the whole bay was kindled into light and
seemingly converted into one vast Phlegethon of flames.
The prisoner at each returning flash, during the first part
of this grand and fearful scene, was observed to send many
a searching and wistful look around over the face of the
vacant waters. And now, finding there was no foreign
vessel in sight, or any other craft indeed, to which his
keepers could be taking him, as he seemed to have
imagined
was, at the worst, their purpose, he began to grow
every
moment more alarmed and restive. A cold sweat stood
on his face, and his features became more and more
troubled
,
and his eyes more wildly despairing, till his whole
frame seemed to writhe in agony under the workings of his
dreadful apprehensions. And, though still painfully
gagged
,
deep and heart-rending groans, now in the accents of
wo and distress, and now in the tones of supplication to his
keepers, or to heaven for mercy, were continually bursting
in convulsive sobs from his anguished bosom.
For many minutes the boat still shot swiftly onward in
its course, with no other indication that the fast nearing
storm or the increasing restlessness of the prisoner were
heeded by the brethren, except in the augmented velocity
with which they forced their skiff through the surging
waters
.
But soon, however, the strokes of the oarsman
began
visibly to relax, while the cautious changing of
postures
,
the fixing of feet, and the long-drawn and tremulous
respirations of the band, plainly told that the awful
moment
was approaching. At length, in a chosen interval of
darkness, the now almost motionless oars were suddenly
thrown aback, and the boat brought to a stand. For one
moment there was a dead and fearful pause. Our hero
and his companion by the prisoner awaited with trembling
nerves and suspended breaths the fatal signal from the
oarsman
.
At last it camethe same significant word of the
lodge-room
Nekum!
In an instant our hero was
upon
his feetin another his poniard was buried to the hilt
in the bosom of the prisoner;while the other, fiercely
grappling at the same time one end of the seat on which
the unfortunate man was writhing, and the ponderous
weight to which he was fastened, hurled both together into
the water. With the splashing sound descended the
lightning
stream in quivering flames to the spot, revealing here
the hero exultingly brandishing his reeking blade aloft,
and exclaiming,
Vengeance is taken!
and there the
sinking man, with the crimson current spouting up through
the discoloured wave that was flowing over his convulsed
and death-set features. Darkness again succeeded. Once
more rose a faint bubbling groan, and all was still. The
boat wheeled swiftly round for the shore, and the loud
crash of thunder that followed told the requium of the
hapless Botherworth, the victim of masonic vengeance!